1000
743,t thy bounds from the Red sea even unto the sea of the Philistines, and from the desert unto the river: for I will deliver the inhabitants of the land into your hand; and thou shalt drive them out before thee. 
Thou shalt make no covenant with them, nor with their gods. 
They shall not dwell in thy land, lest they make thee sin against me: for if thou serve their gods, it will surely be a snare unto thee. 
And he said unto Moses, Come up unto the LORD, thou, and Aaron, Nadab, and Abihu, and seventy of the elders of Israel; and worship ye afar off. 
And Moses alone shall come near the LORD: but they shall not come nigh; neither shall the people go up with him. 
And Moses came and told the people all the words of the LORD, and all the 
582,ies thereof, saith the LORD, no man shall abide there, neither shall a son of man dwell in it. 
Behold, he shall come up like a lion from the swelling of Jordan against the habitation of the strong: but I will suddenly make him run away from her: and who is a chosen man, that I may appoint over her? for who is like me? and who will appoint me the time? and who is that shepherd that will stand before me? 
Therefore hear the counsel of the LORD, that he hath taken against Edom; and his purposes, that he hath purposed against the inhabitants of Teman: Surely the least of the flo
806,; as it is written, For this cause I will confess to thee among the Gentiles, and sing unto thy name. 
And again he saith, Rejoice, ye Gentiles, with his people. 
And again, Praise the Lord, all ye Gentiles; and laud him, all ye people. 
And again, Esaias saith, There shall be a root of Jesse, and he that shall rise to reign over the Gentiles; in him shall the Gentiles trust. 
Now the God of hope fill you with all joy and peace in believing, that ye may abound in hope, through the power of the Holy Ghost. 
And I myself also am persuaded of you, my brethren, that ye also are full of goodness, filled with all knowledge, able also to admonish one another. 
Nevertheless, brethren, I have written the more boldly unto you in some sort, as putting you in mind, because of the grace that is given to me o
650,ce to the earth. 
So David prevailed over the Philistine with a sling and with a stone, and smote the Philistine, and slew him; but there was no sword in the hand of David. 
Therefore David ran, and stood upon the Philistine, and took his sword, and drew it out of the sheath thereof, and slew him, and cut off his head therewith. And when the Philistines saw their champion was dead, they fled. 
And the men of Israel and of Judah arose, and shouted, and pursued the Philistines, until thou come to the valley, and to the gates of Ekron. And the wounded of the Philistines fell down by the way to Shaaraim, even unto Gath, and unto Ekron. 
And the c
784,ee, and the myrtle, and the oil tree; I will set in the desert the fir tree, and the pine, and the box tree together: 
That they may see, and know, and consider, and understand together, that the hand of the LORD hath done this, and the Holy One of Israel hath created it. 
Produce your cause, saith the LORD; bring forth your strong reasons, saith the King of Jacob. 
Let them bring them forth, and shew us what shall happen: let them shew the former things, what they be, that we may consider them, and know the latter end of them; or declare us things for to come. 
Shew the things that are to come hereafter, that we may know that ye are gods: yea, do good, or do evil, that we may be dismayed, and behold it together. 
Behold, ye are of nothing, and your work of nought: an abomi
791,princes of Israel to help Solomon his son, saying, 
Is not the LORD your God with you? and hath he not given you rest on every side? for he hath given the inhabitants of the land into mine hand; and the land is subdued before the LORD, and before his people. 
Now set your heart and your soul to seek the LORD your God; arise therefore, and build ye the sanctuary of the LORD God, to bring the ark of the covenant of the LORD, and the holy vessels of God, into the house that is to be built to the name of the LORD. 
So when David was old and full of days, he made Solomon his son king over Israel. 
And he gathered together all the princes of Israel, with the priests and the Levites. 
Now the Levites were numbered from the age of thirty years and upward: and their number by their polls, 
802, men: but all the rest of the people bowed down upon their knees to drink water. 
And the LORD said unto Gideon, By the three hundred men that lapped will I save you, and deliver the Midianites into thine hand: and let all the other people go every man unto his place. 
So the people took victuals in their hand, and their trumpets: and he sent all the rest of Israel every man unto his tent, and retained those three hundred men: and the host of Midian was beneath him in the valley. 
And it came to pass the same night, that the LORD said unto him, Arise, get thee down unto the host; for I have delivered it into thine hand. 
But if thou fear to go down, go thou with Phurah thy servant down to the host: 
And thou shalt hear what they say; and afterward shall thine hands be strengthened to go down
561,nse, saith the Lord. And again, The Lord shall judge his people. 
It is a fearful thing to fall into the hands of the living God. 
But call to remembrance the former days, in which, after ye were illuminated, ye endured a great fight of afflictions; 
Partly, whilst ye were made a gazingstock both by reproaches and afflictions; and partly, whilst ye became companions of them that were so used. 
For ye had compassion of me in my bonds, and took joyfully the spoiling of your goods, knowing in yourselves that ye have in heaven a better and an enduring substan
731, 
Son of man, set thy face toward the mountains of Israel, and prophesy against them, 
And say, Ye mountains of Israel, hear the word of the Lord GOD; Thus saith the Lord GOD to the mountains, and to the hills, to the rivers, and to the valleys; Behold, I, even I, will bring a sword upon you, and I will destroy your high places. 
And your altars shall be desolate, and your images shall be broken: and I will cast down your slain men before your idols. 
And I will lay the dead carcases of the children of Israel before their idols; and I will scatter your bones round about your altars. 
In all your dwellingplaces the cities shall be laid waste, and the high places shall be desolate; that your altars may be laid waste and mad
817, because they hired against thee Balaam the son of Beor of Pethor of Mesopotamia, to curse thee. 
Nevertheless the LORD thy God would not hearken unto Balaam; but the LORD thy God turned the curse into a blessing unto thee, because the LORD thy God loved thee. 
Thou shalt not seek their peace nor their prosperity all thy days for ever. 
Thou shalt not abhor an Edomite; for he is thy brother: thou shalt not abhor an Egyptian; because thou wast a stranger in his land. 
The children that are begotten of them shall enter into the congregation of the LORD in their third generation. 
When the host goeth forth against thine enemies, then keep thee from every wicked thing. 
If there be among you any man, that is not clean by reason of uncleanness that chanceth him by night, then shall he go abroad out of the camp,
732,ine, saith the LORD of hosts, in that day when I make up my jewels; and I will spare them, as a man spareth his own son that serveth him. 
Then shall ye return, and discern between the righteous and the wicked, between him that serveth God and him that serveth him not. 
For, behold, the day cometh, that shall burn as an oven; and all the proud, yea, and all that do wickedly, shall be stubble: and the day that cometh shall burn them up, saith the LORD of hosts, that it shall leave them neither root nor branch. 
But unto you that fear my name shall the Sun of righteousness arise with healing in his wings; and ye shall go forth, and grow up as calves of the stall. 
And ye shall tread down the wicked; for they shall be ashes u
749,d they let down Jeremiah with cords. And in the dungeon there was no water, but mire: so Jeremiah sunk in the mire. 
Now when Ebedmelech the Ethiopian, one of the eunuchs which was in the king's house, heard that they had put Jeremiah in the dungeon; the king then sitting in the gate of Benjamin; 
Ebedmelech went forth out of the king's house, and spake to the king saying, 
My lord the king, these men have done evil in all that they have done to Jeremiah the prophet, whom they have cast into the dungeon; and he is like to die for hunger in the place where he is: for there is no more bread in the city. 
Then the king commanded Ebedmelech the Ethiopian, saying, Take from hence thirty men with thee, and take up Jeremiah the prophet out of the
756,unto thee; and we will hear it, and do it. 
And the LORD heard the voice of your words, when ye spake unto me; and the LORD said unto me, I have heard the voice of the words of this people, which they have spoken unto thee: they have well said all that they have spoken. 
O that there were such an heart in them, that they would fear me, and keep all my commandments always, that it might be well with them, and with their children for ever! 
Go say to them, Get you into your tents again. 
But as for thee, stand thou here by me, and I will speak unto thee all the commandments, and the statutes, and the judgments, which thou shalt teach them, that they may do them in the land which I give them to possess it. 
Ye shall observe to do therefore as the LO
734, thy honourable women: upon thy right hand did stand the queen in gold of Ophir. 
Hearken, O daughter, and consider, and incline thine ear; forget also thine own people, and thy father's house; 
So shall the king greatly desire thy beauty: for he is thy Lord; and worship thou him. 
And the daughter of Tyre shall be there with a gift; even the rich among the people shall intreat thy favour. 
The king's daughter is all glorious within: her clothing is of wrought gold. 
She shall be brought unto the king in raiment of needlework: the virgins her companions that follow her shall be brought unto thee. 
With gladness and rejoicing shall they be brought: they shall enter into the king's palace. 
Instead of thy fathers shall be thy 
649, holy unto the LORD. 
And if a man will at all redeem ought of his tithes, he shall add thereto the fifth part thereof. 
And concerning the tithe of the herd, or of the flock, even of whatsoever passeth under the rod, the tenth shall be holy unto the LORD. 
He shall not search whether it be good or bad, neither shall he change it: and if he change it at all, then both it and the change thereof shall be holy; it shall not be redeemed. 
These are the commandments, which the LORD commanded Moses for the children of Israel in mount Sinai. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses in the wilderness of Sinai, in the tabernacle of the congregation, on the fir
567,ess. 
And the LORD said unto Moses, Gather unto me seventy men of the elders of Israel, whom thou knowest to be the elders of the people, and officers over them; and bring them unto the tabernacle of the congregation, that they may stand there with thee. 
And I will come down and talk with thee there: and I will take of the spirit which is upon thee, and will put it upon them; and they shall bear the burden of the people with thee, that thou bear it not thyself alone. 
And say thou unto the people, Sanctify yourselves against to morrow, and ye shall eat flesh: 
639,t are in the world. If any man love the world, the love of the Father is not in him. 
For all that is in the world, the lust of the flesh, and the lust of the eyes, and the pride of life, is not of the Father, but is of the world. 
And the world passeth away, and the lust thereof: but he that doeth the will of God abideth for ever. 
Little children, it is the last time: and as ye have heard that antichrist shall come, even now are there many antichrists; whereby we know that it is the last time. 
They went out from us, but they were not of us; for if they had been of us, they would no doubt have continued with us: but they went out
749,l. 
O Assyrian, the rod of mine anger, and the staff in their hand is mine indignation. 
I will send him against an hypocritical nation, and against the people of my wrath will I give him a charge, to take the spoil, and to take the prey, and to tread them down like the mire of the streets. 
Howbeit he meaneth not so, neither doth his heart think so; but it is in his heart to destroy and cut off nations not a few. 
For he saith, Are not my princes altogether kings? 
Is not Calno as Carchemish? is not Hamath as Arpad? is not Samaria as Damascus? 
As my hand hath found the kingdoms of the idols, and whose graven images did excel them of Jerusalem and of Samaria; 
Shall I not, as I have done unto Samaria and her idols, so do to Jerusalem and 
750,ORD, that Solomon had asked this thing. 
And God said unto him, Because thou hast asked this thing, and hast not asked for thyself long life; neither hast asked riches for thyself, nor hast asked the life of thine enemies; but hast asked for thyself understanding to discern judgment; 
Behold, I have done according to thy words: lo, I have given thee a wise and an understanding heart; so that there was none like thee before thee, neither after thee shall any arise like unto thee. 
And I have also given thee that which thou hast not asked, both riches, and honour: so that there shall not be any among the kings like unto thee all thy days. 
And if thou wilt walk in my ways, to keep my statutes and my commandments, as thy father David did walk,
681,lders answered, saying unto me, What are these which are arrayed in white robes? and whence came they? 
And I said unto him, Sir, thou knowest. And he said to me, These are they which came out of great tribulation, and have washed their robes, and made them white in the blood of the Lamb. 
Therefore are they before the throne of God, and serve him day and night in his temple: and he that sitteth on the throne shall dwell among them. 
They shall hunger no more, neither thirst any more; neither shall the sun light on them, nor any heat. 
For the Lamb which is in the midst of the throne shall feed them, and shall lead them unto living fountains of waters: and God shall wipe a
654,raits. 
The ways of Zion do mourn, because none come to the solemn feasts: all her gates are desolate: her priests sigh, her virgins are afflicted, and she is in bitterness. 
Her adversaries are the chief, her enemies prosper; for the LORD hath afflicted her for the multitude of her transgressions: her children are gone into captivity before the enemy. 
And from the daughter of Zion all her beauty is departed: her princes are become like harts that find no pasture, and they are gone without strength before the pursuer. 
Jerusalem remembered in the days of her affliction and of her miseries all her pleasant things that she had in the days of old, 
771,ces, of pure myrrh five hundred shekels, and of sweet cinnamon half so much, even two hundred and fifty shekels, and of sweet calamus two hundred and fifty shekels, 
And of cassia five hundred shekels, after the shekel of the sanctuary, and of oil olive an hin: 
And thou shalt make it an oil of holy ointment, an ointment compound after the art of the apothecary: it shall be an holy anointing oil. 
And thou shalt anoint the tabernacle of the congregation therewith, and the ark of the testimony, 
And the table and all his vessels, and the candlestick and his vessels, and the altar of incense, 
And the altar of burnt offering with all his vessels, and the laver and his foot. 
And thou shalt sanctify them, that they may be most holy: whatsoever toucheth them shall 
563,man whom the king delighteth to honour. 
And Mordecai came again to the king's gate. But Haman hasted to his house mourning, and having his head covered. 
And Haman told Zeresh his wife and all his friends every thing that had befallen him. Then said his wise men and Zeresh his wife unto him, If Mordecai be of the seed of the Jews, before whom thou hast begun to fall, thou shalt not prevail against him, but shalt surely fall before him. 
And while they were yet talking with him, came the king's chamberlains, and hasted to bring Haman unto the banquet that E
696, Thebez, and took it. 
But there was a strong tower within the city, and thither fled all the men and women, and all they of the city, and shut it to them, and gat them up to the top of the tower. 
And Abimelech came unto the tower, and fought against it, and went hard unto the door of the tower to burn it with fire. 
And a certain woman cast a piece of a millstone upon Abimelech's head, and all to brake his skull. 
Then he called hastily unto the young man his armourbearer, and said unto him, Draw thy sword, and slay me, that men say not of me, A women slew him. And his young man thrust him through, and he died. 
And when the men of Israel saw that Abimelech was dead, they departed ever
598, thy camels: let the same be the woman whom the LORD hath appointed out for my master's son. 
And before I had done speaking in mine heart, behold, Rebekah came forth with her pitcher on her shoulder; and she went down unto the well, and drew water: and I said unto her, Let me drink, I pray thee. 
And she made haste, and let down her pitcher from her shoulder, and said, Drink, and I will give thy camels drink also: so I drank, and she made the camels drink also. 
And I asked her, and said, Whose daughter art thou? And she said, the daughter of Bethuel, Nahor's son, whom Milcah bare unto him:
817,thirteenth year of his reign. 
It came also in the days of Jehoiakim the son of Josiah king of Judah, unto the end of the eleventh year of Zedekiah the son of Josiah king of Judah, unto the carrying away of Jerusalem captive in the fifth month. 
Then the word of the LORD came unto me, saying, 
Before I formed thee in the belly I knew thee; and before thou camest forth out of the womb I sanctified thee, and I ordained thee a prophet unto the nations. 
Then said I, Ah, Lord GOD! behold, I cannot speak: for I am a child. 
But the LORD said unto me, Say not, I am a child: for thou shalt go to all that I shall send thee, and whatsoever I command thee thou shalt speak. 
Be not afraid of their faces: for I am with thee to deliver thee, saith the LORD. 
Then the LORD put forth his hand, and touched my mouth. And t
571,ong the cattle of the children of Israel. 
And Moses numbered, as the LORD commanded him, all the firstborn among the children of Israel. 
And all the firstborn males by the number of names, from a month old and upward, of those that were numbered of them, were twenty and two thousand two hundred and threescore and thirteen. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses, saying, 
Take the Levites instead of all the firstborn among the children of Israel, and the cattle of the Levites instead of their cattle; and the Levites shall be mine: I am the LORD. 
And for those that are to
740,have worship in the presence of them that sit at meat with thee. 
For whosoever exalteth himself shall be abased; and he that humbleth himself shall be exalted. 
Then said he also to him that bade him, When thou makest a dinner or a supper, call not thy friends, nor thy brethren, neither thy kinsmen, nor thy rich neighbours; lest they also bid thee again, and a recompence be made thee. 
But when thou makest a feast, call the poor, the maimed, the lame, the blind: 
And thou shalt be blessed; for they cannot recompense thee: for thou shalt be recompensed at the resurrection of the just. 
And when one of them that sat at meat with him heard these things, he said unto him, Blessed is he that shall eat bread in the kingdom of God. 
The
820,ught us, saying, If ye have judged me to be faithful to the Lord, come into my house, and abide there. And she constrained us. 
And it came to pass, as we went to prayer, a certain damsel possessed with a spirit of divination met us, which brought her masters much gain by soothsaying: 
The same followed Paul and us, and cried, saying, These men are the servants of the most high God, which shew unto us the way of salvation. 
And this did she many days. But Paul, being grieved, turned and said to the spirit, I command thee in the name of Jesus Christ to come out of her. And he came out the same hour. 
And when her masters saw that the hope of their gains was gone, they caught Paul and Silas, and drew them into the marketplace unto the rulers, 
And brought them to the magistrates, saying, These men, being Jews, 
662,red. 
And he sent them to Bethlehem, and said, Go and search diligently for the young child; and when ye have found him, bring me word again, that I may come and worship him also. 
When they had heard the king, they departed; and, lo, the star, which they saw in the east, went before them, till it came and stood over where the young child was. 
When they saw the star, they rejoiced with exceeding great joy. 
And when they were come into the house, they saw the young child with Mary his mother, and fell down, and worshipped him: and when they had opened their treasures, they presented unto him gifts; gold, and frankincense and myrrh. 
And being warned of 
632,nd I called for a drought upon the land, and upon the mountains, and upon the corn, and upon the new wine, and upon the oil, and upon that which the ground bringeth forth, and upon men, and upon cattle, and upon all the labour of the hands. 
Then Zerubbabel the son of Shealtiel, and Joshua the son of Josedech, the high priest, with all the remnant of the people, obeyed the voice of the LORD their God, and the words of Haggai the prophet, as the LORD their God had sent him, and the people did fear before the LORD. 
Then spake Haggai the LORD's messenger in the LORD's message unto the people, saying, I am with you, saith the L
743,hich I spake unto you, while I was yet with you, that all things must be fulfilled, which were written in the law of Moses, and in the prophets, and in the psalms, concerning me. 
Then opened he their understanding, that they might understand the scriptures, 
And said unto them, Thus it is written, and thus it behoved Christ to suffer, and to rise from the dead the third day: 
And that repentance and remission of sins should be preached in his name among all nations, beginning at Jerusalem. 
And ye are witnesses of these things. 
And, behold, I send the promise of my Father upon you: but tarry ye in the city of Jerusalem, until ye be endued with power from on high. 
And he led them out as far as to Bethany, and he lifted up his hands
664, and plenty of corn and wine: 
Let people serve thee, and nations bow down to thee: be lord over thy brethren, and let thy mother's sons bow down to thee: cursed be every one that curseth thee, and blessed be he that blesseth thee. 
And it came to pass, as soon as Isaac had made an end of blessing Jacob, and Jacob was yet scarce gone out from the presence of Isaac his father, that Esau his brother came in from his hunting. 
And he also had made savoury meat, and brought it unto his father, and said unto his father, Let my father arise, and eat of his son's venison, that thy soul may bless me. 
And Isaac his father said unto him, Who art thou? And he said, 
721,to be refused, if it be received with thanksgiving: 
For it is sanctified by the word of God and prayer. 
If thou put the brethren in remembrance of these things, thou shalt be a good minister of Jesus Christ, nourished up in the words of faith and of good doctrine, whereunto thou hast attained. 
But refuse profane and old wives' fables, and exercise thyself rather unto godliness. 
For bodily exercise profiteth little: but godliness is profitable unto all things, having promise of the life that now is, and of that which is to come. 
This is a faithful saying and worthy of all acceptation. 
For therefore we both labour and suffer reproach, because we trust in the living God, who is the Saviour of all men, special
614,itness unto us; for it hath heard all the words of the LORD which he spake unto us: it shall be therefore a witness unto you, lest ye deny your God. 
So Joshua let the people depart, every man unto his inheritance. 
And it came to pass after these things, that Joshua the son of Nun, the servant of the LORD, died, being an hundred and ten years old. 
And they buried him in the border of his inheritance in Timnathserah, which is in mount Ephraim, on the north side of the hill of Gaash. 
And Israel served the LORD all the days of Joshua, and all the days of the elders that overlived Joshua, and which had known
672,e slaughter for his children for the iniquity of their fathers; that they do not rise, nor possess the land, nor fill the face of the world with cities. 
For I will rise up against them, saith the LORD of hosts, and cut off from Babylon the name, and remnant, and son, and nephew, saith the LORD. 
I will also make it a possession for the bittern, and pools of water: and I will sweep it with the besom of destruction, saith the LORD of hosts. 
The LORD of hosts hath sworn, saying, Surely as I have thought, so shall it come to pass; and as I have purposed, so shall it stand: 
That I will break the Assyrian in my land, and upon my mountains tread him under foot: then s
756,m his neighbour. 
Behold, I am against the prophets, saith the LORD, that use their tongues, and say, He saith. 
Behold, I am against them that prophesy false dreams, saith the LORD, and do tell them, and cause my people to err by their lies, and by their lightness; yet I sent them not, nor commanded them: therefore they shall not profit this people at all, saith the LORD. 
And when this people, or the prophet, or a priest, shall ask thee, saying, What is the burden of the LORD? thou shalt then say unto them, What burden? I will even forsake you, saith the LORD. 
And as for the prophet, and the priest, and the people, that shall say, The burden of the LORD, I will even punish that man and his house. 
Thus shall ye say every one to his neighbour, 
729,t holy. 
The priest that offereth it for sin shall eat it: in the holy place shall it be eaten, in the court of the tabernacle of the congregation. 
Whatsoever shall touch the flesh thereof shall be holy: and when there is sprinkled of the blood thereof upon any garment, thou shalt wash that whereon it was sprinkled in the holy place. 
But the earthen vessel wherein it is sodden shall be broken: and if it be sodden in a brasen pot, it shall be both scoured, and rinsed in water. 
All the males among the priests shall eat thereof: it is most holy. 
And no sin offering, whereof any of the blood is brought into the tabernacle of the congregation to reconcile withal in the holy place, shall be eaten: it shall be burnt in the
781,all mine assemblies; and they shall hallow my sabbaths. 
And they shall come at no dead person to defile themselves: but for father, or for mother, or for son, or for daughter, for brother, or for sister that hath had no husband, they may defile themselves. 
And after he is cleansed, they shall reckon unto him seven days. 
And in the day that he goeth into the sanctuary, unto the inner court, to minister in the sanctuary, he shall offer his sin offering, saith the Lord GOD. 
And it shall be unto them for an inheritance: I am their inheritance: and ye shall give them no possession in Israel: I am their possession. 
They shall eat the meat offering, and the sin offering, and the trespass offering: and every dedicated thing in Israel shall be theirs. 
And the first of all t
740, palaces, like the earth which he hath established for ever. 
He chose David also his servant, and took him from the sheepfolds: 
From following the ewes great with young he brought him to feed Jacob his people, and Israel his inheritance. 
So he fed them according to the integrity of his heart; and guided them by the skilfulness of his hands. 
O god, the heathen are come into thine inheritance; thy holy temple have they defiled; they have laid Jerusalem on heaps. 
The dead bodies of thy servants have they given to be meat unto the fowls of the heaven, the flesh of thy saints unto the beasts of the earth. 
Their blood have they shed like water round about Jerusalem; and there was none to bury them. 
We are become a reproach to our
819, did Sheshbazzar bring up with them of the captivity that were brought up from Babylon unto Jerusalem. 
Now these are the children of the province that went up out of the captivity, of those which had been carried away, whom Nebuchadnezzar the king of Babylon had carried away unto Babylon, and came again unto Jerusalem and Judah, every one unto his city; 
Which came with Zerubbabel: Jeshua, Nehemiah, Seraiah, Reelaiah, Mordecai, Bilshan, Mizpar, Bigvai, Rehum, Baanah. The number of the men of the people of Israel: 
The children of Parosh, two thousand an hundred seventy and two. 
The children of Shephatiah, three hundred seventy and two. 
The children of Arah, seven hundred seventy and five. 
The children of Pahathmoab, of the children of Jeshua and Joab, two thousand eight hundred and twelve. 
The children 
714, blotted out of the book of the living, and not be written with the righteous. 
But I am poor and sorrowful: let thy salvation, O God, set me up on high. 
I will praise the name of God with a song, and will magnify him with thanksgiving. 
This also shall please the LORD better than an ox or bullock that hath horns and hoofs. 
The humble shall see this, and be glad: and your heart shall live that seek God. 
For the LORD heareth the poor, and despiseth not his prisoners. 
Let the heaven and earth praise him, the seas, and every thing that moveth therein. 
For God will save Zion, and will build the cities of Judah: that they may dwell there, and have it in possession. 
The seed also of his servants shall inh
724,t none should serve themselves of them any more, then they obeyed, and let them go. 
But afterward they turned, and caused the servants and the handmaids, whom they had let go free, to return, and brought them into subjection for servants and for handmaids. 
Therefore the word of the LORD came to Jeremiah from the LORD, saying, 
Thus saith the LORD, the God of Israel; I made a covenant with your fathers in the day that I brought them forth out of the land of Egypt, out of the house of bondmen, saying, 
At the end of seven years let ye go every man his brother an Hebrew, which hath been sold unto thee; and when he hath served thee six years, thou shalt let him go free from thee: but your fathers hearkened not unto m
721, of the LORD. 
O god, my heart is fixed; I will sing and give praise, even with my glory. 
Awake, psaltery and harp: I myself will awake early. 
I will praise thee, O LORD, among the people: and I will sing praises unto thee among the nations. 
For thy mercy is great above the heavens: and thy truth reacheth unto the clouds. 
Be thou exalted, O God, above the heavens: and thy glory above all the earth; 
That thy beloved may be delivered: save with thy right hand, and answer me. 
God hath spoken in his holiness; I will rejoice, I will divide Shechem, and mete out the valley of Succoth. 
Gilead is mine; Manasseh is mine; Ephraim also is the strength of mine head; Judah is my lawgiver; 
Moab is my washpot; over Edo
651,daea are in Christ Jesus: for ye also have suffered like things of your own countrymen, even as they have of the Jews: 
Who both killed the Lord Jesus, and their own prophets, and have persecuted us; and they please not God, and are contrary to all men: 
Forbidding us to speak to the Gentiles that they might be saved, to fill up their sins alway: for the wrath is come upon them to the uttermost. 
But we, brethren, being taken from you for a short time in presence, not in heart, endeavoured the more abundantly to see your face with great desire. 
Wherefore we would have come unto you, even I Paul, once and again; but Satan hindered us. 
For wha
737,shua the son of Nun: for they have wholly followed the LORD. 
And the LORD'S anger was kindled against Israel, and he made them wander in the wilderness forty years, until all the generation, that had done evil in the sight of the LORD, was consumed. 
And, behold, ye are risen up in your fathers' stead, an increase of sinful men, to augment yet the fierce anger of the LORD toward Israel. 
For if ye turn away from after him, he will yet again leave them in the wilderness; and ye shall destroy all this people. 
And they came near unto him, and said, We will build sheepfolds here for our cattle, and cities for our little ones: 
But we ourselves will go ready armed before the children of Israel, until we have brought them unto thei
617,sus did, he said unto his disciples, 
Let these sayings sink down into your ears: for the Son of man shall be delivered into the hands of men. 
But they understood not this saying, and it was hid from them, that they perceived it not: and they feared to ask him of that saying. 
Then there arose a reasoning among them, which of them should be greatest. 
And Jesus, perceiving the thought of their heart, took a child, and set him by him, 
And said unto them, Whosoever shall receive this child in my name receiveth me: and whosoever shall receive me receiveth him that sent me: for he that is least among you all, th
840,, 
Tell ye the daughter of Sion, Behold, thy King cometh unto thee, meek, and sitting upon an ass, and a colt the foal of an ass. 
And the disciples went, and did as Jesus commanded them, 
And brought the ass, and the colt, and put on them their clothes, and they set him thereon. 
And a very great multitude spread their garments in the way; others cut down branches from the trees, and strawed them in the way. 
And the multitudes that went before, and that followed, cried, saying, Hosanna to the son of David: Blessed is he that cometh in the name of the Lord; Hosanna in the highest. 
And when he was come into Jerusalem, all the city was moved, saying, Who is this? 
And the multitude said, This is Jesus the prophet of Nazareth of Galilee. 
And Jesus went into the temple of God, and cast out all them that sold and bought in the tem
695, with lies, and the house of Israel with deceit: but Judah yet ruleth with God, and is faithful with the saints. 
Ephraim feedeth on wind, and followeth after the east wind: he daily increaseth lies and desolation; and they do make a covenant with the Assyrians, and oil is carried into Egypt. 
The LORD hath also a controversy with Judah, and will punish Jacob according to his ways; according to his doings will he recompense him. 
He took his brother by the heel in the womb, and by his strength he had power with God: 
Yea, he had power over the angel, and prevailed: he wept, and made supplication unto him: he found him in Bethel, and there he spake with us; 
Even the LORD God of hosts; t
700, stranger, 
Thou art snared with the words of thy mouth, thou art taken with the words of thy mouth. 
Do this now, my son, and deliver thyself, when thou art come into the hand of thy friend; go, humble thyself, and make sure thy friend. 
Give not sleep to thine eyes, nor slumber to thine eyelids. 
Deliver thyself as a roe from the hand of the hunter, and as a bird from the hand of the fowler. 
Go to the ant, thou sluggard; consider her ways, and be wise: 
Which having no guide, overseer, or ruler, 
Provideth her meat in the summer, and gathereth her food in the harvest. 
How long wilt thou sleep, O sluggard? when wilt thou arise out of thy sleep? 
Yet a little sleep, a little slumber, a lit
563,the earth; and there fell a noisome and grievous sore upon the men which had the mark of the beast, and upon them which worshipped his image. 
And the second angel poured out his vial upon the sea; and it became as the blood of a dead man: and every living soul died in the sea. 
And the third angel poured out his vial upon the rivers and fountains of waters; and they became blood. 
And I heard the angel of the waters say, Thou art righteous, O Lord, which art, and wast, and shalt be, because thou hast judged thus. 
For they have shed the blood of saints and
582,he slayer and the revenger of blood according to these judgments: 
And the congregation shall deliver the slayer out of the hand of the revenger of blood, and the congregation shall restore him to the city of his refuge, whither he was fled: and he shall abide in it unto the death of the high priest, which was anointed with the holy oil. 
But if the slayer shall at any time come without the border of the city of his refuge, whither he was fled; 
And the revenger of blood find him without the borders of the city of his refuge, and the revenger of blood kill the slayer; he shal
821,id God, Call his name Loammi: for ye are not my people, and I will not be your God. 
Yet the number of the children of Israel shall be as the sand of the sea, which cannot be measured nor numbered; and it shall come to pass, that in the place where it was said unto them, Ye are not my people, there it shall be said unto them, Ye are the sons of the living God. 
Then shall the children of Judah and the children of Israel be gathered together, and appoint themselves one head, and they shall come up out of the land: for great shall be the day of Jezreel. 
Say ye unto your brethren, Ammi; and to your sisters, Ruhamah. 
Plead with your mother, plead: for she is not my wife, neither am I her husband: let her therefore put away her whoredoms out of her sight, and her adulteries from between her breasts; 
Lest I strip
642,t grew: for the LORD God had not caused it to rain upon the earth, and there was not a man to till the ground. 
But there went up a mist from the earth, and watered the whole face of the ground. 
And the LORD God formed man of the dust of the ground, and breathed into his nostrils the breath of life; and man became a living soul. 
And the LORD God planted a garden eastward in Eden; and there he put the man whom he had formed. 
And out of the ground made the LORD God to grow every tree that is pleasant to the sight, and good for food; the tree of life also in the midst of the garden, and the tree of knowledge of good and evil. 
And a r
617,nd it: and speak not to us in the Jews' language, in the ears of the people that are on the wall. 
But Rabshakeh said, Hath my master sent me to thy master and to thee to speak these words? hath he not sent me to the men that sit upon the wall, that they may eat their own dung, and drink their own piss with you? 
Then Rabshakeh stood, and cried with a loud voice in the Jews' language, and said, Hear ye the words of the great king, the king of Assyria. 
Thus saith the king, Let not Hezekiah deceive you: for he shall not be able to deliver you. 
Neither let Hezekiah make you trust in the LORD, saying, The LORD w
704,gation. 
And this shall be an everlasting statute unto you, to make an atonement for the children of Israel for all their sins once a year. And he did as the LORD commanded Moses. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses, saying, 
Speak unto Aaron, and unto his sons, and unto all the children of Israel, and say unto them; This is the thing which the LORD hath commanded, saying, 
What man soever there be of the house of Israel, that killeth an ox, or lamb, or goat, in the camp, or that killeth it out of the camp, 
And bringeth it not unto the door of the tabernacle of the congregation, to offer an offering unto the LORD before the tabernacle of the LORD; blood shall be imputed unto that man; he hath shed b
663,adly. 
And the day following Paul went in with us unto James; and all the elders were present. 
And when he had saluted them, he declared particularly what things God had wrought among the Gentiles by his ministry. 
And when they heard it, they glorified the Lord, and said unto him, Thou seest, brother, how many thousands of Jews there are which believe; and they are all zealous of the law: 
And they are informed of thee, that thou teachest all the Jews which are among the Gentiles to forsake Moses, saying that they ought not to circumcise their children, neither to walk after the customs. 
What is it therefore? the multitude must needs come together: for
830,murmured such things concerning him; and the Pharisees and the chief priests sent officers to take him. 
Then said Jesus unto them, Yet a little while am I with you, and then I go unto him that sent me. 
Ye shall seek me, and shall not find me: and where I am, thither ye cannot come. 
Then said the Jews among themselves, Whither will he go, that we shall not find him? will he go unto the dispersed among the Gentiles, and teach the Gentiles? 
What manner of saying is this that he said, Ye shall seek me, and shall not find me: and where I am, thither ye cannot come? 
In the last day, that great day of the feast, Jesus stood and cried, saying, If any man thirst, let him come unto me, and drink. 
He that believeth on me, as the scripture hath said, out of his belly shall flow rivers of living water. 
(But this spake he of 
596,side of Arnon, but came not within the border of Moab: for Arnon was the border of Moab. 
And Israel sent messengers unto Sihon king of the Amorites, the king of Heshbon; and Israel said unto him, Let us pass, we pray thee, through thy land into my place. 
But Sihon trusted not Israel to pass through his coast: but Sihon gathered all his people together, and pitched in Jahaz, and fought against Israel. 
And the LORD God of Israel delivered Sihon and all his people into the hand of Israel, and they smote them: so Israel possessed all the land of the Amorites, the inhabitants of that country
655,was desolate; and against the house of Judah, when they went into captivity; 
Behold, therefore I will deliver thee to the men of the east for a possession, and they shall set their palaces in thee, and make their dwellings in thee: they shall eat thy fruit, and they shall drink thy milk. 
And I will make Rabbah a stable for camels, and the Ammonites a couching place for flocks: and ye shall know that I am the LORD. 
For thus saith the Lord GOD; Because thou hast clapped thine hands, and stamped with the feet, and rejoiced in heart with all thy despite against the land of Israel; 
Behold, therefore I will stretch out mine hand upon thee, and will 
658,s it came to pass, and ye know. 
For this cause, when I could no longer forbear, I sent to know your faith, lest by some means the tempter have tempted you, and our labour be in vain. 
But now when Timotheus came from you unto us, and brought us good tidings of your faith and charity, and that ye have good remembrance of us always, desiring greatly to see us, as we also to see you: 
Therefore, brethren, we were comforted over you in all our affliction and distress by your faith: 
For now we live, if ye stand fast in the Lord. 
For what thanks can we render to God again for you, for all the joy wherewith we joy for your sakes before our God; 
Night an
816,e to Penuel, and spake unto them likewise: and the men of Penuel answered him as the men of Succoth had answered him. 
And he spake also unto the men of Penuel, saying, When I come again in peace, I will break down this tower. 
Now Zebah and Zalmunna were in Karkor, and their hosts with them, about fifteen thousand men, all that were left of all the hosts of the children of the east: for there fell an hundred and twenty thousand men that drew sword. 
And Gideon went up by the way of them that dwelt in tents on the east of Nobah and Jogbehah, and smote the host; for the host was secure. 
And when Zebah and Zalmunna fled, he pursued after them, and took the two kings of Midian, Zebah and Zalmunna, and discomfited all the host. 
And Gideon the son of Joash returned from battle before the sun was up, 
And cau
754,places, and moved him to jealousy with their graven images. 
When God heard this, he was wroth, and greatly abhorred Israel: 
So that he forsook the tabernacle of Shiloh, the tent which he placed among men; 
And delivered his strength into captivity, and his glory into the enemy's hand. 
He gave his people over also unto the sword; and was wroth with his inheritance. 
The fire consumed their young men; and their maidens were not given to marriage. 
Their priests fell by the sword; and their widows made no lamentation. 
Then the LORD awaked as one out of sleep, and like a mighty man that shouteth by reason of wine. 
And he smote his enemies in the hinder parts: he put them to a perpetual reproach. 
Moreover he refused the tabernacle of Joseph, a
560,I may be filled with joy; 
When I call to remembrance the unfeigned faith that is in thee, which dwelt first in thy grandmother Lois, and thy mother Eunice; and I am persuaded that in thee also. 
Wherefore I put thee in remembrance that thou stir up the gift of God, which is in thee by the putting on of my hands. 
For God hath not given us the spirit of fear; but of power, and of love, and of a sound mind. 
Be not thou therefore ashamed of the testimony of our Lord, nor of me his prisoner: but be thou partaker of the afflictions of the gospel according t
694,st he come; and the rod which was turned to a serpent shalt thou take in thine hand. 
And thou shalt say unto him, The LORD God of the Hebrews hath sent me unto thee, saying, Let my people go, that they may serve me in the wilderness: and, behold, hitherto thou wouldest not hear. 
Thus saith the LORD, In this thou shalt know that I am the LORD: behold, I will smite with the rod that is in mine hand upon the waters which are in the river, and they shall be turned to blood. 
And the fish that is in the river shall die, and the river shall stink; and the Egyptians shall lothe to drink of the water of the river. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses, Say unto Aaron, Take thy rod, and stretch out 
763,ne that trusteth in them. 
Bless the LORD, O house of Israel: bless the LORD, O house of Aaron: 
Bless the LORD, O house of Levi: ye that fear the LORD, bless the LORD. 
Blessed be the LORD out of Zion, which dwelleth at Jerusalem. Praise ye the LORD. 
O give thanks unto the LORD; for he is good: for his mercy endureth for ever. 
O give thanks unto the God of gods: for his mercy endureth for ever. 
O give thanks to the Lord of lords: for his mercy endureth for ever. 
To him who alone doeth great wonders: for his mercy endureth for ever. 
To him that by wisdom made the heavens: for his mercy endureth for ever. 
To him that stretched out the earth above the waters: for his mercy endureth for ever. 
To him that made great lights: for his mercy endureth for
638,e border thereof to the LORD. 
And it shall be for a sign and for a witness unto the LORD of hosts in the land of Egypt: for they shall cry unto the LORD because of the oppressors, and he shall send them a saviour, and a great one, and he shall deliver them. 
And the LORD shall be known to Egypt, and the Egyptians shall know the LORD in that day, and shall do sacrifice and oblation; yea, they shall vow a vow unto the LORD, and perform it. 
And the LORD shall smite Egypt: he shall smite and heal it: and they shall return even to the LORD, and he shall be intreated of them, and shall heal them. 
In that day shall there be a highway 
739,such as was not since men were upon the earth, so mighty an earthquake, and so great. 
And the great city was divided into three parts, and the cities of the nations fell: and great Babylon came in remembrance before God, to give unto her the cup of the wine of the fierceness of his wrath. 
And every island fled away, and the mountains were not found. 
And there fell upon men a great hail out of heaven, every stone about the weight of a talent: and men blasphemed God because of the plague of the hail; for the plague thereof was exceeding great. 
And there came one of the seven angels which had the seven vials, and talked with me, saying unto me, Come hither; I will shew unto thee the judgment of the great whore that sitteth upon 
695,speak fair words unto thee. 
I have forsaken mine house, I have left mine heritage; I have given the dearly beloved of my soul into the hand of her enemies. 
Mine heritage is unto me as a lion in the forest; it crieth out against me: therefore have I hated it. 
Mine heritage is unto me as a speckled bird, the birds round about are against her; come ye, assemble all the beasts of the field, come to devour. 
Many pastors have destroyed my vineyard, they have trodden my portion under foot, they have made my pleasant portion a desolate wilderness. 
They have made it desolate, and being desolate it mourneth unto me; the whole land is made desolate, because no man layeth it to heart. 
The spo
784,d died, and Samlah of Masrekah reigned in his stead. 
And Samlah died, and Saul of Rehoboth by the river reigned in his stead. 
And Saul died, and Baalhanan the son of Achbor reigned in his stead. 
And Baalhanan the son of Achbor died, and Hadar reigned in his stead: and the name of his city was Pau; and his wife's name was Mehetabel, the daughter of Matred, the daughter of Mezahab. 
And these are the names of the dukes that came of Esau, according to their families, after their places, by their names; duke Timnah, duke Alvah, duke Jetheth, 
Duke Aholibamah, duke Elah, duke Pinon, 
Duke Kenaz, duke Teman, duke Mibzar, 
Duke Magdiel, duke Iram: these be the dukes of Edom, according to their habitations in the land of their possession: he is Esau the father of the Edomites. 

768,ried him away, and delivered him to Pilate. 
And Pilate asked him, Art thou the King of the Jews? And he answering said unto them, Thou sayest it. 
And the chief priests accused him of many things: but he answered nothing. 
And Pilate asked him again, saying, Answerest thou nothing? behold how many things they witness against thee. 
But Jesus yet answered nothing; so that Pilate marvelled. 
Now at that feast he released unto them one prisoner, whomsoever they desired. 
And there was one named Barabbas, which lay bound with them that had made insurrection with him, who had committed murder in the insurrection. 
And the multitude crying aloud began to desire him to do as he had ever done unto them. 
But Pilate answered them, saying, Will ye that I release unto
629,e? and there is none upon earth that I desire beside thee. 
My flesh and my heart faileth: but God is the strength of my heart, and my portion for ever. 
For, lo, they that are far from thee shall perish: thou hast destroyed all them that go a whoring from thee. 
But it is good for me to draw near to God: I have put my trust in the Lord GOD, that I may declare all thy works. 
O God, why hast thou cast us off for ever? why doth thine anger smoke against the sheep of thy pasture? 
Remember thy congregation, which thou hast purchased of old; the rod of thine inheritance, which thou hast redeemed; this mount Zion, wherein tho
630, in a flame of fire out of the midst of a bush: and he looked, and, behold, the bush burned with fire, and the bush was not consumed. 
And Moses said, I will now turn aside, and see this great sight, why the bush is not burnt. 
And when the LORD saw that he turned aside to see, God called unto him out of the midst of the bush, and said, Moses, Moses. And he said, Here am I. 
And he said, Draw not nigh hither: put off thy shoes from off thy feet, for the place whereon thou standest is holy ground. 
Moreover he said, I am the God of thy father, the God of Abraham, the God of Isaac, and the God of Jacob. And Moses hid his fac
700,t maketh mention thereof shall be afraid in himself, because of the counsel of the LORD of hosts, which he hath determined against it. 
In that day shall five cities in the land of Egypt speak the language of Canaan, and swear to the LORD of hosts; one shall be called, The city of destruction. 
In that day shall there be an altar to the LORD in the midst of the land of Egypt, and a pillar at the border thereof to the LORD. 
And it shall be for a sign and for a witness unto the LORD of hosts in the land of Egypt: for they shall cry unto the LORD because of the oppressors, and he shall send them a saviour, and a great one, and he shall deliver them. 
And the LORD shall be known to Egypt, and t
734,ree went forth that the wise men should be slain; and they sought Daniel and his fellows to be slain. 
Then Daniel answered with counsel and wisdom to Arioch the captain of the king's guard, which was gone forth to slay the wise men of Babylon: 
He answered and said to Arioch the king's captain, Why is the decree so hasty from the king? Then Arioch made the thing known to Daniel. 
Then Daniel went in, and desired of the king that he would give him time, and that he would shew the king the interpretation. 
Then Daniel went to his house, and made the thing known to Hananiah, Mishael, and Azariah, his companions: 
That they would desire mercies of the God of heaven concerning this secret; that Daniel and his fellows should not 
760,Thou shalt tread upon the lion and adder: the young lion and the dragon shalt thou trample under feet. 
Because he hath set his love upon me, therefore will I deliver him: I will set him on high, because he hath known my name. 
He shall call upon me, and I will answer him: I will be with him in trouble; I will deliver him, and honour him. 
With long life will I satisfy him, and shew him my salvation. 
IT IS A GOOD THING TO GIVE THANKS UNTO THE LORD, AND TO SING PRAISES UNTO THY NAME, O MOST HIGH: 
To shew forth thy lovingkindness in the morning, and thy faithfulness every night, 
Upon an instrument of ten strings, and upon the psaltery; upon the harp with a solemn sound. 
For thou, LORD, hast made me glad through thy work: I will triumph in the works
629, heart, and with all his soul, to perform the words of the covenant which are written in this book. 
And he caused all that were present in Jerusalem and Benjamin to stand to it. And the inhabitants of Jerusalem did according to the covenant of God, the God of their fathers. 
And Josiah took away all the abominations out of all the countries that pertained to the children of Israel, and made all that were present in Israel to serve, even to serve the LORD their God. And all his days they departed not from following the LORD, the God of their fathers. 
Moreover Josiah kept a passover unto the LORD in Jerusalem: and they ki
671,ion: and Aaron's sons the priests shall sprinkle the blood upon the altar round about. 
And he shall offer of the sacrifice of the peace offering an offering made by fire unto the LORD; the fat that covereth the inwards, and all the fat that is upon the inwards, 
And the two kidneys, and the fat that is on them, which is by the flanks, and the caul above the liver, with the kidneys, it shall he take away. 
And Aaron's sons shall burn it on the altar upon the burnt sacrifice, which is upon the wood that is on the fire: it is an offering made by fire, of a sweet savour unto the LORD. 
And if his offering for a sacrifice of peace offering unto the LORD be of the flo
710,nor forsake thee, until thou hast finished all the work for the service of the house of the LORD. 
And, behold, the courses of the priests and the Levites, even they shall be with thee for all the service of the house of God: and there shall be with thee for all manner of workmanship every willing skilful man, for any manner of service: also the princes and all the people will be wholly at thy commandment. 
Furthermore David the king said unto all the congregation, Solomon my son, whom alone God hath chosen, is yet young and tender, and the work is great: for the palace is not for man, but for the LORD God. 
Now I have prepared with all my might for the house of my God the gold for things to be made o
838,oice at the sound of the organ. 
They spend their days in wealth, and in a moment go down to the grave. 
Therefore they say unto God, Depart from us; for we desire not the knowledge of thy ways. 
What is the Almighty, that we should serve him? and what profit should we have, if we pray unto him? 
Lo, their good is not in their hand: the counsel of the wicked is far from me. 
How oft is the candle of the wicked put out! and how oft cometh their destruction upon them! God distributeth sorrows in his anger. 
They are as stubble before the wind, and as chaff that the storm carrieth away. 
God layeth up his iniquity for his children: he rewardeth him, and he shall know it. 
His eyes shall see his destruction, and he shall drink of the wrath of the Almighty. 
For what pleasure hath he in his house after him, when the number of his m
619, his soul from troubles. 
Proud and haughty scorner is his name, who dealeth in proud wrath. 
The desire of the slothful killeth him; for his hands refuse to labour. 
He coveteth greedily all the day long: but the righteous giveth and spareth not. 
The sacrifice of the wicked is abomination: how much more, when he bringeth it with a wicked mind? 
A false witness shall perish: but the man that heareth speaketh constantly. 
A wicked man hardeneth his face: but as for the upright, he directeth his way. 
There is no wisdom nor understanding nor counsel against the LORD. 
The horse is prepared against the day of batt
824,ry, and in the vessels thereof. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses and unto Aaron saying, 
Cut ye not off the tribe of the families of the Kohathites from among the Levites: 
But thus do unto them, that they may live, and not die, when they approach unto the most holy things: Aaron and his sons shall go in, and appoint them every one to his service and to his burden: 
But they shall not go in to see when the holy things are covered, lest they die. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses, saying, 
Take also the sum of the sons of Gershon, throughout the houses of their fathers, by their families; 
From thirty years old and upward until fifty years old shalt thou number them; all that enter in to perform the service, to do the work in the tabernacle of the congregation. 
This is the service of the families of the Gershonites, t
828,lot out his name out of the book of life, but I will confess his name before my Father, and before his angels. 
He that hath an ear, let him hear what the Spirit saith unto the churches. 
And to the angel of the church in Philadelphia write; These things saith he that is holy, he that is true, he that hath the key of David, he that openeth, and no man shutteth; and shutteth, and no man openeth; 
I know thy works: behold, I have set before thee an open door, and no man can shut it: for thou hast a little strength, and hast kept my word, and hast not denied my name. 
Behold, I will make them of the synagogue of Satan, which say they are Jews, and are not, but do lie; behold, I will make them to come and worship before thy feet, and to know that I have loved thee. 
Because thou hast kept the word of my patience, I also 
720,ning him, that he should be the third ruler in the kingdom. 
In that night was Belshazzar the king of the Chaldeans slain. 
And Darius the Median took the kingdom, being about threescore and two years old. 
It pleased Darius to set over the kingdom an hundred and twenty princes, which should be over the whole kingdom; 
And over these three presidents; of whom Daniel was first: that the princes might give accounts unto them, and the king should have no damage. 
Then this Daniel was preferred above the presidents and princes, because an excellent spirit was in him; and the king thought to set him over the whole realm. 
Then the presidents and princes sought to find occasion against Daniel concerning the kingdom; 
827,days of Purim should not fail from among the Jews, nor the memorial of them perish from their seed. 
Then Esther the queen, the daughter of Abihail, and Mordecai the Jew, wrote with all authority, to confirm this second letter of Purim. 
And he sent the letters unto all the Jews, to the hundred twenty and seven provinces of the kingdom of Ahasuerus, with words of peace and truth, 
To confirm these days of Purim in their times appointed, according as Mordecai the Jew and Esther the queen had enjoined them, and as they had decreed for themselves and for their seed, the matters of the fastings and their cry. 
And the decree of Esther confirmed these matters of Purim; and it was written in the book. 
And the king Ahasuerus laid a tribute upon the land, and upon the isles of the sea. 
And all the acts of his power and of
717,ple, Be not ye afraid of them: remember the LORD, which is great and terrible, and fight for your brethren, your sons, and your daughters, your wives, and your houses. 
And it came to pass, when our enemies heard that it was known unto us, and God had brought their counsel to nought, that we returned all of us to the wall, every one unto his work. 
And it came to pass from that time forth, that the half of my servants wrought in the work, and the other half of them held both the spears, the shields, and the bows, and the habergeons; and the rulers were behind all the house of Judah. 
They which builded on the wall, and they that bare burdens, with those that laded, every one with one of his hands wrought in 
716,nterpretation; the words of the wise, and their dark sayings. 
The fear of the LORD is the beginning of knowledge: but fools despise wisdom and instruction. 
My son, hear the instruction of thy father, and forsake not the law of thy mother: 
For they shall be an ornament of grace unto thy head, and chains about thy neck. 
My son, if sinners entice thee, consent thou not. 
If they say, Come with us, let us lay wait for blood, let us lurk privily for the innocent without cause: 
Let us swallow them up alive as the grave; and whole, as those that go down into the pit: 
We shall find all precious substance, we shall fill our houses with spoil: 
Cast in thy lot among us; let us all have one purse: 
My son, walk 
785,as the high priest entereth into the holy place every year with blood of others; 
For then must he often have suffered since the foundation of the world: but now once in the end of the world hath he appeared to put away sin by the sacrifice of himself. 
And as it is appointed unto men once to die, but after this the judgment: 
So Christ was once offered to bear the sins of many; and unto them that look for him shall he appear the second time without sin unto salvation. 
For the law having a shadow of good things to come, and not the very image of the things, can never with those sacrifices which they offered year by year continually make the comers thereunto perfect. 
For then would they not have ceased to be offered? because that the worshippers once purged should have had 
652, For your sake I have sent to Babylon, and have brought down all their nobles, and the Chaldeans, whose cry is in the ships. 
I am the LORD, your Holy One, the creator of Israel, your King. 
Thus saith the LORD, which maketh a way in the sea, and a path in the mighty waters; 
Which bringeth forth the chariot and horse, the army and the power; they shall lie down together, they shall not rise: they are extinct, they are quenched as tow. 
Remember ye not the former things, neither consider the things of old. 
Behold, I will do a new thing; now it shall spring forth; shall ye not know it? I will even make a way in the wilderness, and rivers in the
735, with all thy soul. 
Thou hast avouched the LORD this day to be thy God, and to walk in his ways, and to keep his statutes, and his commandments, and his judgments, and to hearken unto his voice: 
And the LORD hath avouched thee this day to be his peculiar people, as he hath promised thee, and that thou shouldest keep all his commandments; 
And to make thee high above all nations which he hath made, in praise, and in name, and in honour; and that thou mayest be an holy people unto the LORD thy God, as he hath spoken. 
And Moses with the elders of Israel commanded the people, saying, Keep all the commandments which I command you this day. 
And it shall be on the day when ye shall pass over Jordan unto the land which the LORD t
563,purple, and of scarlet, and of fine linen. 
And all the women whose heart stirred them up in wisdom spun goats' hair. 
And the rulers brought onyx stones, and stones to be set, for the ephod, and for the breastplate; 
And spice, and oil for the light, and for the anointing oil, and for the sweet incense. 
The children of Israel brought a willing offering unto the LORD, every man and woman, whose heart made them willing to bring for all manner of work, which the LORD had commanded to be made by the hand of Moses. 
And Moses said unto the children of Israel, 
659,oses, and his people, saying, Where is he that brought them up out of the sea with the shepherd of his flock? where is he that put his holy Spirit within him? 
That led them by the right hand of Moses with his glorious arm, dividing the water before them, to make himself an everlasting name? 
That led them through the deep, as an horse in the wilderness, that they should not stumble? 
As a beast goeth down into the valley, the Spirit of the LORD caused him to rest: so didst thou lead thy people, to make thyself a glorious name. 
Look down from heaven, and behold from the habitation of thy holiness and of thy glory: where is thy zeal and thy strength, 
795, with us; there shall not an hoof be left behind; for thereof must we take to serve the LORD our God; and we know not with what we must serve the LORD, until we come thither. 
But the LORD hardened Pharaoh's heart, and he would not let them go. 
And Pharaoh said unto him, Get thee from me, take heed to thyself, see my face no more; for in that day thou seest my face thou shalt die. 
And Moses said, Thou hast spoken well, I will see thy face again no more. 
And the LORD said unto Moses, Yet will I bring one plague more upon Pharaoh, and upon Egypt; afterwards he will let you go hence: when he shall let you go, he shall surely thrust you out hence altogether. 
Speak now in the ears of the people, and let every man borrow of his neighbour, and every woman of her neighbour, jewels of silv
739,ooting up of the latter growth; and, lo, it was the latter growth after the king's mowings. 
And it came to pass, that when they had made an end of eating the grass of the land, then I said, O Lord GOD, forgive, I beseech thee: by whom shall Jacob arise? for he is small. 
The LORD repented for this: It shall not be, saith the LORD. 
Thus hath the Lord GOD shewed unto me: and, behold, the Lord GOD called to contend by fire, and it devoured the great deep, and did eat up a part. 
Then said I, O Lord GOD, cease, I beseech thee: by whom shall Jacob arise? for he is small. 
The LORD repented for this: This also shall not be, saith the Lord GOD. 
Thus he shewed me: and, behold, the LORD stood upon a wall made by a plumbline, with a plu
723,ng only, it is his raiment for his skin: wherein shall he sleep? and it shall come to pass, when he crieth unto me, that I will hear; for I am gracious. 
Thou shalt not revile the gods, nor curse the ruler of thy people. 
Thou shalt not delay to offer the first of thy ripe fruits, and of thy liquors: the firstborn of thy sons shalt thou give unto me. 
Likewise shalt thou do with thine oxen, and with thy sheep: seven days it shall be with his dam; on the eighth day thou shalt give it me. 
And ye shall be holy men unto me: neither shall ye eat any flesh that is torn of beasts in the field; ye shall cast it to the dogs. 
Thou shalt not raise a false report: put not thine hand with the wicked to be an unrighteous witn
790, they compassed me about together. 
Lover and friend hast thou put far from me, and mine acquaintance into darkness. 
I will sing of the mercies of the LORD for ever: with my mouth will I make known thy faithfulness to all generations. 
For I have said, Mercy shall be built up for ever: thy faithfulness shalt thou establish in the very heavens. 
I have made a covenant with my chosen, I have sworn unto David my servant, 
Thy seed will I establish for ever, and build up thy throne to all generations. Selah. 
And the heavens shall praise thy wonders, O LORD: thy faithfulness also in the congregation of the saints. 
For who in the heaven can be compared unto the LORD? who among the sons of the mighty can be likened unto the LORD? 
God is greatly to be feared in the assembly of the sa
778,deth in an even place: in the congregations will I bless the LORD. 
The LORD is my light and my salvation; whom shall I fear? the LORD is the strength of my life; of whom shall I be afraid? 
When the wicked, even mine enemies and my foes, came upon me to eat up my flesh, they stumbled and fell. 
Though an host should encamp against me, my heart shall not fear: though war should rise against me, in this will I be confident. 
One thing have I desired of the LORD, that will I seek after; that I may dwell in the house of the LORD all the days of my life, to behold the beauty of the LORD, and to enquire in his temple. 
For in the time of trouble he shall hide me in his pavilion: in the secret of his tabernacle shall he hide me; he shall set me up upon a rock. 
And now shal
604,tle of your father, and given them to me. 
And it came to pass at the time that the cattle conceived, that I lifted up mine eyes, and saw in a dream, and, behold, the rams which leaped upon the cattle were ringstraked, speckled, and grisled. 
And the angel of God spake unto me in a dream, saying, Jacob: And I said, Here am I. 
And he said, Lift up now thine eyes, and see, all the rams which leap upon the cattle are ringstraked, speckled, and grisled: for I have seen all that Laban doeth unto thee. 
I am the God of Bethel, where thou anointedst the pillar, and where thou vowedst a vow unto me: now 
779, the labour of the olive shall fail, and the fields shall yield no meat; the flock shall be cut off from the fold, and there shall be no herd in the stalls: 
Yet I will rejoice in the LORD, I will joy in the God of my salvation. 
The LORD God is my strength, and he will make my feet like hinds' feet, and he will make me to walk upon mine high places. To the chief singer on my stringed instruments. 
The word of the LORD which came unto Zephaniah the son of Cushi, the son of Gedaliah, the son of Amariah, the son of Hizkiah, in the days of Josiah the son of Amon, king of Judah. 
I will utterly consume all things from off the land, saith the LORD. 
I will consume man and beast; I will consume the fowls of the heaven, and the fishes of the sea, and the stumbling blocks with
730,ings unto thee, because thou hast gone a whoring after the heathen, and because thou art polluted with their idols. 
Thou hast walked in the way of thy sister; therefore will I give her cup into thine hand. 
Thus saith the Lord GOD; Thou shalt drink of thy sister's cup deep and large: thou shalt be laughed to scorn and had in derision; it containeth much. 
Thou shalt be filled with drunkenness and sorrow, with the cup of astonishment and desolation, with the cup of thy sister Samaria. 
Thou shalt even drink it and suck it out, and thou shalt break the sherds thereof, and pluck off thine own breasts: for I have spoken it, saith the Lord GOD. 
Therefore thus saith the Lord GOD; Because thou hast forgotten me, and cast me b
710, if thou knowest it all. 
Where is the way where light dwelleth? and as for darkness, where is the place thereof, 
That thou shouldest take it to the bound thereof, and that thou shouldest know the paths to the house thereof? 
Knowest thou it, because thou wast then born? or because the number of thy days is great? 
Hast thou entered into the treasures of the snow? or hast thou seen the treasures of the hail, 
Which I have reserved against the time of trouble, against the day of battle and war? 
By what way is the light parted, which scattereth the east wind upon the earth? 
Who hath divided a watercourse for the overflowing of waters, or a way for the lightning of thunder; 
To cause it to rain on the
643,ritten in the book of the chronicles, even until the days of Johanan the son of Eliashib. 
And the chief of the Levites: Hashabiah, Sherebiah, and Jeshua the son of Kadmiel, with their brethren over against them, to praise and to give thanks, according to the commandment of David the man of God, ward over against ward. 
Mattaniah, and Bakbukiah, Obadiah, Meshullam, Talmon, Akkub, were porters keeping the ward at the thresholds of the gates. 
These were in the days of Joiakim the son of Jeshua, the son of Jozadak, and in the days of Nehemiah the governor, and of Ezra the priest, the scribe. 
And at the dedication of the wall of Jerusale
797,t that I give thee. 
And when I looked, behold, an hand was sent unto me; and, lo, a roll of a book was therein; 
And he spread it before me; and it was written within and without: and there was written therein lamentations, and mourning, and woe. 
Moreover he said unto me, Son of man, eat that thou findest; eat this roll, and go speak unto the house of Israel. 
So I opened my mouth, and he caused me to eat that roll. 
And he said unto me, Son of man, cause thy belly to eat, and fill thy bowels with this roll that I give thee. Then did I eat it; and it was in my mouth as honey for sweetness. 
And he said unto me, Son of man, go, get thee unto the house of Israel, and speak with my words unto them. 
For thou art not sent to a people of a strange speech and of an hard language, but to the
654,e words, he went forth with his disciples over the brook Cedron, where was a garden, into the which he entered, and his disciples. 
And Judas also, which betrayed him, knew the place: for Jesus ofttimes resorted thither with his disciples. 
Judas then, having received a band of men and officers from the chief priests and Pharisees, cometh thither with lanterns and torches and weapons. 
Jesus therefore, knowing all things that should come upon him, went forth, and said unto them, Whom seek ye? 
They answered him, Jesus of Nazareth. Jesus saith unto them, I am he. And Judas also, which betrayed him, stood with them. 
As soon then as he had said unt
636, they poured out a prayer when thy chastening was upon them. 
Like as a woman with child, that draweth near the time of her delivery, is in pain, and crieth out in her pangs; so have we been in thy sight, O LORD. 
We have been with child, we have been in pain, we have as it were brought forth wind; we have not wrought any deliverance in the earth; neither have the inhabitants of the world fallen. 
Thy dead men shall live, together with my dead body shall they arise. Awake and sing, ye that dwell in dust: for thy dew is as the dew of herbs, and the earth shall cast out the dead. 
Come, my people, enter thou into thy chambers, and
716,
Then Simon Peter answered him, Lord, to whom shall we go? thou hast the words of eternal life. 
And we believe and are sure that thou art that Christ, the Son of the living God. 
Jesus answered them, Have not I chosen you twelve, and one of you is a devil? 
He spake of Judas Iscariot the son of Simon: for he it was that should betray him, being one of the twelve. 
After these things Jesus walked in Galilee: for he would not walk in Jewry, because the Jews sought to kill him. 
Now the Jew's feast of tabernacles was at hand. 
His brethren therefore said unto him, Depart hence, and go into Judaea, that thy disciples also may see the works that thou doest. 
For there is no man that doeth any thing in secret, a
608, well. 
So king Rehoboam strengthened himself in Jerusalem, and reigned: for Rehoboam was one and forty years old when he began to reign, and he reigned seventeen years in Jerusalem, the city which the LORD had chosen out of all the tribes of Israel, to put his name there. And his mother's name was Naamah an Ammonitess. 
And he did evil, because he prepared not his heart to seek the LORD. 
Now the acts of Rehoboam, first and last, are they not written in the book of Shemaiah the prophet, and of Iddo the seer concerning genealogies? And there were wars between Rehoboam and Jeroboam continually. 
And Re
836,d herb for the service of man: that he may bring forth food out of the earth; 
And wine that maketh glad the heart of man, and oil to make his face to shine, and bread which strengtheneth man's heart. 
The trees of the LORD are full of sap; the cedars of Lebanon, which he hath planted; 
Where the birds make their nests: as for the stork, the fir trees are her house. 
The high hills are a refuge for the wild goats; and the rocks for the conies. 
He appointed the moon for seasons: the sun knoweth his going down. 
Thou makest darkness, and it is night: wherein all the beasts of the forest do creep forth. 
The young lions roar after their prey, and seek their meat from God. 
The sun ariseth, they gather themselves together, and lay them down in their dens. 
Man goeth forth unto his work and to his labour until the evening. 
O LO
586,not for him, and in an hour that he is not aware of, 
And shall cut him asunder, and appoint him his portion with the hypocrites: there shall be weeping and gnashing of teeth. 
Then shall the kingdom of heaven be likened unto ten virgins, which took their lamps, and went forth to meet the bridegroom. 
And five of them were wise, and five were foolish. 
They that were foolish took their lamps, and took no oil with them: 
But the wise took oil in their vessels with their lamps. 
While the bridegroom tarried, they all slumbered and slept. 
And at midnight there was a cry made, Behol
789,of uprightness. 
Quicken me, O LORD, for thy name's sake: for thy righteousness' sake bring my soul out of trouble. 
And of thy mercy cut off mine enemies, and destroy all them that afflict my soul: for I am thy servant. 
Blessed be the LORD my strength which teacheth my hands to war, and my fingers to fight: 
My goodness, and my fortress; my high tower, and my deliverer; my shield, and he in whom I trust; who subdueth my people under me. 
LORD, what is man, that thou takest knowledge of him! or the son of man, that thou makest account of him! 
Man is like to vanity: his days are as a shadow that passeth away. 
Bow thy heavens, O LORD, and come down: touch the mountains, and they shall smoke. 
Cast forth lightning, and scatter them: shoot out thine arrows, and destroy them. 
Sen
594,: 
And he said, When ye do the office of a midwife to the Hebrew women, and see them upon the stools; if it be a son, then ye shall kill him: but if it be a daughter, then she shall live. 
But the midwives feared God, and did not as the king of Egypt commanded them, but saved the men children alive. 
And the king of Egypt called for the midwives, and said unto them, Why have ye done this thing, and have saved the men children alive? 
And the midwives said unto Pharaoh, Because the Hebrew women are not as the Egyptian women; for they are lively, and are delivered ere the midwives come in 
657,ay of the preparation, the chief priests and Pharisees came together unto Pilate, 
Saying, Sir, we remember that that deceiver said, while he was yet alive, After three days I will rise again. 
Command therefore that the sepulchre be made sure until the third day, lest his disciples come by night, and steal him away, and say unto the people, He is risen from the dead: so the last error shall be worse than the first. 
Pilate said unto them, Ye have a watch: go your way, make it as sure as ye can. 
So they went, and made the sepulchre sure, sealing the stone, and setting a watch. 
In the end of the sabbath, as it began to dawn toward the first day of 
636,eased, I have done these things unto thee. 
Therefore all they that devour thee shall be devoured; and all thine adversaries, every one of them, shall go into captivity; and they that spoil thee shall be a spoil, and all that prey upon thee will I give for a prey. 
For I will restore health unto thee, and I will heal thee of thy wounds, saith the LORD; because they called thee an Outcast, saying, This is Zion, whom no man seeketh after. 
Thus saith the LORD; Behold, I will bring again the captivity of Jacob's tents, and have mercy on his dwellingplaces; and the city shall be builded upon her own heap, and the palace shall remain
579,ithfulness; for the LORD delivered thee into my hand to day, but I would not stretch forth mine hand against the LORD's anointed. 
And, behold, as thy life was much set by this day in mine eyes, so let my life be much set by in the eyes of the LORD, and let him deliver me out of all tribulation. 
Then Saul said to David, Blessed be thou, my son David: thou shalt both do great things, and also shalt still prevail. So David went on his way, and Saul returned to his place. 
And David said in his heart, I shall now perish one day by the hand of Saul: there is nothing better fo
748,y years. 
And the children of Israel did evil in the sight of the LORD: and the LORD delivered them into the hand of Midian seven years. 
And the hand of Midian prevailed against Israel: and because of the Midianites the children of Israel made them the dens which are in the mountains, and caves, and strong holds. 
And so it was, when Israel had sown, that the Midianites came up, and the Amalekites, and the children of the east, even they came up against them; 
And they encamped against them, and destroyed the increase of the earth, till thou come unto Gaza, and left no sustenance for Israel, neither sheep, nor ox, nor ass. 
For they came up with their cattle and their tents, and they came as grasshoppers for multitude; for both they and 
744,e the gate. 
And they said unto her, Thou art mad. But she constantly affirmed that it was even so. Then said they, It is his angel. 
But Peter continued knocking: and when they had opened the door, and saw him, they were astonished. 
But he, beckoning unto them with the hand to hold their peace, declared unto them how the Lord had brought him out of the prison. And he said, Go shew these things unto James, and to the brethren. And he departed, and went into another place. 
Now as soon as it was day, there was no small stir among the soldiers, what was become of Peter. 
And when Herod had sought for him, and found him not, he examined the keepers, and commanded that they should be put to death. And he went down from Judaea to Caesarea
760,commanded, and they brought Daniel, and cast him into the den of lions. Now the king spake and said unto Daniel, Thy God whom thou servest continually, he will deliver thee. 
And a stone was brought, and laid upon the mouth of the den; and the king sealed it with his own signet, and with the signet of his lords; that the purpose might not be changed concerning Daniel. 
Then the king went to his palace, and passed the night fasting: neither were instruments of musick brought before him: and his sleep went from him. 
Then the king arose very early in the morning, and went in haste unto the den of lions. 
And when he came to the den, he cried with a lamentable voice unto Daniel: and the king spake and said to Daniel, O Daniel, servant of the living God,
766, the abundance of her delicacies. 
And I heard another voice from heaven, saying, Come out of her, my people, that ye be not partakers of her sins, and that ye receive not of her plagues. 
For her sins have reached unto heaven, and God hath remembered her iniquities. 
Reward her even as she rewarded you, and double unto her double according to her works: in the cup which she hath filled fill to her double. 
How much she hath glorified herself, and lived deliciously, so much torment and sorrow give her: for she saith in her heart, I sit a queen, and am no widow, and shall see no sorrow. 
Therefore shall her plagues come in one day, death, and mourning, and famine; and she shall be utterly burned with fire: for strong is the Lord God who judgeth her. 
And th
820, offerings, and called upon the LORD; and he answered him from heaven by fire upon the altar of burnt offering. 
And the LORD commanded the angel; and he put up his sword again into the sheath thereof. 
At that time when David saw that the LORD had answered him in the threshingfloor of Ornan the Jebusite, then he sacrificed there. 
For the tabernacle of the LORD, which Moses made in the wilderness, and the altar of the burnt offering, were at that season in the high place at Gibeon. 
But David could not go before it to enquire of God: for he was afraid because of the sword of the angel of the LORD. 
Then David said, This is the house of the LORD God, and this is the altar of the burnt offering for Israel. 
And David commanded to gather together the strangers that were in the land of Israel; and he set masons 
730,e be blessed. 
Cursed be the man who brought tidings to my father, saying, A man child is born unto thee; making him very glad. 
And let that man be as the cities which the LORD overthrew, and repented not: and let him hear the cry in the morning, and the shouting at noontide; 
Because he slew me not from the womb; or that my mother might have been my grave, and her womb to be always great with me. 
Wherefore came I forth out of the womb to see labour and sorrow, that my days should be consumed with shame? 
The word which came unto Jeremiah from the LORD, when king Zedekiah sent unto him Pashur the son of Melchiah, and Zephaniah the son of Maaseiah the priest, saying, 
Enquire, I pray thee, of the LORD for us; for Nebuch
691,r I will defend this city to save it for mine own sake, and for my servant David's sake. 
Then the angel of the LORD went forth, and smote in the camp of the Assyrians a hundred and fourscore and five thousand: and when they arose early in the morning, behold, they were all dead corpses. 
So Sennacherib king of Assyria departed, and went and returned, and dwelt at Nineveh. 
And it came to pass, as he was worshipping in the house of Nisroch his god, that Adrammelech and Sharezer his sons smote him with the sword; and they escaped into the land of Armenia: and Esarhaddon his son reigned in his stead. 
In those days was Hezekiah sick unto death. And Isaiah the prophet the son of Amoz c
819, God. 
I will get me unto the great men, and will speak unto them; for they have known the way of the LORD, and the judgment of their God: but these have altogether broken the yoke, and burst the bonds. 
Wherefore a lion out of the forest shall slay them, and a wolf of the evenings shall spoil them, a leopard shall watch over their cities: every one that goeth out thence shall be torn in pieces: because their transgressions are many, and their backslidings are increased. 
How shall I pardon thee for this? thy children have forsaken me, and sworn by them that are no gods: when I had fed them to the full, they then committed adultery, and assembled themselves by troops in the harlots' houses. 
They were as fed horses in the morning: every one neighed after his neighbour's wife. 
Shall I not visit for these thi
703,n fire: for it is a people of no understanding: therefore he that made them will not have mercy on them, and he that formed them will shew them no favour. 
And it shall come to pass in that day, that the LORD shall beat off from the channel of the river unto the stream of Egypt, and ye shall be gathered one by one, O ye children of Israel. 
And it shall come to pass in that day, that the great trumpet shall be blown, and they shall come which were ready to perish in the land of Assyria, and the outcasts in the land of Egypt, and shall worship the LORD in the holy mount at Jerusalem. 
Woe to the crown of pride, to the drunkards of Ephraim, whose glorious beauty is a fading flower, which are on t
583,ey bought: and Joseph brought the money into Pharaoh's house. 
And when money failed in the land of Egypt, and in the land of Canaan, all the Egyptians came unto Joseph, and said, Give us bread: for why should we die in thy presence? for the money faileth. 
And Joseph said, Give your cattle; and I will give you for your cattle, if money fail. 
And they brought their cattle unto Joseph: and Joseph gave them bread in exchange for horses, and for the flocks, and for the cattle of the herds, and for the asses: and he fed them with bread for all their cattle for that year. 
When th
672,it out of his mouth: and when he arose against me, I caught him by his beard, and smote him, and slew him. 
Thy servant slew both the lion and the bear: and this uncircumcised Philistine shall be as one of them, seeing he hath defied the armies of the living God. 
David said moreover, The LORD that delivered me out of the paw of the lion, and out of the paw of the bear, he will deliver me out of the hand of this Philistine. And Saul said unto David, Go, and the LORD be with thee. 
And Saul armed David with his armour, and he put an helmet of brass upon his head; also he armed him with a coat of mail. 
And David girded his sword upon his armour, and he assayed to g
603,not for kings to drink wine; nor for princes strong drink: 
Lest they drink, and forget the law, and pervert the judgment of any of the afflicted. 
Give strong drink unto him that is ready to perish, and wine unto those that be of heavy hearts. 
Let him drink, and forget his poverty, and remember his misery no more. 
Open thy mouth for the dumb in the cause of all such as are appointed to destruction. 
Open thy mouth, judge righteously, and plead the cause of the poor and needy. 
Who can find a virtuous woman? for her price is far above rubies. 
The heart of her husband doth safely trust in her, 
674, up in prison, having received authority from the chief priests; and when they were put to death, I gave my voice against them. 
And I punished them oft in every synagogue, and compelled them to blaspheme; and being exceedingly mad against them, I persecuted them even unto strange cities. 
Whereupon as I went to Damascus with authority and commission from the chief priests, 
At midday, O king, I saw in the way a light from heaven, above the brightness of the sun, shining round about me and them which journeyed with me. 
And when we were all fallen to the earth, I heard a voice speaking unto me, and saying in the Hebrew tongue, Saul, Saul, why persecutest thou me? it
800,f we observe to do all these commandments before the LORD our God, as he hath commanded us. 
When the LORD thy God shall bring thee into the land whither thou goest to possess it, and hath cast out many nations before thee, the Hittites, and the Girgashites, and the Amorites, and the Canaanites, and the Perizzites, and the Hivites, and the Jebusites, seven nations greater and mightier than thou; 
And when the LORD thy God shall deliver them before thee; thou shalt smite them, and utterly destroy them; thou shalt make no covenant with them, nor shew mercy unto them: 
Neither shalt thou make marriages with them; thy daughter thou shalt not give unto his son, nor his daughter shalt thou take unto thy son. 
For they will turn away thy son from following me, that they may serve other gods: so w
684,er, and their labour unto the locust. 
He destroyed their vines with hail, and their sycomore trees with frost. 
He gave up their cattle also to the hail, and their flocks to hot thunderbolts. 
He cast upon them the fierceness of his anger, wrath, and indignation, and trouble, by sending evil angels among them. 
He made a way to his anger; he spared not their soul from death, but gave their life over to the pestilence; 
And smote all the firstborn in Egypt; the chief of their strength in the tabernacles of Ham: 
But made his own people to go forth like sheep, and guided them in the wilderness like a flock. 
And he led them on safely, so that they feared not: but the sea overw
730,ace of the world with cities. 
For I will rise up against them, saith the LORD of hosts, and cut off from Babylon the name, and remnant, and son, and nephew, saith the LORD. 
I will also make it a possession for the bittern, and pools of water: and I will sweep it with the besom of destruction, saith the LORD of hosts. 
The LORD of hosts hath sworn, saying, Surely as I have thought, so shall it come to pass; and as I have purposed, so shall it stand: 
That I will break the Assyrian in my land, and upon my mountains tread him under foot: then shall his yoke depart from off them, and his burden depart from off their shoulders. 
This is the purpose that is purposed upon the whole earth: and this is the hand that is stretche
692,e unto thee yet the instruments of a foolish shepherd. 
For, lo, I will raise up a shepherd in the land, which shall not visit those that be cut off, neither shall seek the young one, nor heal that that is broken, nor feed that that standeth still: but he shall eat the flesh of the fat, and tear their claws in pieces. 
Woe to the idol shepherd that leaveth the flock! the sword shall be upon his arm, and upon his right eye: his arm shall be clean dried up, and his right eye shall be utterly darkened. 
The burden of the word of the LORD for Israel, saith the LORD, which stretcheth forth the heavens, and layeth the foundation of the earth, and formeth the spirit of man within him. 
Beho
772,at the sea may be calm unto us? for the sea wrought, and was tempestuous. 
And he said unto them, Take me up, and cast me forth into the sea; so shall the sea be calm unto you: for I know that for my sake this great tempest is upon you. 
Nevertheless the men rowed hard to bring it to the land; but they could not: for the sea wrought, and was tempestuous against them. 
Wherefore they cried unto the LORD, and said, We beseech thee, O LORD, we beseech thee, let us not perish for this man's life, and lay not upon us innocent blood: for thou, O LORD, hast done as it pleased thee. 
So they look up Jonah, and cast him forth into the sea: and the sea ceased from her raging. 
Then the men feared the LORD exceedingly, and offered a sacrifice unto the LORD, and made vows. 
586,And the consecrated things were six hundred oxen and three thousand sheep. 
But the priests were too few, so that they could not flay all the burnt offerings: wherefore their brethren the Levites did help them, till the work was ended, and until the other priests had sanctified themselves: for the Levites were more upright in heart to sanctify themselves than the priests. 
And also the burnt offerings were in abundance, with the fat of the peace offerings, and the drink offerings for every burnt offering. So the service of the house of the LORD was set in order. 
And Hezekiah rej
733, this day, that it may go well with thee, and with thy children after thee, and that thou mayest prolong thy days upon the earth, which the LORD thy God giveth thee, for ever. 
Then Moses severed three cities on this side Jordan toward the sunrising; 
That the slayer might flee thither, which should kill his neighbour unawares, and hated him not in times past; and that fleeing unto one of these cities he might live: 
Namely, Bezer in the wilderness, in the plain country, of the Reubenites; and Ramoth in Gilead, of the Gadites; and Golan in Bashan, of the Manassites. 
And this is the law which Moses set before the children of Israel: 
These are the testimonies, and the statutes, and the judgments, which Moses spake unto the 
717,me; yea, woe is unto me, if I preach not the gospel! 
For if I do this thing willingly, I have a reward: but if against my will, a dispensation of the gospel is committed unto me. 
What is my reward then? Verily that, when I preach the gospel, I may make the gospel of Christ without charge, that I abuse not my power in the gospel. 
For though I be free from all men, yet have I made myself servant unto all, that I might gain the more. 
And unto the Jews I became as a Jew, that I might gain the Jews; to them that are under the law, as under the law, that I might gain them that are under the law; 
To them that are without law, as without law, (being not without law to God, but under the law to Christ,) that I m
744,o break the door. 
But the men put forth their hand, and pulled Lot into the house to them, and shut to the door. 
And they smote the men that were at the door of the house with blindness, both small and great: so that they wearied themselves to find the door. 
And the men said unto Lot, Hast thou here any besides? son in law, and thy sons, and thy daughters, and whatsoever thou hast in the city, bring them out of this place: 
For we will destroy this place, because the cry of them is waxen great before the face of the LORD; and the LORD hath sent us to destroy it. 
And Lot went out, and spake unto his sons in law, which married his daughters, and said, Up, get you out of this place; for the LORD will destroy this city. But he seemed 
790,d is manifest in them; for God hath shewed it unto them. 
For the invisible things of him from the creation of the world are clearly seen, being understood by the things that are made, even his eternal power and Godhead; so that they are without excuse: 
Because that, when they knew God, they glorified him not as God, neither were thankful; but became vain in their imaginations, and their foolish heart was darkened. 
Professing themselves to be wise, they became fools, 
And changed the glory of the uncorruptible God into an image made like to corruptible man, and to birds, and fourfooted beasts, and creeping things. 
Wherefore God also gave them up to uncleanness through the lusts of their own hearts, to dishonour their own bodies between themselves: 
Who changed the truth of God
588,ne might enter into the king's gate clothed with sackcloth. 
And in every province, whithersoever the king's commandment and his decree came, there was great mourning among the Jews, and fasting, and weeping, and wailing; and many lay in sackcloth and ashes. 
So Esther's maids and her chamberlains came and told it her. Then was the queen exceedingly grieved; and she sent raiment to clothe Mordecai, and to take away his sackcloth from him: but he received it not. 
Then called Esther for Hatach, one of the king's chamberlains, whom he had appointed to attend upon her, and gave him a 
660,ich he made with our fathers, when he brought them out of the land of Egypt. 
And Solomon stood before the altar of the LORD in the presence of all the congregation of Israel, and spread forth his hands toward heaven: 
And he said, LORD God of Israel, there is no God like thee, in heaven above, or on earth beneath, who keepest covenant and mercy with thy servants that walk before thee with all their heart: 
Who hast kept with thy servant David my father that thou promisedst him: thou spakest also with thy mouth, and hast fulfilled it with thine hand, as it is this day. 
Therefore now, LORD God of Israel, keep with thy servant David my father that thou 
787, waterspouts: all thy waves and thy billows are gone over me. 
Yet the LORD will command his lovingkindness in the day time, and in the night his song shall be with me, and my prayer unto the God of my life. 
I will say unto God my rock, Why hast thou forgotten me? why go I mourning because of the oppression of the enemy? 
As with a sword in my bones, mine enemies reproach me; while they say daily unto me, Where is thy God? 
Why art thou cast down, O my soul? and why art thou disquieted within me? hope thou in God: for I shall yet praise him, who is the health of my countenance, and my God. 
Judge me, O God, and plead my cause against an ungodly nation: O deliver me from the deceitful and unjust man. 
For thou art the God of my strength: why dost thou cast me off? why go I mou
828,ays, and hatred in the house of his God. 
They have deeply corrupted themselves, as in the days of Gibeah: therefore he will remember their iniquity, he will visit their sins. 
I found Israel like grapes in the wilderness; I saw your fathers as the firstripe in the fig tree at her first time: but they went to Baalpeor, and separated themselves unto that shame; and their abominations were according as they loved. 
As for Ephraim, their glory shall fly away like a bird, from the birth, and from the womb, and from the conception. 
Though they bring up their children, yet will I bereave them, that there shall not be a man left: yea, woe also to them when I depart from them! 
Ephraim, as I saw Tyrus, is planted in a pleasant place: but Ephraim shall bring forth his children to the murderer. 
Give them, O LORD: what wilt t
637,and have not rather mourned, that he that hath done this deed might be taken away from among you. 
For I verily, as absent in body, but present in spirit, have judged already, as though I were present, concerning him that hath so done this deed, 
In the name of our Lord Jesus Christ, when ye are gathered together, and my spirit, with the power of our Lord Jesus Christ, 
To deliver such an one unto Satan for the destruction of the flesh, that the spirit may be saved in the day of the Lord Jesus. 
Your glorying is not good. Know ye not that a little leaven leaveneth the whole lump? 
Purge out therefore the old leaven, that ye may b
813, with a despiteful heart, to destroy it for the old hatred; 
Therefore thus saith the Lord GOD; Behold, I will stretch out mine hand upon the Philistines, and I will cut off the Cherethims, and destroy the remnant of the sea coast. 
And I will execute great vengeance upon them with furious rebukes; and they shall know that I am the LORD, when I shall lay my vengeance upon them. 
And it came to pass in the eleventh year, in the first day of the month, that the word of the LORD came unto me, saying, 
Son of man, because that Tyrus hath said against Jerusalem, Aha, she is broken that was the gates of the people: she is turned unto me: I shall be replenished, now she is laid waste: 
Therefore thus saith the Lord GOD; Behold, I am against thee, O Tyrus, and will cause many nations to come up against thee, a
818,, And what shall we do? And he said unto them, Do violence to no man, neither accuse any falsely; and be content with your wages. 
And as the people were in expectation, and all men mused in their hearts of John, whether he were the Christ, or not; 
John answered, saying unto them all, I indeed baptize you with water; but one mightier than I cometh, the latchet of whose shoes I am not worthy to unloose: he shall baptize you with the Holy Ghost and with fire: 
Whose fan is in his hand, and he will throughly purge his floor, and will gather the wheat into his garner; but the chaff he will burn with fire unquenchable. 
And many other things in his exhortation preached he unto the people. 
But Herod the tetrarch, being reproved by him for Herodias his brother Philip's wife, and for all the evils which Herod had
821,eard these things, having more perfect knowledge of that way, he deferred them, and said, When Lysias the chief captain shall come down, I will know the uttermost of your matter. 
And he commanded a centurion to keep Paul, and to let him have liberty, and that he should forbid none of his acquaintance to minister or come unto him. 
And after certain days, when Felix came with his wife Drusilla, which was a Jewess, he sent for Paul, and heard him concerning the faith in Christ. 
And as he reasoned of righteousness, temperance, and judgment to come, Felix trembled, and answered, Go thy way for this time; when I have a convenient season, I will call for thee. 
He hoped also that money should have been given him of Paul, that he might loose him: wherefore he sent for him the oftener, and communed with him. 
But af
810, the tribe of Ephraim, and out of the tribe of Dan, and out of the half tribe of Manasseh, ten cities. 
And the children of Gershon had by lot out of the families of the tribe of Issachar, and out of the tribe of Asher, and out of the tribe of Naphtali, and out of the half tribe of Manasseh in Bashan, thirteen cities. 
The children of Merari by their families had out of the tribe of Reuben, and out of the tribe of Gad, and out of the tribe of Zebulun, twelve cities. 
And the children of Israel gave by lot unto the Levites these cities with their suburbs, as the LORD commanded by the hand of Moses. 
And they gave out of the tribe of the children of Judah, and out of the tribe of the children of Simeon, these cities which are here mentioned by name. 
Which the children of Aaron, being of the families 
746, thou helped him that is without power? how savest thou the arm that hath no strength? 
How hast thou counselled him that hath no wisdom? and how hast thou plentifully declared the thing as it is? 
To whom hast thou uttered words? and whose spirit came from thee? 
Dead things are formed from under the waters, and the inhabitants thereof. 
Hell is naked before him, and destruction hath no covering. 
He stretcheth out the north over the empty place, and hangeth the earth upon nothing. 
He bindeth up the waters in his thick clouds; and the cloud is not rent under them. 
He holdeth back the face of his throne, and spreadeth his cloud upon it. 
He hath compassed the waters with bounds, until the day and night come to an end. 
The pillars of 
689,re past, my purposes are broken off, even the thoughts of my heart. 
They change the night into day: the light is short because of darkness. 
If I wait, the grave is mine house: I have made my bed in the darkness. 
I have said to corruption, Thou art my father: to the worm, Thou art my mother, and my sister. 
And where is now my hope? as for my hope, who shall see it? 
They shall go down to the bars of the pit, when our rest together is in the dust. 
Then answered Bildad the Shuhite, and said, 
How long will it be ere ye make an end of words? mark, and afterwards we will speak. 
Wherefore are we counted as beasts, and reputed vile in your sight? 
He teareth himself in his anger: s
599, from the river of Egypt unto the great river, the river Euphrates: 
The Kenites, and the Kenizzites, and the Kadmonites, 
And the Hittites, and the Perizzites, and the Rephaims, 
And the Amorites, and the Canaanites, and the Girgashites, and the Jebusites. 
Now Sarai Abram's wife bare him no children: and she had an handmaid, an Egyptian, whose name was Hagar. 
And Sarai said unto Abram, Behold now, the LORD hath restrained me from bearing: I pray thee, go in unto my maid; it may be that I may obtain children by her. And Abram hearkened to the voice of Sarai. 
And Sarai Abram's wife took Hag
620,ve ye suffered so many things in vain? if it be yet in vain. 
He therefore that ministereth to you the Spirit, and worketh miracles among you, doeth he it by the works of the law, or by the hearing of faith? 
Even as Abraham believed God, and it was accounted to him for righteousness. 
Know ye therefore that they which are of faith, the same are the children of Abraham. 
And the scripture, foreseeing that God would justify the heathen through faith, preached before the gospel unto Abraham, saying, In thee shall all nations be blessed. 
So then they which be of faith are blessed with faithful Abraham. 
For as many
608,l be done. 
Neither shall he regard the God of his fathers, nor the desire of women, nor regard any god: for he shall magnify himself above all. 
But in his estate shall he honour the God of forces: and a god whom his fathers knew not shall he honour with gold, and silver, and with precious stones, and pleasant things. 
Thus shall he do in the most strong holds with a strange god, whom he shall acknowledge and increase with glory: and he shall cause them to rule over many, and shall divide the land for gain. 
And at the time of the end shall the king of the south push at him: and the king of the north
729,id, To morrow is a feast to the LORD. 
And they rose up early on the morrow, and offered burnt offerings, and brought peace offerings; and the people sat down to eat and to drink, and rose up to play. 
And the LORD said unto Moses, Go, get thee down; for thy people, which thou broughtest out of the land of Egypt, have corrupted themselves: 
They have turned aside quickly out of the way which I commanded them: they have made them a molten calf, and have worshipped it, and have sacrificed thereunto, and said, These be thy gods, O Israel, which have brought thee up out of the land of Egypt. 
And the LORD said unto Moses, I have seen this people, and, behold, it is a stiffnecked people: 
Now therefore let me alone, that my 
774,only. 
And some of them were men of Cyprus and Cyrene, which, when they were come to Antioch, spake unto the Grecians, preaching the LORD Jesus. 
And the hand of the Lord was with them: and a great number believed, and turned unto the Lord. 
Then tidings of these things came unto the ears of the church which was in Jerusalem: and they sent forth Barnabas, that he should go as far as Antioch. 
Who, when he came, and had seen the grace of God, was glad, and exhorted them all, that with purpose of heart they would cleave unto the Lord. 
For he was a good man, and full of the Holy Ghost and of faith: and much people was added unto the Lord. 
Then departed Barnabas to Tarsus, for to seek Saul: 
And when he had found him, he brought him unto Antioch. And it came to pass
615,rd: and I will pour down the stones thereof into the valley, and I will discover the foundations thereof. 
And all the graven images thereof shall be beaten to pieces, and all the hires thereof shall be burned with the fire, and all the idols thereof will I lay desolate: for she gathered it of the hire of an harlot, and they shall return to the hire of an harlot. 
Therefore I will wail and howl, I will go stripped and naked: I will make a wailing like the dragons, and mourning as the owls. 
For her wound is incurable; for it is come unto Judah; he is come unto the gate of my people, even to Jerusalem. 
Decla
774,the residue of Israel in thy pouring out of thy fury upon Jerusalem? 
Then said he unto me, The iniquity of the house of Israel and Judah is exceeding great, and the land is full of blood, and the city full of perverseness: for they say, The LORD hath forsaken the earth, and the LORD seeth not. 
And as for me also, mine eye shall not spare, neither will I have pity, but I will recompense their way upon their head. 
And, behold, the man clothed with linen, which had the inkhorn by his side, reported the matter, saying, I have done as thou hast commanded me. 
Then I looked, and, behold, in the firmament that was above the head of the cherubims there appeared over them as it were a sapphire stone, as the appearance of the likeness of a throne. 
And he spake unto the 
806,t we saw in it are men of a great stature. 
And there we saw the giants, the sons of Anak, which come of the giants: and we were in our own sight as grasshoppers, and so we were in their sight. 
And all the congregation lifted up their voice, and cried; and the people wept that night. 
And all the children of Israel murmured against Moses and against Aaron: and the whole congregation said unto them, Would God that we had died in the land of Egypt! or would God we had died in this wilderness! 
And wherefore hath the LORD brought us unto this land, to fall by the sword, that our wives and our children should be a prey? were it not better for us to return into Egypt? 
And they said one to another, Let us make a captain, and let us return into Egypt. 
Then Moses and Aaron fell on their faces before 
832,of them that see shall not be dim, and the ears of them that hear shall hearken. 
The heart also of the rash shall understand knowledge, and the tongue of the stammerers shall be ready to speak plainly. 
The vile person shall be no more called liberal, nor the churl said to be bountiful. 
For the vile person will speak villany, and his heart will work iniquity, to practise hypocrisy, and to utter error against the LORD, to make empty the soul of the hungry, and he will cause the drink of the thirsty to fail. 
The instruments also of the churl are evil: he deviseth wicked devices to destroy the poor with lying words, even when the needy speaketh right. 
But the liberal deviseth liberal things; and by liberal things shall he stand. 
Rise up, ye women that are at ease; hear my voice, ye careless daughters; give ear unto my 
828,and consider to whom thou hast done this. Shall the women eat their fruit, and children of a span long? shall the priest and the prophet be slain in the sanctuary of the Lord? 
The young and the old lie on the ground in the streets: my virgins and my young men are fallen by the sword; thou hast slain them in the day of thine anger; thou hast killed, and not pitied. 
Thou hast called as in a solemn day my terrors round about, so that in the day of the LORD's anger none escaped nor remained: those that I have swaddled and brought up hath mine enemy consumed. 
I AM the man that hath seen affliction by the rod of his wrath. 
He hath led me, and brought me into darkness, but not into light. 
Surely against me is he turned; he turneth his hand against me all the day. 
My flesh and my skin hath he made old; he hath broken m
604,nd suddenly, when they had looked round about, they saw no man any more, save Jesus only with themselves. 
And as they came down from the mountain, he charged them that they should tell no man what things they had seen, till the Son of man were risen from the dead. 
And they kept that saying with themselves, questioning one with another what the rising from the dead should mean. 
And they asked him, saying, Why say the scribes that Elias must first come? 
And he answered and told them, Elias verily cometh first, and restoreth all things; and how it is written of the Son of man, that he must suffer
584,nd make a wall, that she shall not find her paths. 
And she shall follow after her lovers, but she shall not overtake them; and she shall seek them, but shall not find them: then shall she say, I will go and return to my first husband; for then was it better with me than now. 
For she did not know that I gave her corn, and wine, and oil, and multiplied her silver and gold, which they prepared for Baal. 
Therefore will I return, and take away my corn in the time thereof, and my wine in the season thereof, and will recover my wool and my flax given to cover her nakedness. 
And no
795,ts. 
Give them according to their deeds, and according to the wickedness of their endeavours: give them after the work of their hands; render to them their desert. 
Because they regard not the works of the LORD, nor the operation of his hands, he shall destroy them, and not build them up. 
Blessed be the LORD, because he hath heard the voice of my supplications. 
The LORD is my strength and my shield; my heart trusted in him, and I am helped: therefore my heart greatly rejoiceth; and with my song will I praise him. 
The LORD is their strength, and he is the saving strength of his anointed. 
Save thy people, and bless thine inheritance: feed them also, and lift them up for ever. 
Give unto the LORD, O ye mighty, give unto the LORD glory and strength. 
Give unto the LORD the glory due u
663,eet of it, and on either side of the river, was there the tree of life, which bare twelve manner of fruits, and yielded her fruit every month: and the leaves of the tree were for the healing of the nations. 
And there shall be no more curse: but the throne of God and of the Lamb shall be in it; and his servants shall serve him: 
And they shall see his face; and his name shall be in their foreheads. 
And there shall be no night there; and they need no candle, neither light of the sun; for the Lord God giveth them light: and they shall reign for ever and ever. 
And he said unto me, These sayings are faithful and true: and the Lord God of the holy prophets s
735,nd the Amalekites and all the children of the east lay along in the valley like grasshoppers for multitude; and their camels were without number, as the sand by the sea side for multitude. 
And when Gideon was come, behold, there was a man that told a dream unto his fellow, and said, Behold, I dreamed a dream, and, lo, a cake of barley bread tumbled into the host of Midian, and came unto a tent, and smote it that it fell, and overturned it, that the tent lay along. 
And his fellow answered and said, This is nothing else save the sword of Gideon the son of Joash, a man of Israel: for into his hand hath God delivered Midian, and all the host. 
And it was so, when Gideon heard the telling of the dream, and the interpretation the
632, trespass offering, unto the priest: and the priest shall make an atonement for him concerning his ignorance wherein he erred and wist it not, and it shall be forgiven him. 
It is a trespass offering: he hath certainly trespassed against the LORD. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses, saying, 
If a soul sin, and commit a trespass against the LORD, and lie unto his neighbour in that which was delivered him to keep, or in fellowship, or in a thing taken away by violence, or hath deceived his neighbour; 
Or have found that which was lost, and lieth concerning it, and sweareth falsely; in any of all these that a man doeth, sinning the
779,dance. 
And he set captains of war over the people, and gathered them together to him in the street of the gate of the city, and spake comfortably to them, saying, 
Be strong and courageous, be not afraid nor dismayed for the king of Assyria, nor for all the multitude that is with him: for there be more with us than with him: 
With him is an arm of flesh; but with us is the LORD our God to help us, and to fight our battles. And the people rested themselves upon the words of Hezekiah king of Judah. 
After this did Sennacherib king of Assyria send his servants to Jerusalem, (but he himself laid siege against Lachish, and all his power with him,) unto Hezekiah king of Judah, and unto all Judah that were at Jerusalem, saying, 
Thus saith Sennacherib king of Assyria, Whereo
655,urn aside; it shall not cleave to me. 
A froward heart shall depart from me: I will not know a wicked person. 
Whoso privily slandereth his neighbour, him will I cut off: him that hath an high look and a proud heart will not I suffer. 
Mine eyes shall be upon the faithful of the land, that they may dwell with me: he that walketh in a perfect way, he shall serve me. 
He that worketh deceit shall not dwell within my house: he that telleth lies shall not tarry in my sight. 
I will early destroy all the wicked of the land; that I may cut off all wicked doers from the city of the LORD. 
Hear my prayer, O LORD, and let my cry come unto thee. 
Hide not t
743, tree that is pleasant to the sight, and good for food; the tree of life also in the midst of the garden, and the tree of knowledge of good and evil. 
And a river went out of Eden to water the garden; and from thence it was parted, and became into four heads. 
The name of the first is Pison: that is it which compasseth the whole land of Havilah, where there is gold; 
And the gold of that land is good: there is bdellium and the onyx stone. 
And the name of the second river is Gihon: the same is it that compasseth the whole land of Ethiopia. 
And the name of the third river is Hiddekel: that is it which goeth toward the east of Assyria. And the fourth river is Euphrates. 
And the LORD God took the man, and put him into the garden of Ed
667,f Manasseh, and his prayer unto his God, and the words of the seers that spake to him in the name of the LORD God of Israel, behold, they are written in the book of the kings of Israel. 
His prayer also, and how God was intreated of him, and all his sins, and his trespass, and the places wherein he built high places, and set up groves and graven images, before he was humbled: behold, they are written among the sayings of the seers. 
So Manasseh slept with his fathers, and they buried him in his own house: and Amon his son reigned in his stead. 
Amon was two and twenty years old when he began to reign, and reigned two years in Jerusalem. 
But he did that which
705,am as when they have gathered the summer fruits, as the grapegleanings of the vintage: there is no cluster to eat: my soul desired the firstripe fruit. 
The good man is perished out of the earth: and there is none upright among men: they all lie in wait for blood; they hunt every man his brother with a net. 
That they may do evil with both hands earnestly, the prince asketh, and the judge asketh for a reward; and the great man, he uttereth his mischievous desire: so they wrap it up. 
The best of them is as a brier: the most upright is sharper than a thorn hedge: the day of thy watchmen and thy visitation cometh; now shall be their perplexity. 
Trust ye not in a friend, put ye not confidence in a 
710,itudes in the valley of decision: for the day of the LORD is near in the valley of decision. 
The sun and the moon shall be darkened, and the stars shall withdraw their shining. 
The LORD also shall roar out of Zion, and utter his voice from Jerusalem; and the heavens and the earth shall shake: but the LORD will be the hope of his people, and the strength of the children of Israel. 
So shall ye know that I am the LORD your God dwelling in Zion, my holy mountain: then shall Jerusalem be holy, and there shall no strangers pass through her any more. 
And it shall come to pass in that day, that the mountains shall drop down new wine, and the hills shall flow with milk, and all the rivers of Judah shall fl
724,, that at the same time shall things come into thy mind, and thou shalt think an evil thought: 
And thou shalt say, I will go up to the land of unwalled villages; I will go to them that are at rest, that dwell safely, all of them dwelling without walls, and having neither bars nor gates, 
To take a spoil, and to take a prey; to turn thine hand upon the desolate places that are now inhabited, and upon the people that are gathered out of the nations, which have gotten cattle and goods, that dwell in the midst of the land. 
Sheba, and Dedan, and the merchants of Tarshish, with all the young lions thereof, shall say unto thee, Art thou come to take a spoil? hast thou gathered thy company to take a prey? to carry away s
805, the drink offering thereof shall be of wine, the fourth part of an hin. 
And ye shall eat neither bread, nor parched corn, nor green ears, until the selfsame day that ye have brought an offering unto your God: it shall be a statute for ever throughout your generations in all your dwellings. 
And ye shall count unto you from the morrow after the sabbath, from the day that ye brought the sheaf of the wave offering; seven sabbaths shall be complete: 
Even unto the morrow after the seventh sabbath shall ye number fifty days; and ye shall offer a new meat offering unto the LORD. 
Ye shall bring out of your habitations two wave loaves of two tenth deals; they shall be of fine flour; they shall be baken with leaven; they are the firstfruits unto the LORD. 
And ye shall offer with the bread seven lamb
805, gold, and the spices, and the precious ointment, and all the house of his armour, and all that was found in his treasures: there was nothing in his house, nor in all his dominion, that Hezekiah shewed them not. 
Then came Isaiah the prophet unto king Hezekiah, and said unto him, What said these men? and from whence came they unto thee? And Hezekiah said, They are come from a far country unto me, even from Babylon. 
Then said he, What have they seen in thine house? And Hezekiah answered, All that is in mine house have they seen: there is nothing among my treasures that I have not shewed them. 
Then said Isaiah to Hezekiah, Hear the word of the LORD of hosts: 
Behold, the days come, that all that is in thine house, and that which thy fathers have laid up in store until this day, shall be carried
643,ess of Paran: all those men were heads of the children of Israel. 
And these were their names: of the tribe of Reuben, Shammua the son of Zaccur. 
Of the tribe of Simeon, Shaphat the son of Hori. 
Of the tribe of Judah, Caleb the son of Jephunneh. 
Of the tribe of Issachar, Igal the son of Joseph. 
Of the tribe of Ephraim, Oshea the son of Nun. 
Of the tribe of Benjamin, Palti the son of Raphu. 
Of the tribe of Zebulun, Gaddiel the son of Sodi. 
Of the tribe of Joseph, namely, of the tribe of Manasseh, Gaddi the son of Susi. 
Of the tribe of Dan, Ammiel the son of Gemalli. 
Of the tribe of Asher, Sethur the son of Michael. 
Of the trib
599,areth rule, the people mourn. 
Whoso loveth wisdom rejoiceth his father: but he that keepeth company with harlots spendeth his substance. 
The king by judgment establisheth the land: but he that receiveth gifts overthroweth it. 
A man that flattereth his neighbour spreadeth a net for his feet. 
In the transgression of an evil man there is a snare: but the righteous doth sing and rejoice. 
The righteous considereth the cause of the poor: but the wicked regardeth not to know it. 
Scornful men bring a city into a snare: but wise men turn away wrath. 
If a wise man contendeth with a foolish man, 
840,d. 
Moreover in those days the nobles of Judah sent many letters unto Tobiah, and the letters of Tobiah came unto them. 
For there were many in Judah sworn unto him, because he was the son in law of Shechaniah the son of Arah; and his son Johanan had taken the daughter of Meshullam the son of Berechiah. 
Also they reported his good deeds before me, and uttered my words to him. And Tobiah sent letters to put me in fear. 
Now it came to pass, when the wall was built, and I had set up the doors, and the porters and the singers and the Levites were appointed, 
That I gave my brother Hanani, and Hananiah the ruler of the palace, charge over Jerusalem: for he was a faithful man, and feared God above many. 
And I said unto them, Let not the gates of Jerusalem be opened until the sun be hot; and while they stand by, let them shut the do
661,and wash his clothes, and bathe himself in water, and shall be clean at even. 
But the man that shall be unclean, and shall not purify himself, that soul shall be cut off from among the congregation, because he hath defiled the sanctuary of the LORD: the water of separation hath not been sprinkled upon him; he is unclean. 
And it shall be a perpetual statute unto them, that he that sprinkleth the water of separation shall wash his clothes; and he that toucheth the water of separation shall be unclean until even. 
And whatsoever the unclean person toucheth shall be unclean; and the soul that toucheth it shall be unclean until even. 
Then came the childre
693,ritance, that the name of the dead be not cut off from among his brethren, and from the gate of his place: ye are witnesses this day. 
And all the people that were in the gate, and the elders, said, We are witnesses. The LORD make the woman that is come into thine house like Rachel and like Leah, which two did build the house of Israel: and do thou worthily in Ephratah, and be famous in Bethlehem: 
And let thy house be like the house of Pharez, whom Tamar bare unto Judah, of the seed which the LORD shall give thee of this young woman. 
So Boaz took Ruth, and she was his wife: and when he went in unto her, the LORD gave her conception, and she bare a son. 
And the women said unto Naomi
578,said unto me, I have heard the voice of the words of this people, which they have spoken unto thee: they have well said all that they have spoken. 
O that there were such an heart in them, that they would fear me, and keep all my commandments always, that it might be well with them, and with their children for ever! 
Go say to them, Get you into your tents again. 
But as for thee, stand thou here by me, and I will speak unto thee all the commandments, and the statutes, and the judgments, which thou shalt teach them, that they may do them in the land which I give them to p
735,d our Saviour, and Lord Jesus Christ, which is our hope; 
Unto Timothy, my own son in the faith: Grace, mercy, and peace, from God our Father and Jesus Christ our Lord. 
As I besought thee to abide still at Ephesus, when I went into Macedonia, that thou mightest charge some that they teach no other doctrine, 
Neither give heed to fables and endless genealogies, which minister questions, rather than godly edifying which is in faith: so do. 
Now the end of the commandment is charity out of a pure heart, and of a good conscience, and of faith unfeigned: 
From which some having swerved have turned aside unto vain jangling; 
Desiring to be teachers of the law; understanding neither what they say, nor whereof they affirm. 
But we k
704,urt was found upon him, because he believed in his God. 
And the king commanded, and they brought those men which had accused Daniel, and they cast them into the den of lions, them, their children, and their wives; and the lions had the mastery of them, and brake all their bones in pieces or ever they came at the bottom of the den. 
Then king Darius wrote unto all people, nations, and languages, that dwell in all the earth; Peace be multiplied unto you. 
I make a decree, That in every dominion of my kingdom men tremble and fear before the God of Daniel: for he is the living God, and stedfast for ever, and his kingdom that which shall not be destroyed, and his dominion shall be even unto the end.
626,Zaza. These were the sons of Jerahmeel. 
Now Sheshan had no sons, but daughters. And Sheshan had a servant, an Egyptian, whose name was Jarha. 
And Sheshan gave his daughter to Jarha his servant to wife; and she bare him Attai. 
And Attai begat Nathan, and Nathan begat Zabad, 
And Zabad begat Ephlal, and Ephlal begat Obed, 
And Obed begat Jehu, and Jehu begat Azariah, 
And Azariah begat Helez, and Helez begat Eleasah, 
And Eleasah begat Sisamai, and Sisamai begat Shallum, 
And Shallum begat Jekamiah, and Jekamiah begat Elishama. 
Now the sons of Caleb the brother of Jerahmeel were, Mesha his firstborn, which was the fa
778,was Sibbecai the Hushathite, of the Zarhites: and in his course were twenty and four thousand. 
The ninth captain for the ninth month was Abiezer the Anetothite, of the Benjamites: and in his course were twenty and four thousand. 
The tenth captain for the tenth month was Maharai the Netophathite, of the Zarhites: and in his course were twenty and four thousand. 
The eleventh captain for the eleventh month was Benaiah the Pirathonite, of the children of Ephraim: and in his course were twenty and four thousand. 
The twelfth captain for the twelfth month was Heldai the Netophathite, of Othniel: and in his course were twenty and four thousand. 
Furthermore over the tribes of Israel: the ruler of the Reubenites was Eliezer the son of Zichri: of the Simeonites, Shephatiah 
723,thousand men and women. 
Then went Abimelech to Thebez, and encamped against Thebez, and took it. 
But there was a strong tower within the city, and thither fled all the men and women, and all they of the city, and shut it to them, and gat them up to the top of the tower. 
And Abimelech came unto the tower, and fought against it, and went hard unto the door of the tower to burn it with fire. 
And a certain woman cast a piece of a millstone upon Abimelech's head, and all to brake his skull. 
Then he called hastily unto the young man his armourbearer, and said unto him, Draw thy sword, and slay me, that men say not of me, A women slew him. And his young man thrust him through, and he died. 
And when the men of Israe
738, host. 
And the Midianites and the Amalekites and all the children of the east lay along in the valley like grasshoppers for multitude; and their camels were without number, as the sand by the sea side for multitude. 
And when Gideon was come, behold, there was a man that told a dream unto his fellow, and said, Behold, I dreamed a dream, and, lo, a cake of barley bread tumbled into the host of Midian, and came unto a tent, and smote it that it fell, and overturned it, that the tent lay along. 
And his fellow answered and said, This is nothing else save the sword of Gideon the son of Joash, a man of Israel: for into his hand hath God delivered Midian, and all the host. 
And it was so, when Gideon heard the telling of the dream, a
563,iend of mine in his journey is come to me, and I have nothing to set before him? 
And he from within shall answer and say, Trouble me not: the door is now shut, and my children are with me in bed; I cannot rise and give thee. 
I say unto you, Though he will not rise and give him, because he is his friend, yet because of his importunity he will rise and give him as many as he needeth. 
And I say unto you, Ask, and it shall be given you; seek, and ye shall find; knock, and it shall be opened unto you. 
For every one that asketh receiveth; and he that seeketh 
795,o I spake unto you; and ye would not hear, but rebelled against the commandment of the LORD, and went presumptuously up into the hill. 
And the Amorites, which dwelt in that mountain, came out against you, and chased you, as bees do, and destroyed you in Seir, even unto Hormah. 
And ye returned and wept before the LORD; but the LORD would not hearken to your voice, nor give ear unto you. 
So ye abode in Kadesh many days, according unto the days that ye abode there. 
Then we turned, and took our journey into the wilderness by the way of the Red sea, as the LORD spake unto me: and we compassed mount Seir many days. 
And the LORD spake unto me, saying, 
Ye have compassed this mountain long enough: turn you northward. 
And command thou the people, saying, Ye are to pass through the coast 
619,r scrip, neither bread, neither money; neither have two coats apiece. 
And whatsoever house ye enter into, there abide, and thence depart. 
And whosoever will not receive you, when ye go out of that city, shake off the very dust from your feet for a testimony against them. 
And they departed, and went through the towns, preaching the gospel, and healing every where. 
Now Herod the tetrarch heard of all that was done by him: and he was perplexed, because that it was said of some, that John was risen from the dead; 
And of some, that Elias had appeared; and of others, that one of the old prophets was risen again. 
724,e, which shall be in the land of Egypt; that the land perish not through the famine. 
And the thing was good in the eyes of Pharaoh, and in the eyes of all his servants. 
And Pharaoh said unto his servants, Can we find such a one as this is, a man in whom the Spirit of God is? 
And Pharaoh said unto Joseph, Forasmuch as God hath shewed thee all this, there is none so discreet and wise as thou art: 
Thou shalt be over my house, and according unto thy word shall all my people be ruled: only in the throne will I be greater than thou. 
And Pharaoh said unto Joseph, See, I have set thee over all the land of Egypt. 
And Pharaoh took off his ring from his hand, and put it upon Joseph's hand, and arrayed him in vestures of
611,em for a prey, 
Upon one day in all the provinces of king Ahasuerus, namely, upon the thirteenth day of the twelfth month, which is the month Adar. 
The copy of the writing for a commandment to be given in every province was published unto all people, and that the Jews should be ready against that day to avenge themselves on their enemies. 
So the posts that rode upon mules and camels went out, being hastened and pressed on by the king's commandment. And the decree was given at Shushan the palace. 
And Mordecai went out from the presence of the king in royal apparel of blue and white, and with a great cr
652,nd shall be put to the inheritance of the tribe whereunto they are received: so shall it be taken from the lot of our inheritance. 
And when the jubile of the children of Israel shall be, then shall their inheritance be put unto the inheritance of the tribe whereunto they are received: so shall their inheritance be taken away from the inheritance of the tribe of our fathers. 
And Moses commanded the children of Israel according to the word of the LORD, saying, The tribe of the sons of Joseph hath said well. 
This is the thing which the LORD doth command concerning the daughters of Zelophehad, saying, Let them marry to whom they think best; only
721,you not for your incontinency. 
But I speak this by permission, and not of commandment. 
For I would that all men were even as I myself. But every man hath his proper gift of God, one after this manner, and another after that. 
I say therefore to the unmarried and widows, it is good for them if they abide even as I. 
But if they cannot contain, let them marry: for it is better to marry than to burn. 
And unto the married I command, yet not I, but the Lord, Let not the wife depart from her husband: 
But and if she depart, let her remain unmarried or be reconciled to her husband: and let not the husband put away his wife. 
But to the rest speak I, not the Lord: If any brother hath a wife that believeth not, and sh
677,else beside me. 
Therefore shall evil come upon thee; thou shalt not know from whence it riseth: and mischief shall fall upon thee; thou shalt not be able to put it off: and desolation shall come upon thee suddenly, which thou shalt not know. 
Stand now with thine enchantments, and with the multitude of thy sorceries, wherein thou hast laboured from thy youth; if so be thou shalt be able to profit, if so be thou mayest prevail. 
Thou art wearied in the multitude of thy counsels. Let now the astrologers, the stargazers, the monthly prognosticators, stand up, and save thee from these things that shall come upon thee. 
Behold, they shall be as stubble; the fire shall burn
837,said, Let me now leave with thee some of the folk that are with me. And he said, What needeth it? let me find grace in the sight of my lord. 
So Esau returned that day on his way unto Seir. 
And Jacob journeyed to Succoth, and built him an house, and made booths for his cattle: therefore the name of the place is called Succoth. 
And Jacob came to Shalem, a city of Shechem, which is in the land of Canaan, when he came from Padanaram; and pitched his tent before the city. 
And he bought a parcel of a field, where he had spread his tent, at the hand of the children of Hamor, Shechem's father, for an hundred pieces of money. 
And he erected there an altar, and called it EleloheIsrael. 
And Dinah the daughter of Leah, which she bare unto Jacob, went out to see the daughters of the land. 
And when Shechem the son of Hamor the Hivit
744,nt me is true; and I speak to the world those things which I have heard of him. 
They understood not that he spake to them of the Father. 
Then said Jesus unto them, When ye have lifted up the Son of man, then shall ye know that I am he, and that I do nothing of myself; but as my Father hath taught me, I speak these things. 
And he that sent me is with me: the Father hath not left me alone; for I do always those things that please him. 
As he spake these words, many believed on him. 
Then said Jesus to those Jews which believed on him, If ye continue in my word, then are ye my disciples indeed; 
And ye shall know the truth, and the truth shall make you free. 
They answered him, We be Abraham's seed, and were never in bondage to any ma
617,o him that overcometh will I grant to sit with me in my throne, even as I also overcame, and am set down with my Father in his throne. 
He that hath an ear, let him hear what the Spirit saith unto the churches. 
After this I looked, and, behold, a door was opened in heaven: and the first voice which I heard was as it were of a trumpet talking with me; which said, Come up hither, and I will shew thee things which must be hereafter. 
And immediately I was in the spirit: and, behold, a throne was set in heaven, and one sat on the throne. 
And he that sat was to look upon like a jasper and a sardine stone: and the
685,hem among the people: and they shall remember me in far countries; and they shall live with their children, and turn again. 
I will bring them again also out of the land of Egypt, and gather them out of Assyria; and I will bring them into the land of Gilead and Lebanon; and place shall not be found for them. 
And he shall pass through the sea with affliction, and shall smite the waves in the sea, and all the deeps of the river shall dry up: and the pride of Assyria shall be brought down, and the sceptre of Egypt shall depart away. 
And I will strengthen them in the LORD; and they shall walk up and down in his name, saith the LORD. 
Open thy doors, O Lebanon, that the fire may 
778,caped his hands. 
It is not expedient for me doubtless to glory. I will come to visions and revelations of the Lord. 
I knew a man in Christ above fourteen years ago, (whether in the body, I cannot tell; or whether out of the body, I cannot tell: God knoweth;) such an one caught up to the third heaven. 
And I knew such a man, (whether in the body, or out of the body, I cannot tell: God knoweth;) 
How that he was caught up into paradise, and heard unspeakable words, which it is not lawful for a man to utter. 
Of such an one will I glory: yet of myself I will not glory, but in mine infirmities. 
For though I would desire to glory, I shall not be a fool; for I will say the truth: but now I forbear, lest any man should think of me above that which he seeth me to be, or th
698,aith the LORD: for I have spread you abroad as the four winds of the heaven, saith the LORD. 
Deliver thyself, O Zion, that dwellest with the daughter of Babylon. 
For thus saith the LORD of hosts; After the glory hath he sent me unto the nations which spoiled you: for he that toucheth you toucheth the apple of his eye. 
For, behold, I will shake mine hand upon them, and they shall be a spoil to their servants: and ye shall know that the LORD of hosts hath sent me. 
Sing and rejoice, O daughter of Zion: for, lo, I come, and I will dwell in the midst of thee, saith the LORD. 
And many nations shall be joined to the LORD in that day, and shall be my people: and I will dwell in the midst of t
827, lest any hurt it, I will keep it night and day. 
Fury is not in me: who would set the briers and thorns against me in battle? I would go through them, I would burn them together. 
Or let him take hold of my strength, that he may make peace with me; and he shall make peace with me. 
He shall cause them that come of Jacob to take root: Israel shall blossom and bud, and fill the face of the world with fruit. 
Hath he smitten him, as he smote those that smote him? or is he slain according to the slaughter of them that are slain by him? 
In measure, when it shooteth forth, thou wilt debate with it: he stayeth his rough wind in the day of the east wind. 
By this therefore shall the iniquity of Jacob be purged; and this is all the fruit to take away his sin; when he maketh all the stones of the altar as chalkstones that a
658,s, which owed him an hundred pence: and he laid hands on him, and took him by the throat, saying, Pay me that thou owest. 
And his fellowservant fell down at his feet, and besought him, saying, Have patience with me, and I will pay thee all. 
And he would not: but went and cast him into prison, till he should pay the debt. 
So when his fellowservants saw what was done, they were very sorry, and came and told unto their lord all that was done. 
Then his lord, after that he had called him, said unto him, O thou wicked servant, I forgave thee all that debt, because thou desiredst me: 
Shouldest not thou also have had compassion on thy fellowservant, eve
781,women, that beheld while Samson made sport. 
And Samson called unto the LORD, and said, O Lord God, remember me, I pray thee, and strengthen me, I pray thee, only this once, O God, that I may be at once avenged of the Philistines for my two eyes. 
And Samson took hold of the two middle pillars upon which the house stood, and on which it was borne up, of the one with his right hand, and of the other with his left. 
And Samson said, Let me die with the Philistines. And he bowed himself with all his might; and the house fell upon the lords, and upon all the people that were therein. So the dead which he slew at his death were more than they which he slew in his life. 
Then his brethren and all the house of his father came down, and took him, and brought him up, and buried h
762,er, and with death, and with the beasts of the earth. 
And when he had opened the fifth seal, I saw under the altar the souls of them that were slain for the word of God, and for the testimony which they held: 
And they cried with a loud voice, saying, How long, O Lord, holy and true, dost thou not judge and avenge our blood on them that dwell on the earth? 
And white robes were given unto every one of them; and it was said unto them, that they should rest yet for a little season, until their fellowservants also and their brethren, that should be killed as they were, should be fulfilled. 
And I beheld when he had opened the sixth seal, and, lo, there was a great earthquake; and the sun became black as sackcloth of hair, and the moon became as blood; 
A
654,the fowls were filled with their flesh. 
And I saw an angel come down from heaven, having the key of the bottomless pit and a great chain in his hand. 
And he laid hold on the dragon, that old serpent, which is the Devil, and Satan, and bound him a thousand years, 
And cast him into the bottomless pit, and shut him up, and set a seal upon him, that he should deceive the nations no more, till the thousand years should be fulfilled: and after that he must be loosed a little season. 
And I saw thrones, and they sat upon them, and judgment was given unto them: and I saw the souls of them that were beheaded for the witness of Jesus, and for the word o
667, 
Jeremiah the tenth, Machbanai the eleventh. 
These were of the sons of Gad, captains of the host: one of the least was over an hundred, and the greatest over a thousand. 
These are they that went over Jordan in the first month, when it had overflown all his banks; and they put to flight all them of the valleys, both toward the east, and toward the west. 
And there came of the children of Benjamin and Judah to the hold unto David. 
And David went out to meet them, and answered and said unto them, If ye be come peaceably unto me to help me, mine heart shall be knit unto you: but if ye be come to betray me to mine enemies, seeing there is no wrong in mine hand
656,Therefore seeing we have this ministry, as we have received mercy, we faint not; 
But have renounced the hidden things of dishonesty, not walking in craftiness, nor handling the word of God deceitfully; but by manifestation of the truth commending ourselves to every man's conscience in the sight of God. 
But if our gospel be hid, it is hid to them that are lost: 
In whom the god of this world hath blinded the minds of them which believe not, lest the light of the glorious gospel of Christ, who is the image of God, should shine unto them. 
For we preach not ourselves, but Christ Jesus the Lord; and ourselves your servants for Jesus' sake. 
For God, 
597,riches of his grace; 
Wherein he hath abounded toward us in all wisdom and prudence; 
Having made known unto us the mystery of his will, according to his good pleasure which he hath purposed in himself: 
That in the dispensation of the fulness of times he might gather together in one all things in Christ, both which are in heaven, and which are on earth; even in him: 
In whom also we have obtained an inheritance, being predestinated according to the purpose of him who worketh all things after the counsel of his own will: 
That we should be to the praise of his glory, who first trusted in Ch
637,e die: he that smote him shall surely be put to death; for he is a murderer: the revenger of blood shall slay the murderer, when he meeteth him. 
But if he thrust him suddenly without enmity, or have cast upon him any thing without laying of wait, 
Or with any stone, wherewith a man may die, seeing him not, and cast it upon him, that he die, and was not his enemy, neither sought his harm: 
Then the congregation shall judge between the slayer and the revenger of blood according to these judgments: 
And the congregation shall deliver the slayer out of the hand of the revenger of blood, and the congregation shall restore him to the 
674,ses and much people. Shall he prosper? shall he escape that doeth such things? or shall he break the covenant, and be delivered? 
As I live, saith the Lord GOD, surely in the place where the king dwelleth that made him king, whose oath he despised, and whose covenant he brake, even with him in the midst of Babylon he shall die. 
Neither shall Pharaoh with his mighty army and great company make for him in the war, by casting up mounts, and building forts, to cut off many persons: 
Seeing he despised the oath by breaking the covenant, when, lo, he had given his hand, and hath done all these things, he shall not escape. 
Therefore thus saith the Lord GOD; As I live, su
815,o take tithes of the people according to the law, that is, of their brethren, though they come out of the loins of Abraham: 
But he whose descent is not counted from them received tithes of Abraham, and blessed him that had the promises. 
And without all contradiction the less is blessed of the better. 
And here men that die receive tithes; but there he receiveth them, of whom it is witnessed that he liveth. 
And as I may so say, Levi also, who receiveth tithes, payed tithes in Abraham. 
For he was yet in the loins of his father, when Melchisedec met him. 
If therefore perfection were by the Levitical priesthood, (for under it the people received the law,) what further need was there that another priest should rise after the order of Melchisedec, and not be called after the order of Aaron? 
For the pries
646,ses. 
And of the children of Israel's half, which Moses divided from the men that warred, 
(Now the half that pertained unto the congregation was three hundred thousand and thirty thousand and seven thousand and five hundred sheep, 
And thirty and six thousand beeves, 
And thirty thousand asses and five hundred, 
And sixteen thousand persons;) 
Even of the children of Israel's half, Moses took one portion of fifty, both of man and of beast, and gave them unto the Levites, which kept the charge of the tabernacle of the LORD; as the LORD commanded Moses. 
And the officers which were over thousands of the host, the captains of thousands, and
748,ar, I pray you, O heads of Jacob, and ye princes of the house of Israel; Is it not for you to know judgment? 
Who hate the good, and love the evil; who pluck off their skin from off them, and their flesh from off their bones; 
Who also eat the flesh of my people, and flay their skin from off them; and they break their bones, and chop them in pieces, as for the pot, and as flesh within the caldron. 
Then shall they cry unto the LORD, but he will not hear them: he will even hide his face from them at that time, as they have behaved themselves ill in their doings. 
Thus saith the LORD concerning the prophets that make my people err, that bite with their teeth, and cry, Peace; and he that putteth not into their mouths, they even prepare war a
679,nd we will discover ourselves unto them. 
If they say thus unto us, Tarry until we come to you; then we will stand still in our place, and will not go up unto them. 
But if they say thus, Come up unto us; then we will go up: for the LORD hath delivered them into our hand: and this shall be a sign unto us. 
And both of them discovered themselves unto the garrison of the Philistines: and the Philistines said, Behold, the Hebrews come forth out of the holes where they had hid themselves. 
And the men of the garrison answered Jonathan and his armourbearer, and said, Come up to us, and we will shew you a thing. And Jonathan said unto his armourbearer, Come up after me: for th
798,d shall lothe yourselves in your own sight for your iniquities and for your abominations. 
Not for your sakes do I this, saith the Lord GOD, be it known unto you: be ashamed and confounded for your own ways, O house of Israel. 
Thus saith the Lord GOD; In the day that I shall have cleansed you from all your iniquities I will also cause you to dwell in the cities, and the wastes shall be builded. 
And the desolate land shall be tilled, whereas it lay desolate in the sight of all that passed by. 
And they shall say, This land that was desolate is become like the garden of Eden; and the waste and desolate and ruined cities are become fenced, and are inhabited. 
Then the heathen that are left round about you shall know that I the LORD build the ruined places, and plant that that was desolate
751,s strength setteth fast the mountains; being girded with power: 
Which stilleth the noise of the seas, the noise of their waves, and the tumult of the people. 
They also that dwell in the uttermost parts are afraid at thy tokens: thou makest the outgoings of the morning and evening to rejoice. 
Thou visitest the earth, and waterest it: thou greatly enrichest it with the river of God, which is full of water: thou preparest them corn, when thou hast so provided for it. 
Thou waterest the ridges thereof abundantly: thou settlest the furrows thereof: thou makest it soft with showers: thou blessest the springing thereof. 
Thou crownest the year with thy goodness; and thy paths drop fatness. 
They drop upon the pastures of the wilderness: and the 
695,y in Bethel: the words which he had spoken unto the king, them they told also to their father. 
And their father said unto them, What way went he? For his sons had seen what way the man of God went, which came from Judah. 
And he said unto his sons, Saddle me the ass. So they saddled him the ass: and he rode thereon, 
And went after the man of God, and found him sitting under an oak: and he said unto him, Art thou the man of God that camest from Judah? And he said, I am. 
Then he said unto him, Come home with me, and eat bread. 
And he said, I may not return with thee, nor go in with thee: neither will I eat bread nor drink water with thee in this place: 
For it was said to me by the wo
616,nd of Judah. Then David departed, and came into the forest of Hareth. 
When Saul heard that David was discovered, and the men that were with him, (now Saul abode in Gibeah under a tree in Ramah, having his spear in his hand, and all his servants were standing about him;) 
Then Saul said unto his servants that stood about him, Hear now, ye Benjamites; will the son of Jesse give every one of you fields and vineyards, and make you all captains of thousands, and captains of hundreds; 
That all of you have conspired against me, and there is none that sheweth me that my son hath made a league with the son of Jesse,
743,ereth with the tongue. 
Whoso robbeth his father or his mother, and saith, It is no transgression; the same is the companion of a destroyer. 
He that is of a proud heart stirreth up strife: but he that putteth his trust in the LORD shall be made fat. 
He that trusteth in his own heart is a fool: but whoso walketh wisely, he shall be delivered. 
He that giveth unto the poor shall not lack: but he that hideth his eyes shall have many a curse. 
When the wicked rise, men hide themselves: but when they perish, the righteous increase. 
He, that being often reproved hardeneth his neck, shall suddenly be destroyed, and that without remedy. 
When the righteous are in authority, the people rejoice: but when the wicked beareth rule, the people 
600,ngly. 
And David answered and said, Behold the king's spear! and let one of the young men come over and fetch it. 
The LORD render to every man his righteousness and his faithfulness; for the LORD delivered thee into my hand to day, but I would not stretch forth mine hand against the LORD's anointed. 
And, behold, as thy life was much set by this day in mine eyes, so let my life be much set by in the eyes of the LORD, and let him deliver me out of all tribulation. 
Then Saul said to David, Blessed be thou, my son David: thou shalt both do great things, and also shalt still prevail. So David we
712,die. 
And it came to pass, when Joab observed the city, that he assigned Uriah unto a place where he knew that valiant men were. 
And the men of the city went out, and fought with Joab: and there fell some of the people of the servants of David; and Uriah the Hittite died also. 
Then Joab sent and told David all the things concerning the war; 
And charged the messenger, saying, When thou hast made an end of telling the matters of the war unto the king, 
And if so be that the king's wrath arise, and he say unto thee, Wherefore approached ye so nigh unto the city when ye did fight? knew ye not that they would shoot from the wall? 
Who smote Abimelech the son of Jerubbesheth? did not a woman cast a piece o
825,f the court of the prison, and committed him unto Gedaliah the son of Ahikam the son of Shaphan, that he should carry him home: so he dwelt among the people. 
Now the word of the LORD came unto Jeremiah, while he was shut up in the court of the prison, saying, 
Go and speak to Ebedmelech the Ethiopian, saying, Thus saith the LORD of hosts, the God of Israel; Behold, I will bring my words upon this city for evil, and not for good; and they shall be accomplished in that day before thee. 
But I will deliver thee in that day, saith the LORD: and thou shalt not be given into the hand of the men of whom thou art afraid. 
For I will surely deliver thee, and thou shalt not fall by the sword, but thy life shall be for a prey unto thee: because thou hast put thy trust in me, saith the LORD. 
The word that came to Jeremiah f
591,at offering, mingled with oil, for one bullock; and two tenth deals of flour for a meat offering, mingled with oil, for one ram; 
And a several tenth deal of flour mingled with oil for a meat offering unto one lamb; for a burnt offering of a sweet savour, a sacrifice made by fire unto the LORD. 
And their drink offerings shall be half an hin of wine unto a bullock, and the third part of an hin unto a ram, and a fourth part of an hin unto a lamb: this is the burnt offering of every month throughout the months of the year. 
And one kid of the goats for a sin offering unto the LORD shall
785,yrus the king of Babylon the same king Cyrus made a decree to build this house of God. 
And the vessels also of gold and silver of the house of God, which Nebuchadnezzar took out of the temple that was in Jerusalem, and brought them into the temple of Babylon, those did Cyrus the king take out of the temple of Babylon, and they were delivered unto one, whose name was Sheshbazzar, whom he had made governor; 
And said unto him, Take these vessels, go, carry them into the temple that is in Jerusalem, and let the house of God be builded in his place. 
Then came the same Sheshbazzar, and laid the foundation of the house of God which is in Jerusalem: and since that time even until now hath it been in building, and yet it is not finished. 
Now therefore, if it seem good to the king
578, 
Neither their silver nor their gold shall be able to deliver them in the day of the LORD's wrath; but the whole land shall be devoured by the fire of his jealousy: for he shall make even a speedy riddance of all them that dwell in the land. 
Gather yourselves together, yea, gather together, O nation not desired; 
Before the decree bring forth, before the day pass as the chaff, before the fierce anger of the LORD come upon you, before the day of the LORD's anger come upon you. 
Seek ye the LORD, all ye meek of the earth, which have wrought his judgment; seek righteousnes
584,e number of the twelve. 
And he went his way, and communed with the chief priests and captains, how he might betray him unto them. 
And they were glad, and covenanted to give him money. 
And he promised, and sought opportunity to betray him unto them in the absence of the multitude. 
Then came the day of unleavened bread, when the passover must be killed. 
And he sent Peter and John, saying, Go and prepare us the passover, that we may eat. 
And they said unto him, Where wilt thou that we prepare? 
And he said unto them, Behold, when ye are entered into the city, there shall a m
601,s; and with the mouth confession is made unto salvation. 
For the scripture saith, Whosoever believeth on him shall not be ashamed. 
For there is no difference between the Jew and the Greek: for the same Lord over all is rich unto all that call upon him. 
For whosoever shall call upon the name of the Lord shall be saved. 
How then shall they call on him in whom they have not believed? and how shall they believe in him of whom they have not heard? and how shall they hear without a preacher? 
And how shall they preach, except they be sent? as it is written, How beautiful are the feet of them that
829,lem unto the residue of the elders which were carried away captives, and to the priests, and to the prophets, and to all the people whom Nebuchadnezzar had carried away captive from Jerusalem to Babylon; 
(After that Jeconiah the king, and the queen, and the eunuchs, the princes of Judah and Jerusalem, and the carpenters, and the smiths, were departed from Jerusalem;) 
By the hand of Elasah the son of Shaphan, and Gemariah the son of Hilkiah, (whom Zedekiah king of Judah sent unto Babylon to Nebuchadnezzar king of Babylon) saying, 
Thus saith the LORD of hosts, the God of Israel, unto all that are carried away captives, whom I have caused to be carried away from Jerusalem unto Babylon; 
Build ye houses, and dwell in them; and plant gardens, and eat the fruit of them; 
Take ye wives, and beget sons and daughters; and t
689, deep; that hath made the depths of the sea a way for the ransomed to pass over? 
Therefore the redeemed of the LORD shall return, and come with singing unto Zion; and everlasting joy shall be upon their head: they shall obtain gladness and joy; and sorrow and mourning shall flee away. 
I, even I, am he that comforteth you: who art thou, that thou shouldest be afraid of a man that shall die, and of the son of man which shall be made as grass; 
And forgettest the LORD thy maker, that hath stretched forth the heavens, and laid the foundations of the earth; and hast feared continually every day because of the fury of the oppressor, as if he were ready to destroy? and where is the fur
599,wine, revellings, banquetings, and abominable idolatries: 
Wherein they think it strange that ye run not with them to the same excess of riot, speaking evil of you: 
Who shall give account to him that is ready to judge the quick and the dead. 
For for this cause was the gospel preached also to them that are dead, that they might be judged according to men in the flesh, but live according to God in the spirit. 
But the end of all things is at hand: be ye therefore sober, and watch unto prayer. 
And above all things have fervent charity among yourselves: for charity shall cover the multitude of
767,er is not under bondage in such cases: but God hath called us to peace. 
For what knowest thou, O wife, whether thou shalt save thy husband? or how knowest thou, O man, whether thou shalt save thy wife? 
But as God hath distributed to every man, as the Lord hath called every one, so let him walk. And so ordain I in all churches. 
Is any man called being circumcised? let him not become uncircumcised. Is any called in uncircumcision? let him not be circumcised. 
Circumcision is nothing, and uncircumcision is nothing, but the keeping of the commandments of God. 
Let every man abide in the same calling wherein he was called. 
Art thou called being a servant? care not for it: but if thou mayest be made free, use it rather. 
For he that is called in the Lord, bei
591,hat the prophets have spoken: 
Ought not Christ to have suffered these things, and to enter into his glory? 
And beginning at Moses and all the prophets, he expounded unto them in all the scriptures the things concerning himself. 
And they drew nigh unto the village, whither they went: and he made as though he would have gone further. 
But they constrained him, saying, Abide with us: for it is toward evening, and the day is far spent. And he went in to tarry with them. 
And it came to pass, as he sat at meat with them, he took bread, and blessed it, and brake, and gave to them. 
And t
640,hem. 
And he charged them, and said unto them, I am to be gathered unto my people: bury me with my fathers in the cave that is in the field of Ephron the Hittite, 
In the cave that is in the field of Machpelah, which is before Mamre, in the land of Canaan, which Abraham bought with the field of Ephron the Hittite for a possession of a buryingplace. 
There they buried Abraham and Sarah his wife; there they buried Isaac and Rebekah his wife; and there I buried Leah. 
The purchase of the field and of the cave that is therein was from the children of Heth. 
And when Jacob had made an end of commanding his sons, he gathered up his feet i
662,you: because that ye have despised the LORD which is among you, and have wept before him, saying, Why came we forth out of Egypt? 
And Moses said, The people, among whom I am, are six hundred thousand footmen; and thou hast said, I will give them flesh, that they may eat a whole month. 
Shall the flocks and the herds be slain for them, to suffice them? or shall all the fish of the sea be gathered together for them, to suffice them? 
And the LORD said unto Moses, Is the LORD'S hand waxed short? thou shalt see now whether my word shall come to pass unto thee or not. 
And Moses went out, and told the people the words of the LORD, and gathered the seventy me
713, not return to the LORD their God, nor seek him for all this. 
Ephraim also is like a silly dove without heart: they call to Egypt, they go to Assyria. 
When they shall go, I will spread my net upon them; I will bring them down as the fowls of the heaven; I will chastise them, as their congregation hath heard. 
Woe unto them! for they have fled from me: destruction unto them! because they have transgressed against me: though I have redeemed them, yet they have spoken lies against me. 
And they have not cried unto me with their heart, when they howled upon their beds: they assemble themselves for corn and wine, and they rebel against me. 
Though I have bound and strengthened their arms, yet do they imagin
785,seholder came and said unto him, Sir, didst not thou sow good seed in thy field? from whence then hath it tares? 
He said unto them, An enemy hath done this. The servants said unto him, Wilt thou then that we go and gather them up? 
But he said, Nay; lest while ye gather up the tares, ye root up also the wheat with them. 
Let both grow together until the harvest: and in the time of harvest I will say to the reapers, Gather ye together first the tares, and bind them in bundles to burn them: but gather the wheat into my barn. 
Another parable put he forth unto them, saying, The kingdom of heaven is like to a grain of mustard seed, which a man took, and sowed in his field: 
Which indeed is the least of all seeds: but when it is grown, it is the greatest among herbs, and becomet
814,sbandmen also, and vine dressers in the mountains, and in Carmel: for he loved husbandry. 
Moreover Uzziah had an host of fighting men, that went out to war by bands, according to the number of their account by the hand of Jeiel the scribe and Maaseiah the ruler, under the hand of Hananiah, one of the king's captains. 
The whole number of the chief of the fathers of the mighty men of valour were two thousand and six hundred. 
And under their hand was an army, three hundred thousand and seven thousand and five hundred, that made war with mighty power, to help the king against the enemy. 
And Uzziah prepared for them throughout all the host shields, and spears, and helmets, and habergeons, and bows, and slings to cast stones. 
And he made in Jerusalem engines, invented by cunning men, to be on the towers 
675,nto all men of what thou hast seen and heard. 
And now why tarriest thou? arise, and be baptized, and wash away thy sins, calling on the name of the Lord. 
And it came to pass, that, when I was come again to Jerusalem, even while I prayed in the temple, I was in a trance; 
And saw him saying unto me, Make haste, and get thee quickly out of Jerusalem: for they will not receive thy testimony concerning me. 
And I said, Lord, they know that I imprisoned and beat in every synagogue them that believed on thee: 
And when the blood of thy martyr Stephen was shed, I also was standing by, and consenting unto his death, and kept the raiment of them that slew him. 
And he said 
757,iest are profane; yea, in my house have I found their wickedness, saith the LORD. 
Wherefore their way shall be unto them as slippery ways in the darkness: they shall be driven on, and fall therein: for I will bring evil upon them, even the year of their visitation, saith the LORD. 
And I have seen folly in the prophets of Samaria; they prophesied in Baal, and caused my people Israel to err. 
I have seen also in the prophets of Jerusalem an horrible thing: they commit adultery, and walk in lies: they strengthen also the hands of evildoers, that none doth return from his wickedness; they are all of them unto me as Sodom, and the inhabitants thereof as Gomorrah. 
Therefore thus saith the LORD of hosts concerning the prophets; Behold, I will feed the
797,y from before them of the nations which Joshua left when he died: 
That through them I may prove Israel, whether they will keep the way of the LORD to walk therein, as their fathers did keep it, or not. 
Therefore the LORD left those nations, without driving them out hastily; neither delivered he them into the hand of Joshua. 
Now these are the nations which the LORD left, to prove Israel by them, even as many of Israel as had not known all the wars of Canaan; 
Only that the generations of the children of Israel might know, to teach them war, at the least such as before knew nothing thereof; 
Namely, five lords of the Philistines, and all the Canaanites, and the Sidonians, and the Hivites that dwelt in mount Lebanon, from mount Baalhermon unto the entering in of Hamath. 
And they were t
643, thou shalt be desolate, and thou shalt know that I am the LORD. 
Because thou hast had a perpetual hatred, and hast shed the blood of the children of Israel by the force of the sword in the time of their calamity, in the time that their iniquity had an end: 
Therefore, as I live, saith the Lord GOD, I will prepare thee unto blood, and blood shall pursue thee: sith thou hast not hated blood, even blood shall pursue thee. 
Thus will I make mount Seir most desolate, and cut off from it him that passeth out and him that returneth. 
And I will fill his mountains with his slain men: in thy hills, and in thy valleys, and in all thy rivers, s
733,ft in Israel and in Judah, concerning the words of the book that is found: for great is the wrath of the LORD that is poured out upon us, because our fathers have not kept the word of the LORD, to do after all that is written in this book. 
And Hilkiah, and they that the king had appointed, went to Huldah the prophetess, the wife of Shallum the son of Tikvath, the son of Hasrah, keeper of the wardrobe; (now she dwelt in Jerusalem in the college:) and they spake to her to that effect. 
And she answered them, Thus saith the LORD God of Israel, Tell ye the man that sent you to me, 
Thus saith the LORD, Behold, I will bring evil upon this place, and upon the inhabitants thereof, even all the curses that are written in the book 
616, a time appointed. 
And the king shall do according to his will; and he shall exalt himself, and magnify himself above every god, and shall speak marvellous things against the God of gods, and shall prosper till the indignation be accomplished: for that that is determined shall be done. 
Neither shall he regard the God of his fathers, nor the desire of women, nor regard any god: for he shall magnify himself above all. 
But in his estate shall he honour the God of forces: and a god whom his fathers knew not shall he honour with gold, and silver, and with precious stones, and pleasant things. 
Thus shall he do 
755,e forgiveness of sins, according to the riches of his grace; 
Wherein he hath abounded toward us in all wisdom and prudence; 
Having made known unto us the mystery of his will, according to his good pleasure which he hath purposed in himself: 
That in the dispensation of the fulness of times he might gather together in one all things in Christ, both which are in heaven, and which are on earth; even in him: 
In whom also we have obtained an inheritance, being predestinated according to the purpose of him who worketh all things after the counsel of his own will: 
That we should be to the praise of his glory, who first trusted in Christ. 
In whom ye also trusted, after that ye heard the word of truth, the gospel of your salvation: in whom also afte
829,dled, and he went up to his father's house. 
But Samson's wife was given to his companion, whom he had used as his friend. 
But it came to pass within a while after, in the time of wheat harvest, that Samson visited his wife with a kid; and he said, I will go in to my wife into the chamber. But her father would not suffer him to go in. 
And her father said, I verily thought that thou hadst utterly hated her; therefore I gave her to thy companion: is not her younger sister fairer than she? take her, I pray thee, instead of her. 
And Samson said concerning them, Now shall I be more blameless than the Philistines, though I do them a displeasure. 
And Samson went and caught three hundred foxes, and took firebrands, and turned tail to tail, and put a firebrand in the midst between two tails. 
And when he had set the brands
675,ns of many generations. 
And strangers shall stand and feed your flocks, and the sons of the alien shall be your plowmen and your vinedressers. 
But ye shall be named the Priests of the LORD: men shall call you the Ministers of our God: ye shall eat the riches of the Gentiles, and in their glory shall ye boast yourselves. 
For your shame ye shall have double; and for confusion they shall rejoice in their portion: therefore in their land they shall possess the double: everlasting joy shall be unto them. 
For I the LORD love judgment, I hate robbery for burnt offering; and I will direct their work in truth, and I will make an everlasting covenant with them. 
And their 
585,the daughters of Heth, such as these which are of the daughters of the land, what good shall my life do me? 
And Isaac called Jacob, and blessed him, and charged him, and said unto him, Thou shalt not take a wife of the daughters of Canaan. 
Arise, go to Padanaram, to the house of Bethuel thy mother's father; and take thee a wife from thence of the daughers of Laban thy mother's brother. 
And God Almighty bless thee, and make thee fruitful, and multiply thee, that thou mayest be a multitude of people; 
And give thee the blessing of Abraham, to thee, and to thy seed with thee; th
781, forth by an hundred shall leave ten, to the house of Israel. 
For thus saith the LORD unto the house of Israel, Seek ye me, and ye shall live: 
But seek not Bethel, nor enter into Gilgal, and pass not to Beersheba: for Gilgal shall surely go into captivity, and Bethel shall come to nought. 
Seek the LORD, and ye shall live; lest he break out like fire in the house of Joseph, and devour it, and there be none to quench it in Bethel. 
Ye who turn judgment to wormwood, and leave off righteousness in the earth, 
Seek him that maketh the seven stars and Orion, and turneth the shadow of death into the morning, and maketh the day dark with night: that calleth for the waters of the sea, and poureth them out upon the face of the earth: The LORD is his name: 
That strengtheneth th
758,ade unto salvation. 
For the scripture saith, Whosoever believeth on him shall not be ashamed. 
For there is no difference between the Jew and the Greek: for the same Lord over all is rich unto all that call upon him. 
For whosoever shall call upon the name of the Lord shall be saved. 
How then shall they call on him in whom they have not believed? and how shall they believe in him of whom they have not heard? and how shall they hear without a preacher? 
And how shall they preach, except they be sent? as it is written, How beautiful are the feet of them that preach the gospel of peace, and bring glad tidings of good things! 
But they have not all obeyed the gospel. For Esaias saith, Lord, who hath believed our report? 
So then faith cometh by heari
736,der his feet. 
And he rode upon a cherub, and did fly: and he was seen upon the wings of the wind. 
And he made darkness pavilions round about him, dark waters, and thick clouds of the skies. 
Through the brightness before him were coals of fire kindled. 
The LORD thundered from heaven, and the most High uttered his voice. 
And he sent out arrows, and scattered them; lightning, and discomfited them. 
And the channels of the sea appeared, the foundations of the world were discovered, at the rebuking of the LORD, at the blast of the breath of his nostrils. 
He sent from above, he took me; he drew me out of many waters; 
He delivered me from my strong enemy, and from them that hated me: for they were too strong for me. 
They prev
709,flesh, this is the fruit of my labour: yet what I shall choose I wot not. 
For I am in a strait betwixt two, having a desire to depart, and to be with Christ; which is far better: 
Nevertheless to abide in the flesh is more needful for you. 
And having this confidence, I know that I shall abide and continue with you all for your furtherance and joy of faith; 
That your rejoicing may be more abundant in Jesus Christ for me by my coming to you again. 
Only let your conversation be as it becometh the gospel of Christ: that whether I come and see you, or else be absent, I may hear of your affairs, that ye stand fast in one spirit, with one mind striving together for the faith of the gospel; 
And in nothi
778,el counselled against you. 
Then David arose, and all the people that were with him, and they passed over Jordan: by the morning light there lacked not one of them that was not gone over Jordan. 
And when Ahithophel saw that his counsel was not followed, he saddled his ass, and arose, and gat him home to his house, to his city, and put his household in order, and hanged himself, and died, and was buried in the sepulchre of his father. 
Then David came to Mahanaim. And Absalom passed over Jordan, he and all the men of Israel with him. 
And Absalom made Amasa captain of the host instead of Joab: which Amasa was a man's son, whose name was Ithra an Israelite, that went in to Abigail the daughter of Nahash, sister to Zeruiah Joab's mother. 
So Israel and Absalom pitched i
574, shall he return. 
For they are my servants, which I brought forth out of the land of Egypt: they shall not be sold as bondmen. 
Thou shalt not rule over him with rigour; but shalt fear thy God. 
Both thy bondmen, and thy bondmaids, which thou shalt have, shall be of the heathen that are round about you; of them shall ye buy bondmen and bondmaids. 
Moreover of the children of the strangers that do sojourn among you, of them shall ye buy, and of their families that are with you, which they begat in your land: and they shall be your possession. 
And ye shall take them a
688, name of Dan their father. 
This is the inheritance of the tribe of the children of Dan according to their families, these cities with their villages. 
When they had made an end of dividing the land for inheritance by their coasts, the children of Israel gave an inheritance to Joshua the son of Nun among them: 
According to the word of the LORD they gave him the city which he asked, even Timnathserah in mount Ephraim: and he built the city, and dwelt therein. 
These are the inheritances, which Eleazar the priest, and Joshua the son of Nun, and the heads of the fathers of the tribes of the children of Israel, divided for an inheritance by lot in Shiloh before the LORD, at the door
637,ealed. 
And the whole multitude sought to touch him: for there went virtue out of him, and healed them all. 
And he lifted up his eyes on his disciples, and said, Blessed be ye poor: for yours is the kingdom of God. 
Blessed are ye that hunger now: for ye shall be filled. Blessed are ye that weep now: for ye shall laugh. 
Blessed are ye, when men shall hate you, and when they shall separate you from their company, and shall reproach you, and cast out your name as evil, for the Son of man's sake. 
Rejoice ye in that day, and leap for joy: for, behold, your reward is great in heaven: for in the like manner did their fathers unto th
829,refore it is not for the king's profit to suffer them. 
If it please the king, let it be written that they may be destroyed: and I will pay ten thousand talents of silver to the hands of those that have the charge of the business, to bring it into the king's treasuries. 
And the king took his ring from his hand, and gave it unto Haman the son of Hammedatha the Agagite, the Jews' enemy. 
And the king said unto Haman, The silver is given to thee, the people also, to do with them as it seemeth good to thee. 
Then were the king's scribes called on the thirteenth day of the first month, and there was written according to all that Haman had commanded unto the king's lieutenants, and to the governors that were over every province, and to the rulers of every people of every province according to the writing thereof, and to ev
747,fteenth day of this month is the feast: seven days shall unleavened bread be eaten. 
In the first day shall be an holy convocation; ye shall do no manner of servile work therein: 
But ye shall offer a sacrifice made by fire for a burnt offering unto the LORD; two young bullocks, and one ram, and seven lambs of the first year: they shall be unto you without blemish: 
And their meat offering shall be of flour mingled with oil: three tenth deals shall ye offer for a bullock, and two tenth deals for a ram; 
A several tenth deal shalt thou offer for every lamb, throughout the seven lambs: 
And one goat for a sin offering, to make an atonement for you. 
Ye shall offer these beside the burnt offering in the morning, which is for a continual bur
686,de that they should ask Barabbas, and destroy Jesus. 
The governor answered and said unto them, Whether of the twain will ye that I release unto you? They said, Barabbas. 
Pilate saith unto them, What shall I do then with Jesus which is called Christ? They all say unto him, Let him be crucified. 
And the governor said, Why, what evil hath he done? But they cried out the more, saying, Let him be crucified. 
When Pilate saw that he could prevail nothing, but that rather a tumult was made, he took water, and washed his hands before the multitude, saying, I am innocent of the blood of this just person: see ye to it. 
Then answered all the people, and said, His blood be on us, and o
601,the LORD thy God, he is God, the faithful God, which keepeth covenant and mercy with them that love him and keep his commandments to a thousand generations; 
And repayeth them that hate him to their face, to destroy them: he will not be slack to him that hateth him, he will repay him to his face. 
Thou shalt therefore keep the commandments, and the statutes, and the judgments, which I command thee this day, to do them. 
Wherefore it shall come to pass, if ye hearken to these judgments, and keep, and do them, that the LORD thy God shall keep unto thee the covenant and the mercy which he sware un
832,eousness. 
Correction is grievous unto him that forsaketh the way: and he that hateth reproof shall die. 
Hell and destruction are before the LORD: how much more then the hearts of the children of men? 
A scorner loveth not one that reproveth him: neither will he go unto the wise. 
A merry heart maketh a cheerful countenance: but by sorrow of the heart the spirit is broken. 
The heart of him that hath understanding seeketh knowledge: but the mouth of fools feedeth on foolishness. 
All the days of the afflicted are evil: but he that is of a merry heart hath a continual feast. 
Better is little with the fear of the LORD than great treasure and trouble therewith. 
Better is a dinner of herbs where love is, than a stalled ox and hatred therewith. 
A wrathful man stirreth up strife: but he that is slow to anger appeaseth stri
800,and of the Chaldeans. 
And I will cast thee out, and thy mother that bare thee, into another country, where ye were not born; and there shall ye die. 
But to the land whereunto they desire to return, thither shall they not return. 
Is this man Coniah a despised broken idol? is he a vessel wherein is no pleasure? wherefore are they cast out, he and his seed, and are cast into a land which they know not? 
O earth, earth, earth, hear the word of the LORD. 
Thus saith the LORD, Write ye this man childless, a man that shall not prosper in his days: for no man of his seed shall prosper, sitting upon the throne of David, and ruling any more in Judah. 
Woe be unto the pastors that destroy and scatter the sheep of my pasture! saith the LORD. 
Therefore thus saith the LORD God of Israel against the 
749,y are enemies for your sakes: but as touching the election, they are beloved for the father's sakes. 
For the gifts and calling of God are without repentance. 
For as ye in times past have not believed God, yet have now obtained mercy through their unbelief: 
Even so have these also now not believed, that through your mercy they also may obtain mercy. 
For God hath concluded them all in unbelief, that he might have mercy upon all. 
O the depth of the riches both of the wisdom and knowledge of God! how unsearchable are his judgments, and his ways past finding out! 
For who hath known the mind of the Lord? or who hath been his counsellor? 
Or who hath first given to him, and it shall be recompensed unto him again? 
For of him, and through hi
777,the children of Ephraim were among the inheritance of the children of Manasseh, all the cities with their villages. 
And they drave not out the Canaanites that dwelt in Gezer: but the Canaanites dwell among the Ephraimites unto this day, and serve under tribute. 
There was also a lot for the tribe of Manasseh; for he was the firstborn of Joseph; to wit, for Machir the firstborn of Manasseh, the father of Gilead: because he was a man of war, therefore he had Gilead and Bashan. 
There was also a lot for the rest of the children of Manasseh by their families; for the children of Abiezer, and for the children of Helek, and for the children of Asriel, and for the children of Shechem, and for the children of Hepher, and for the children of Shemida: these were the male chil
615, and saw his brother Benjamin, his mother's son, and said, Is this your younger brother, of whom ye spake unto me? And he said, God be gracious unto thee, my son. 
And Joseph made haste; for his bowels did yearn upon his brother: and he sought where to weep; and he entered into his chamber, and wept there. 
And he washed his face, and went out, and refrained himself, and said, Set on bread. 
And they set on for him by himself, and for them by themselves, and for the Egyptians, which did eat with him, by themselves: because the Egyptians might not eat bread with the Hebrews; for that is an abomination unto th
574,Moses, saying, 
The daughters of Zelophehad speak right: thou shalt surely give them a possession of an inheritance among their father's brethren; and thou shalt cause the inheritance of their father to pass unto them. 
And thou shalt speak unto the children of Israel, saying, If a man die, and have no son, then ye shall cause his inheritance to pass unto his daughter. 
And if he have no daughter, then ye shall give his inheritance unto his brethren. 
And if he have no brethren, then ye shall give his inheritance unto his father's brethren. 
And if his father have no 
730,of Ephraim, and Manasseh, Issachar, and Zebulun, had not cleansed themselves, yet did they eat the passover otherwise than it was written. But Hezekiah prayed for them, saying, The good LORD pardon every one 
That prepareth his heart to seek God, the LORD God of his fathers, though he be not cleansed according to the purification of the sanctuary. 
And the LORD hearkened to Hezekiah, and healed the people. 
And the children of Israel that were present at Jerusalem kept the feast of unleavened bread seven days with great gladness: and the Levites and the priests praised the LORD day by day, singing with loud instruments unto the LORD. 
And Hezekiah spake comfortably unto all the Levites that taught the good knowledge of t
595,m were made up, and that the breaches began to be stopped, then they were very wroth, 
And conspired all of them together to come and to fight against Jerusalem, and to hinder it. 
Nevertheless we made our prayer unto our God, and set a watch against them day and night, because of them. 
And Judah said, The strength of the bearers of burdens is decayed, and there is much rubbish; so that we are not able to build the wall. 
And our adversaries said, They shall not know, neither see, till we come in the midst among them, and slay them, and cause the work to cease. 
And it came to pass, that
566,t of the outward business of the house of God. 
And Mattaniah the son of Micha, the son of Zabdi, the son of Asaph, was the principal to begin the thanksgiving in prayer: and Bakbukiah the second among his brethren, and Abda the son of Shammua, the son of Galal, the son of Jeduthun. 
All the Levites in the holy city were two hundred fourscore and four. 
Moreover the porters, Akkub, Talmon, and their brethren that kept the gates, were an hundred seventy and two. 
And the residue of Israel, of the priests, and the Levites, were in all the cities of Judah, every 
562,m, and Adami, Nekeb, and Jabneel, unto Lakum; and the outgoings thereof were at Jordan: 
And then the coast turneth westward to Aznothtabor, and goeth out from thence to Hukkok, and reacheth to Zebulun on the south side, and reacheth to Asher on the west side, and to Judah upon Jordan toward the sunrising. 
And the fenced cities are Ziddim, Zer, and Hammath, Rakkath, and Chinnereth, 
And Adamah, and Ramah, and Hazor, 
And Kedesh, and Edrei, and Enhazor, 
And Iron, and Migdalel, Horem, and Bethanath, and Bethshemesh; nineteen cities with their villages. 
Th
663,ther shall men give them the cup of consolation to drink for their father or for their mother. 
Thou shalt not also go into the house of feasting, to sit with them to eat and to drink. 
For thus saith the LORD of hosts, the God of Israel; Behold, I will cause to cease out of this place in your eyes, and in your days, the voice of mirth, and the voice of gladness, the voice of the bridegroom, and the voice of the bride. 
And it shall come to pass, when thou shalt shew this people all these words, and they shall say unto thee, Wherefore hath the LORD pronounced all this great evil against us? or what is our iniquity? or what is our sin that we have committe
620,ll therein. 
What profiteth the graven image that the maker thereof hath graven it; the molten image, and a teacher of lies, that the maker of his work trusteth therein, to make dumb idols? 
Woe unto him that saith to the wood, Awake; to the dumb stone, Arise, it shall teach! Behold, it is laid over with gold and silver, and there is no breath at all in the midst of it. 
But the LORD is in his holy temple: let all the earth keep silence before him. 
A prayer of Habakkuk the prophet upon Shigionoth. 
O LORD, I have heard thy speech, and was afraid: O LORD, revive thy work in the midst of the years, in the midst of
764,. 
First, I thank my God through Jesus Christ for you all, that your faith is spoken of throughout the whole world. 
For God is my witness, whom I serve with my spirit in the gospel of his Son, that without ceasing I make mention of you always in my prayers; 
Making request, if by any means now at length I might have a prosperous journey by the will of God to come unto you. 
For I long to see you, that I may impart unto you some spiritual gift, to the end ye may be established; 
That is, that I may be comforted together with you by the mutual faith both of you and me. 
Now I would not have you ignorant, brethren, that oftentimes I purposed to come unto you, (but was let hitherto,) that I might have some fruit among you also, even as among other Gentiles.
654, unto the men, I know that the LORD hath given you the land, and that your terror is fallen upon us, and that all the inhabitants of the land faint because of you. 
For we have heard how the LORD dried up the water of the Red sea for you, when ye came out of Egypt; and what ye did unto the two kings of the Amorites, that were on the other side Jordan, Sihon and Og, whom ye utterly destroyed. 
And as soon as we had heard these things, our hearts did melt, neither did there remain any more courage in any man, because of you: for the LORD your God, he is God in heaven above, and in earth beneath. 
Now therefore, I pray you, swear unto me by the LORD
612, execution, in the day that the enemies of the Jews hoped to have power over them, (though it was turned to the contrary, that the Jews had rule over them that hated them;) 
The Jews gathered themselves together in their cities throughout all the provinces of the king Ahasuerus, to lay hand on such as sought their hurt: and no man could withstand them; for the fear of them fell upon all people. 
And all the rulers of the provinces, and the lieutenants, and the deputies, and officers of the king, helped the Jews; because the fear of Mordecai fell upon them. 
For Mordecai was great in the king's house, and 
738,ings; for they said, He is a leper: and Jotham his son reigned in his stead. 
Jotham was twenty and five years old when he began to reign, and he reigned sixteen years in Jerusalem. His mother's name also was Jerushah, the daughter of Zadok. 
And he did that which was right in the sight of the LORD, according to all that his father Uzziah did: howbeit he entered not into the temple of the LORD. And the people did yet corruptly. 
He built the high gate of the house of the LORD, and on the wall of Ophel he built much. 
Moreover he built cities in the mountains of Judah, and in the forests he built castles and towers. 
He fought also with the king of the Ammonites, and prevailed against them. And the children of Ammon gave him the 
690, 
Even those men that did bring up the evil report upon the land, died by the plague before the LORD. 
But Joshua the son of Nun, and Caleb the son of Jephunneh, which were of the men that went to search the land, lived still. 
And Moses told these sayings unto all the children of Israel: and the people mourned greatly. 
And they rose up early in the morning, and gat them up into the top of the mountain, saying, Lo, we be here, and will go up unto the place which the LORD hath promised: for we have sinned. 
And Moses said, Wherefore now do ye transgress the commandment of the LORD? but it shall not prosper. 
Go not up, for the LORD is not among you; that ye be not smitten before yo
797,f Cyrus king of Persia, even until the reign of Darius king of Persia. 
And in the reign of Ahasuerus, in the beginning of his reign, wrote they unto him an accusation against the inhabitants of Judah and Jerusalem. 
And in the days of Artaxerxes wrote Bishlam, Mithredath, Tabeel, and the rest of their companions, unto Artaxerxes king of Persia; and the writing of the letter was written in the Syrian tongue, and interpreted in the Syrian tongue. 
Rehum the chancellor and Shimshai the scribe wrote a letter against Jerusalem to Artaxerxes the king in this sort: 
Then wrote Rehum the chancellor, and Shimshai the scribe, and the rest of their companions; the Dinaites, the Apharsathchites, the Tarpelites, the Apharsites, the Archevites, the Babylonians, the Susanchites, the Dehavites, and th
646,fter receive for an inheritance, obeyed; and he went out, not knowing whither he went. 
By faith he sojourned in the land of promise, as in a strange country, dwelling in tabernacles with Isaac and Jacob, the heirs with him of the same promise: 
For he looked for a city which hath foundations, whose builder and maker is God. 
Through faith also Sara herself received strength to conceive seed, and was delivered of a child when she was past age, because she judged him faithful who had promised. 
Therefore sprang there even of one, and him as good as dead, so many as the stars of the sky in multitude, and as the sand which is by the sea shor
571, LORD, which he spake by the hand of his servant Ahijah the prophet. 
And the rest of the acts of Jeroboam, how he warred, and how he reigned, behold, they are written in the book of the chronicles of the kings of Israel. 
And the days which Jeroboam reigned were two and twenty years: and he slept with his fathers, and Nadab his son reigned in his stead. 
And Rehoboam the son of Solomon reigned in Judah. Rehoboam was forty and one years old when he began to reign, and he reigned seventeen years in Jerusalem, the city which the LORD did choose out of all the tribes 
710,h. 
And he said unto me, This chamber, whose prospect is toward the south, is for the priests, the keepers of the charge of the house. 
And the chamber whose prospect is toward the north is for the priests, the keepers of the charge of the altar: these are the sons of Zadok among the sons of Levi, which come near to the LORD to minister unto him. 
So he measured the court, an hundred cubits long, and an hundred cubits broad, foursquare; and the altar that was before the house. 
And he brought me to the porch of the house, and measured each post of the porch, five cubits on this side, and five cubits on that side: and the breadth of the gate was three cubits on this side, and three cubits on that side.
616,ing and evening, and to do according to all that is written in the law of the LORD, which he commanded Israel; 
And with them Heman and Jeduthun, and the rest that were chosen, who were expressed by name, to give thanks to the LORD, because his mercy endureth for ever; 
And with them Heman and Jeduthun with trumpets and cymbals for those that should make a sound, and with musical instruments of God. And the sons of Jeduthun were porters. 
And all the people departed every man to his house: and David returned to bless his house. 
Now it came to pass, as David sat in his house, that David said to Nathan the pro
591, comfort wherewith we ourselves are comforted of God. 
For as the sufferings of Christ abound in us, so our consolation also aboundeth by Christ. 
And whether we be afflicted, it is for your consolation and salvation, which is effectual in the enduring of the same sufferings which we also suffer: or whether we be comforted, it is for your consolation and salvation. 
And our hope of you is stedfast, knowing, that as ye are partakers of the sufferings, so shall ye be also of the consolation. 
For we would not, brethren, have you ignorant of our trouble which came to us in Asia, that we 
830,ering of Shelumiel the son of Zurishaddai. 
On the sixth day Eliasaph the son of Deuel, prince of the children of Gad, offered: 
His offering was one silver charger of the weight of an hundred and thirty shekels, a silver bowl of seventy shekels, after the shekel of the sanctuary; both of them full of fine flour mingled with oil for a meat offering: 
One golden spoon of ten shekels, full of incense: 
One young bullock, one ram, one lamb of the first year, for a burnt offering: 
One kid of the goats for a sin offering: 
And for a sacrifice of peace offerings, two oxen, five rams, five he goats, five lambs of the first year: this was the offering of Eliasaph the son of Deuel. 
On the seventh day Elishama the son of Ammihud, prince of the children of Ephraim, offered: 
His offering was one silver charger, the weight where
667, a golden reed to measure the city, and the gates thereof, and the wall thereof. 
And the city lieth foursquare, and the length is as large as the breadth: and he measured the city with the reed, twelve thousand furlongs. The length and the breadth and the height of it are equal. 
And he measured the wall thereof, an hundred and forty and four cubits, according to the measure of a man, that is, of the angel. 
And the building of the wall of it was of jasper: and the city was pure gold, like unto clear glass. 
And the foundations of the wall of the city were garnished with all manner of precious stones. The first foundation was jasper; the second, sapphire; th
696,Israel, and say, Ye mountains of Israel, hear the word of the LORD: 
Thus saith the Lord GOD; Because the enemy hath said against you, Aha, even the ancient high places are ours in possession: 
Therefore prophesy and say, Thus saith the Lord GOD; Because they have made you desolate, and swallowed you up on every side, that ye might be a possession unto the residue of the heathen, and ye are taken up in the lips of talkers, and are an infamy of the people: 
Therefore, ye mountains of Israel, hear the word of the Lord GOD; Thus saith the Lord GOD to the mountains, and to the hills, to the rivers, and to the valleys, to the desolate wastes, and to the cities that are forsaken, which became 
596,d. 
Belshazzar, whiles he tasted the wine, commanded to bring the golden and silver vessels which his father Nebuchadnezzar had taken out of the temple which was in Jerusalem; that the king, and his princes, his wives, and his concubines, might drink therein. 
Then they brought the golden vessels that were taken out of the temple of the house of God which was at Jerusalem; and the king, and his princes, his wives, and his concubines, drank in them. 
They drank wine, and praised the gods of gold, and of silver, of brass, of iron, of wood, and of stone. 
In the same hour came forth fingers o
704,and knowest not that thou art wretched, and miserable, and poor, and blind, and naked: 
I counsel thee to buy of me gold tried in the fire, that thou mayest be rich; and white raiment, that thou mayest be clothed, and that the shame of thy nakedness do not appear; and anoint thine eyes with eyesalve, that thou mayest see. 
As many as I love, I rebuke and chasten: be zealous therefore, and repent. 
Behold, I stand at the door, and knock: if any man hear my voice, and open the door, I will come in to him, and will sup with him, and he with me. 
To him that overcometh will I grant to sit with me in my throne, even as I also overcame, and am set down with my Father in his throne. 
He that hath an ea
688,nd at the hand of man; at the hand of every man's brother will I require the life of man. 
Whoso sheddeth man's blood, by man shall his blood be shed: for in the image of God made he man. 
And you, be ye fruitful, and multiply; bring forth abundantly in the earth, and multiply therein. 
And God spake unto Noah, and to his sons with him, saying, 
And I, behold, I establish my covenant with you, and with your seed after you; 
And with every living creature that is with you, of the fowl, of the cattle, and of every beast of the earth with you; from all that go out of the ark, to every beast of the earth. 
And I will establish my covenant with you, neither shall all flesh be cut off 
815,o is a wise man and endued with knowledge among you? let him shew out of a good conversation his works with meekness of wisdom. 
But if ye have bitter envying and strife in your hearts, glory not, and lie not against the truth. 
This wisdom descendeth not from above, but is earthly, sensual, devilish. 
For where envying and strife is, there is confusion and every evil work. 
But the wisdom that is from above is first pure, then peaceable, gentle, and easy to be intreated, full of mercy and good fruits, without partiality, and without hypocrisy. 
And the fruit of righteousness is sown in peace of them that make peace. 
From whence come wars and fightings among you? come they not hence, even of your lusts that war in your members? 
Ye lust, and have not: ye kill, and desire to have, and cannot obtain: ye f
776,, to him it is unclean. 
But if thy brother be grieved with thy meat, now walkest thou not charitably. Destroy not him with thy meat, for whom Christ died. 
Let not then your good be evil spoken of: 
For the kingdom of God is not meat and drink; but righteousness, and peace, and joy in the Holy Ghost. 
For he that in these things serveth Christ is acceptable to God, and approved of men. 
Let us therefore follow after the things which make for peace, and things wherewith one may edify another. 
For meat destroy not the work of God. All things indeed are pure; but it is evil for that man who eateth with offence. 
It is good neither to eat flesh, nor to drink wine, nor any thing whereby thy brother stumbleth, or is offended, or is made weak. 
Hast thou faith? have it t
749,very cornfloor. 
The floor and the winepress shall not feed them, and the new wine shall fail in her. 
They shall not dwell in the LORD's land; but Ephraim shall return to Egypt, and they shall eat unclean things in Assyria. 
They shall not offer wine offerings to the LORD, neither shall they be pleasing unto him: their sacrifices shall be unto them as the bread of mourners; all that eat thereof shall be polluted: for their bread for their soul shall not come into the house of the LORD. 
What will ye do in the solemn day, and in the day of the feast of the LORD? 
For, lo, they are gone because of destruction: Egypt shall gather them up, Memphis shall bury them: the pleasant places for their silver, nettles shall possess them: thorns shall 
691, the male and his female: and of beasts that are not clean by two, the male and his female. 
Of fowls also of the air by sevens, the male and the female; to keep seed alive upon the face of all the earth. 
For yet seven days, and I will cause it to rain upon the earth forty days and forty nights; and every living substance that I have made will I destroy from off the face of the earth. 
And Noah did according unto all that the LORD commanded him. 
And Noah was six hundred years old when the flood of waters was upon the earth. 
And Noah went in, and his sons, and his wife, and his sons' wives with him, into the ark, because of the waters of the flood. 
Of clean beasts, and of beasts 
788,Aaron thy brother, and his sons, that he may minister unto me in the priest's office. 
And they shall take gold, and blue, and purple, and scarlet, and fine linen. 
And they shall make the ephod of gold, of blue, and of purple, of scarlet, and fine twined linen, with cunning work. 
It shall have the two shoulderpieces thereof joined at the two edges thereof; and so it shall be joined together. 
And the curious girdle of the ephod, which is upon it, shall be of the same, according to the work thereof; even of gold, of blue, and purple, and scarlet, and fine twined linen. 
And thou shalt take two onyx stones, and grave on them the names of the children of Israel: 
Six of their names on one stone, and the other six names of the rest on the other stone, according to their birth. 
W
721,was Jehohanan the captain, and with him two hundred and fourscore thousand. 
And next him was Amasiah the son of Zichri, who willingly offered himself unto the LORD; and with him two hundred thousand mighty men of valour. 
And of Benjamin; Eliada a mighty man of valour, and with him armed men with bow and shield two hundred thousand. 
And next him was Jehozabad, and with him an hundred and fourscore thousand ready prepared for the war. 
These waited on the king, beside those whom the king put in the fenced cities throughout all Judah. 
Now Jehoshaphat had riches and honour in abundance, and joined affinity with Ahab. 
And after certain years he went down to Ahab to Samaria. And Ahab killed sheep and oxen for him
603, the king said, He also bringeth tidings. 
And the watchman said, Me thinketh the running of the foremost is like the running of Ahimaaz the son of Zadok. And the king said, He is a good man, and cometh with good tidings. 
And Ahimaaz called, and said unto the king, All is well. And he fell down to the earth upon his face before the king, and said, Blessed be the LORD thy God, which hath delivered up the men that lifted up their hand against my lord the king. 
And the king said, Is the young man Absalom safe? And Ahimaaz answered, When Joab sent the king's servant, and me thy servant, I saw a gre
789,from my mother's womb: if I be shaven, then my strength will go from me, and I shall become weak, and be like any other man. 
And when Delilah saw that he had told her all his heart, she sent and called for the lords of the Philistines, saying, Come up this once, for he hath shewed me all his heart. Then the lords of the Philistines came up unto her, and brought money in their hand. 
And she made him sleep upon her knees; and she called for a man, and she caused him to shave off the seven locks of his head; and she began to afflict him, and his strength went from him. 
And she said, The Philistines be upon thee, Samson. And he awoke out of his sleep, and said, I will go out as at other times before, and shake myself. And he wist not that the LORD was departed from him. 
But the 
752,inces also did sit and speak against me: but thy servant did meditate in thy statutes. 
Thy testimonies also are my delight and my counsellors.leth. 
My soul cleaveth unto the dust: quicken thou me according to thy word. 
I have declared my ways, and thou heardest me: teach me thy statutes. 
Make me to understand the way of thy precepts: so shall I talk of thy wondrous works. 
My soul melteth for heaviness: strengthen thou me according unto thy word. 
Remove from me the way of lying: and grant me thy law graciously. 
I have chosen the way of truth: thy judgments have I laid before me. 
I have stuck unto thy testimonies: O LORD, put me not to shame. 
I will run the way of thy commandments, when thou shalt enlarge my heart. 
Teach me, O LORD, t
717,gregation; and thou shalt give them unto the Levites, to every man according to his service. 
And Moses took the wagons and the oxen, and gave them unto the Levites. 
Two wagons and four oxen he gave unto the sons of Gershon, according to their service: 
And four wagons and eight oxen he gave unto the sons of Merari, according unto their service, under the hand of Ithamar the son of Aaron the priest. 
But unto the sons of Kohath he gave none: because the service of the sanctuary belonging unto them was that they should bear upon their shoulders. 
And the princes offered for dedicating of the altar in the day that it was anointed, even the princes offered their offering before the altar. 
And the LORD said un
665,all amazed and marvelled, saying one to another, Behold, are not all these which speak Galilaeans? 
And how hear we every man in our own tongue, wherein we were born? 
Parthians, and Medes, and Elamites, and the dwellers in Mesopotamia, and in Judaea, and Cappadocia, in Pontus, and Asia, 
Phrygia, and Pamphylia, in Egypt, and in the parts of Libya about Cyrene, and strangers of Rome, Jews and proselytes, 
Cretes and Arabians, we do hear them speak in our tongues the wonderful works of God. 
And they were all amazed, and were in doubt, saying one to another, What meaneth this? 
Others mocking said, These men are full of new wine. 
But Peter, standing up with
576,I will send the sword, the famine, and the pestilence, among them, till they be consumed from off the land that I gave unto them and to their fathers. 
The word that came to Jeremiah concerning all the people of Judah in the fourth year of Jehoiakim the son of Josiah king of Judah, that was the first year of Nebuchadrezzar king of Babylon; 
The which Jeremiah the prophet spake unto all the people of Judah, and to all the inhabitants of Jerusalem, saying, 
From the thirteenth year of Josiah the son of Amon king of Judah, even unto this day, that is the three and twentiet
595,s; and when he seeth the blood upon the lintel, and on the two side posts, the LORD will pass over the door, and will not suffer the destroyer to come in unto your houses to smite you. 
And ye shall observe this thing for an ordinance to thee and to thy sons for ever. 
And it shall come to pass, when ye be come to the land which the LORD will give you, according as he hath promised, that ye shall keep this service. 
And it shall come to pass, when your children shall say unto you, What mean ye by this service? 
That ye shall say, It is the sacrifice of the LORD's passover, who passed over
682,y against them, prophesy, O son of man. 
And the Spirit of the LORD fell upon me, and said unto me, Speak; Thus saith the LORD; Thus have ye said, O house of Israel: for I know the things that come into your mind, every one of them. 
Ye have multiplied your slain in this city, and ye have filled the streets thereof with the slain. 
Therefore thus saith the Lord GOD; Your slain whom ye have laid in the midst of it, they are the flesh, and this city is the caldron: but I will bring you forth out of the midst of it. 
Ye have feared the sword; and I will bring a sword upon you, saith the Lord GOD. 
And I will bring you out of the midst thereof, and deliver you into the hands of
818,et the ark of God upon a new cart, and brought it out of the house of Abinadab that was in Gibeah: and Uzzah and Ahio, the sons of Abinadab, drave the new cart. 
And they brought it out of the house of Abinadab which was at Gibeah, accompanying the ark of God: and Ahio went before the ark. 
And David and all the house of Israel played before the LORD on all manner of instruments made of fir wood, even on harps, and on psalteries, and on timbrels, and on cornets, and on cymbals. 
And when they came to Nachon's threshingfloor, Uzzah put forth his hand to the ark of God, and took hold of it; for the oxen shook it. 
And the anger of the LORD was kindled against Uzzah; and God smote him there for his error; and there he died by the ark of God. 
And David was displeased, because the LORD had made a breach upon Uz
820,his? who will hearken and hear for the time to come? 
Who gave Jacob for a spoil, and Israel to the robbers? did not the LORD, he against whom we have sinned? for they would not walk in his ways, neither were they obedient unto his law. 
Therefore he hath poured upon him the fury of his anger, and the strength of battle: and it hath set him on fire round about, yet he knew not; and it burned him, yet he laid it not to heart. 
But now thus saith the LORD that created thee, O Jacob, and he that formed thee, O Israel, Fear not: for I have redeemed thee, I have called thee by thy name; thou art mine. 
When thou passest through the waters, I will be with thee; and through the rivers, they shall not overflow thee: when thou walkest through the fire, thou shalt not be burned; neither shall the flame kindle upon thee
833,forward my calamity, they have no helper. 
They came upon me as a wide breaking in of waters: in the desolation they rolled themselves upon me. 
Terrors are turned upon me: they pursue my soul as the wind: and my welfare passeth away as a cloud. 
And now my soul is poured out upon me; the days of affliction have taken hold upon me. 
My bones are pierced in me in the night season: and my sinews take no rest. 
By the great force of my disease is my garment changed: it bindeth me about as the collar of my coat. 
He hath cast me into the mire, and I am become like dust and ashes. 
I cry unto thee, and thou dost not hear me: I stand up, and thou regardest me not. 
Thou art become cruel to me: with thy strong hand thou opposest thyself against me. 
Thou liftest me up to the wind; thou causest me to ride upon it, and dissolvest 
629,look to the altars, the work of his hands, neither shall respect that which his fingers have made, either the groves, or the images. 
In that day shall his strong cities be as a forsaken bough, and an uppermost branch, which they left because of the children of Israel: and there shall be desolation. 
Because thou hast forgotten the God of thy salvation, and hast not been mindful of the rock of thy strength, therefore shalt thou plant pleasant plants, and shalt set it with strange slips: 
In the day shalt thou make thy plant to grow, and in the morning shalt thou make thy seed to flourish: but the harvest shall be a heap i
663, you, nor choose you, because ye were more in number than any people; for ye were the fewest of all people: 
But because the LORD loved you, and because he would keep the oath which he had sworn unto your fathers, hath the LORD brought you out with a mighty hand, and redeemed you out of the house of bondmen, from the hand of Pharaoh king of Egypt. 
Know therefore that the LORD thy God, he is God, the faithful God, which keepeth covenant and mercy with them that love him and keep his commandments to a thousand generations; 
And repayeth them that hate him to their face, to destroy them: he will not be slack to him that hateth him, he will repay him to his 
570,ven up the ghost; her sun is gone down while it was yet day: she hath been ashamed and confounded: and the residue of them will I deliver to the sword before their enemies, saith the LORD. 
Woe is me, my mother, that thou hast borne me a man of strife and a man of contention to the whole earth! I have neither lent on usury, nor men have lent to me on usury; yet every one of them doth curse me. 
The LORD said, Verily it shall be well with thy remnant; verily I will cause the enemy to entreat thee well in the time of evil and in the time of affliction. 
Shall iron b
663,
And thou shalt offer peace offerings, and shalt eat there, and rejoice before the LORD thy God. 
And thou shalt write upon the stones all the words of this law very plainly. 
And Moses and the priests the Levites spake unto all Israel, saying, Take heed, and hearken, O Israel; this day thou art become the people of the LORD thy God. 
Thou shalt therefore obey the voice of the LORD thy God, and do his commandments and his statutes, which I command thee this day. 
And Moses charged the people the same day, saying, 
These shall stand upon mount Gerizim to bless the people, when ye are come over Jordan; Simeon, and Levi, and Judah, and Issachar, and Joseph, 
656,take peace from the earth, and that they should kill one another: and there was given unto him a great sword. 
And when he had opened the third seal, I heard the third beast say, Come and see. And I beheld, and lo a black horse; and he that sat on him had a pair of balances in his hand. 
And I heard a voice in the midst of the four beasts say, A measure of wheat for a penny, and three measures of barley for a penny; and see thou hurt not the oil and the wine. 
And when he had opened the fourth seal, I heard the voice of the fourth beast say, Come and see. 
And I looked, and behold a pale horse: and his name that sat on him was Death, and Hell follo
761,ldren of Tabbaoth, 
The children of Keros, the children of Sia, the children of Padon, 
The children of Lebana, the children of Hagaba, the children of Shalmai, 
The children of Hanan, the children of Giddel, the children of Gahar, 
The children of Reaiah, the children of Rezin, the children of Nekoda, 
The children of Gazzam, the children of Uzza, the children of Phaseah, 
The children of Besai, the children of Meunim, the children of Nephishesim, 
The children of Bakbuk, the children of Hakupha, the children of Harhur, 
The children of Bazlith, the children of Mehida, the children of Harsha, 
The children of Barkos, the children of Sisera, the children of Tamah, 
The children of Neziah, the children of Hatipha. 
The children of Solomon's servants: t
648,evertheless when the Son of man cometh, shall he find faith on the earth? 
And he spake this parable unto certain which trusted in themselves that they were righteous, and despised others: 
Two men went up into the temple to pray; the one a Pharisee, and the other a publican. 
The Pharisee stood and prayed thus with himself, God, I thank thee, that I am not as other men are, extortioners, unjust, adulterers, or even as this publican. 
I fast twice in the week, I give tithes of all that I possess. 
And the publican, standing afar off, would not lift up so much as his eyes unto heaven, but smote upon his breast, saying, God be merciful to me 
831, let them not feed, nor drink water: 
But let man and beast be covered with sackcloth, and cry mightily unto God: yea, let them turn every one from his evil way, and from the violence that is in their hands. 
Who can tell if God will turn and repent, and turn away from his fierce anger, that we perish not? 
And God saw their works, that they turned from their evil way; and God repented of the evil, that he had said that he would do unto them; and he did it not. 
But it displeased Jonah exceedingly, and he was very angry. 
And he prayed unto the LORD, and said, I pray thee, O LORD, was not this my saying, when I was yet in my country? Therefore I fled before unto Tarshish: for I knew that thou art a gracious God, and merciful, slow to anger, and of great kindness, and repentest thee of the evil. 
Therefore now, O LORD, t
697, salt, and burning, that it is not sown, nor beareth, nor any grass groweth therein, like the overthrow of Sodom, and Gomorrah, Admah, and Zeboim, which the LORD overthrew in his anger, and in his wrath: 
Even all nations shall say, Wherefore hath the LORD done thus unto this land? what meaneth the heat of this great anger? 
Then men shall say, Because they have forsaken the covenant of the LORD God of their fathers, which he made with them when he brought them forth out of the land of Egypt: 
For they went and served other gods, and worshipped them, gods whom they knew not, and whom he had not given unto them: 
And the anger of the LORD was kindled against this land, to bring upon it all
753,d Asaph of old there were chief of the singers, and songs of praise and thanksgiving unto God. 
And all Israel in the days of Zerubbabel, and in the days of Nehemiah, gave the portions of the singers and the porters, every day his portion: and they sanctified holy things unto the Levites; and the Levites sanctified them unto the children of Aaron. 
On that day they read in the book of Moses in the audience of the people; and therein was found written, that the Ammonite and the Moabite should not come into the congregation of God for ever; 
Because they met not the children of Israel with bread and with water, but hired Balaam against them, that he should curse them: howbeit our God turned the curse into a blessing. 
Now it came to pass, when t
739,im, because he is his friend, yet because of his importunity he will rise and give him as many as he needeth. 
And I say unto you, Ask, and it shall be given you; seek, and ye shall find; knock, and it shall be opened unto you. 
For every one that asketh receiveth; and he that seeketh findeth; and to him that knocketh it shall be opened. 
If a son shall ask bread of any of you that is a father, will he give him a stone? or if he ask a fish, will he for a fish give him a serpent? 
Or if he shall ask an egg, will he offer him a scorpion? 
If ye then, being evil, know how to give good gifts unto your children: how much more shall your heavenly Father give the Holy Spirit to them that ask him? 
And he was casting out a devil, and it 
572,Israel, and take of every one of them a rod according to the house of their fathers, of all their princes according to the house of their fathers twelve rods: write thou every man's name upon his rod. 
And thou shalt write Aaron's name upon the rod of Levi: for one rod shall be for the head of the house of their fathers. 
And thou shalt lay them up in the tabernacle of the congregation before the testimony, where I will meet with you. 
And it shall come to pass, that the man's rod, whom I shall choose, shall blossom: and I will make to cease from me the murmurings o
810,ve, and in earth beneath. 
Now therefore, I pray you, swear unto me by the LORD, since I have shewed you kindness, that ye will also shew kindness unto my father's house, and give me a true token: 
And that ye will save alive my father, and my mother, and my brethren, and my sisters, and all that they have, and deliver our lives from death. 
And the men answered her, Our life for yours, if ye utter not this our business. And it shall be, when the LORD hath given us the land, that we will deal kindly and truly with thee. 
Then she let them down by a cord through the window: for her house was upon the town wall, and she dwelt upon the wall. 
And she said unto them, Get you to the mountain, lest the pursuers meet you; and hide yourselves there three days, until the pursuers be returned: and afterward m
673, in order a declaration of those things which are most surely believed among us, 
Even as they delivered them unto us, which from the beginning were eyewitnesses, and ministers of the word; 
It seemed good to me also, having had perfect understanding of all things from the very first, to write unto thee in order, most excellent Theophilus, 
That thou mightest know the certainty of those things, wherein thou hast been instructed. 
THERE was in the days of Herod, the king of Judaea, a certain priest named Zacharias, of the course of Abia: and his wife was of the daughters of Aaron, and her name was Elisabeth. 
And they were both righteous before God, walking in all t
748, runneth down with rivers of water for the destruction of the daughter of my people. 
Mine eye trickleth down, and ceaseth not, without any intermission. 
Till the LORD look down, and behold from heaven. 
Mine eye affecteth mine heart because of all the daughters of my city. 
Mine enemies chased me sore, like a bird, without cause. 
They have cut off my life in the dungeon, and cast a stone upon me. 
Waters flowed over mine head; then I said, I am cut off. 
I called upon thy name, O LORD, out of the low dungeon. 
Thou hast heard my voice: hide not thine ear at my breathing, at my cry. 
Thou drewest near in the day that I called upon thee: thou saidst, Fear not. 
O LORD, thou hast pleaded the causes of my soul; thou hast redeemed my life. 
827,of these things before me? 
Then said Paul, I stand at Caesar's judgment seat, where I ought to be judged: to the Jews have I done no wrong, as thou very well knowest. 
For if I be an offender, or have committed any thing worthy of death, I refuse not to die: but if there be none of these things whereof these accuse me, no man may deliver me unto them. I appeal unto Caesar. 
Then Festus, when he had conferred with the council, answered, Hast thou appealed unto Caesar? unto Caesar shalt thou go. 
And after certain days king Agrippa and Bernice came unto Caesarea to salute Festus. 
And when they had been there many days, Festus declared Paul's cause unto the king, saying, There is a certain man left in bonds by Felix: 
About whom, when I was at Jerusalem, the chief priests and the elders of the Jews informed me, desir
811,say, Repent: for the kingdom of heaven is at hand. 
And Jesus, walking by the sea of Galilee, saw two brethren, Simon called Peter, and Andrew his brother, casting a net into the sea: for they were fishers. 
And he saith unto them, Follow me, and I will make you fishers of men. 
And they straightway left their nets, and followed him. 
And going on from thence, he saw other two brethren, James the son of Zebedee, and John his brother, in a ship with Zebedee their father, mending their nets; and he called them. 
And they immediately left the ship and their father, and followed him. 
And Jesus went about all Galilee, teaching in their synagogues, and preaching the gospel of the kingdom, and healing all manner of sickness and all manner of disease among the people. 
And his fame went throughout all Syria
579,at he toucheth which hath the issue, shall be broken: and every vessel of wood shall be rinsed in water. 
And when he that hath an issue is cleansed of his issue; then he shall number to himself seven days for his cleansing, and wash his clothes, and bathe his flesh in running water, and shall be clean. 
And on the eighth day he shall take to him two turtledoves, or two young pigeons, and come before the LORD unto the door of the tabernacle of the congregation, and give them unto the priest: 
And the priest shall offer them, the one for a sin offering, and the other for a 
665,orn to fight, they have remained in their holds: their might hath failed; they became as women: they have burned her dwellingplaces; her bars are broken. 
One post shall run to meet another, and one messenger to meet another, to shew the king of Babylon that his city is taken at one end, 
And that the passages are stopped, and the reeds they have burned with fire, and the men of war are affrighted. 
For thus saith the LORD of hosts, the God of Israel; The daughter of Babylon is like a threshingfloor, it is time to thresh her: yet a little while, and the time of her harvest shall come. 
Nebuchadrezzar the king of Babylon hath devoured me, he hath crushed me,
712, 
And Judah took a wife for Er his firstborn, whose name was Tamar. 
And Er, Judah's firstborn, was wicked in the sight of the LORD; and the LORD slew him. 
And Judah said unto Onan, Go in unto thy brother's wife, and marry her, and raise up seed to thy brother. 
And Onan knew that the seed should not be his; and it came to pass, when he went in unto his brother's wife, that he spilled it on the ground, lest that he should give seed to his brother. 
And the thing which he did displeased the LORD: wherefore he slew him also. 
Then said Judah to Tamar his daughter in law, Remain a widow at thy father's house, till Shelah my son be grown: for he said, Lest peradventure he die also, as his brethren did. And
671,d, and go up into the mountain: 
And see the land, what it is, and the people that dwelleth therein, whether they be strong or weak, few or many; 
And what the land is that they dwell in, whether it be good or bad; and what cities they be that they dwell in, whether in tents, or in strong holds; 
And what the land is, whether it be fat or lean, whether there be wood therein, or not. And be ye of good courage, and bring of the fruit of the land. Now the time was the time of the firstripe grapes. 
So they went up, and searched the land from the wilderness of Zin unto Rehob, as men come to Hamath. 
And they ascended by the south, and came unto Hebron; where Ahiman, 
648,the wicked. 
He becometh poor that dealeth with a slack hand: but the hand of the diligent maketh rich. 
He that gathereth in summer is a wise son: but he that sleepeth in harvest is a son that causeth shame. 
Blessings are upon the head of the just: but violence covereth the mouth of the wicked. 
The memory of the just is blessed: but the name of the wicked shall rot. 
The wise in heart will receive commandments: but a prating fool shall fall. 
He that walketh uprightly walketh surely: but he that perverteth his ways shall be known. 
He that winketh with the eye causeth sorrow: but a prating fool shall fall. 
The mouth of a righteous man i
711,d that he may bless thee before his death. 
And Jacob said to Rebekah his mother, Behold, Esau my brother is a hairy man, and I am a smooth man: 
My father peradventure will feel me, and I shall seem to him as a deceiver; and I shall bring a curse upon me, and not a blessing. 
And his mother said unto him, Upon me be thy curse, my son: only obey my voice, and go fetch me them. 
And he went, and fetched, and brought them to his mother: and his mother made savoury meat, such as his father loved. 
And Rebekah took goodly raiment of her eldest son Esau, which were with her in the house, and put them upon Jacob her younger son: 
And she put the skins of the kids of the goats upon his hands, and upon the smo
812,it was, when he came to David, that he fell to the earth, and did obeisance. 
And David said unto him, From whence comest thou? And he said unto him, Out of the camp of Israel am I escaped. 
And David said unto him, How went the matter? I pray thee, tell me. And he answered, That the people are fled from the battle, and many of the people also are fallen and dead; and Saul and Jonathan his son are dead also. 
And David said unto the young man that told him, How knowest thou that Saul and Jonathan his son be dead? 
And the young man that told him said, As I happened by chance upon mount Gilboa, behold, Saul leaned upon his spear; and, lo, the chariots and horsemen followed hard after him. 
And when he looked behind him, he saw me, and called unto me. And I answered, Here am I. 
And he said unto me, Who
576,d me. 
I am thine, save me: for I have sought thy precepts. 
The wicked have waited for me to destroy me: but I will consider thy testimonies. 
I have seen an end of all perfection: but thy commandment is exceeding broad. 
O how I love thy law! it is my meditation all the day. 
Thou through thy commandments hast made me wiser than mine enemies: for they are ever with me. 
I have more understanding than all my teachers: for thy testimonies are my meditation. 
I understand more than the ancients, because I keep thy precepts. 
I have refrained my feet from every evil way, 
808,he son of Benaiah, and Abiathar: and the general of the king's army was Joab. 
And David assembled all the princes of Israel, the princes of the tribes, and the captains of the companies that ministered to the king by course, and the captains over the thousands, and captains over the hundreds, and the stewards over all the substance and possession of the king, and of his sons, with the officers, and with the mighty men, and with all the valiant men, unto Jerusalem. 
Then David the king stood up upon his feet, and said, Hear me, my brethren, and my people: As for me, I had in mine heart to build an house of rest for the ark of the covenant of the LORD, and for the footstool of our God, and had made ready for the building: 
But God said unto me, Thou shalt not build an house for my name, because tho
795,welt in their stead: 
As he did to the children of Esau, which dwelt in Seir, when he destroyed the Horims from before them; and they succeeded them, and dwelt in their stead even unto this day: 
And the Avims which dwelt in Hazerim, even unto Azzah, the Caphtorims, which came forth out of Caphtor, destroyed them, and dwelt in their stead.) 
Rise ye up, take your journey, and pass over the river Arnon: behold, I have given into thine hand Sihon the Amorite, king of Heshbon, and his land: begin to possess it, and contend with him in battle. 
This day will I begin to put the dread of thee and the fear of thee upon the nations that are under the whole heaven, who shall hear report of thee, and shall tremble, and be in anguish because of thee. 
And I sent messengers out of the wilderness 
618,ill live for ever, and not see corruption. 
For he seeth that wise men die, likewise the fool and the brutish person perish, and leave their wealth to others. 
Their inward thought is, that their houses shall continue for ever, and their dwelling places to all generations; they call their lands after their own names. 
Nevertheless man being in honour abideth not: he is like the beasts that perish. 
This their way is their folly: yet their posterity approve their sayings. Selah. 
Like sheep they are laid in the grave; death shall feed on them; and the upright shall have dominion over them in the morning; and the
775,soever any is bold, (I speak foolishly,) I am bold also. 
Are they Hebrews? so am I. Are they Israelites? so am I. Are they the seed of Abraham? so am I. 
Are they ministers of Christ? (I speak as a fool) I am more; in labours more abundant, in stripes above measure, in prisons more frequent, in deaths oft. 
Of the Jews five times received I forty stripes save one. 
Thrice was I beaten with rods, once was I stoned, thrice I suffered shipwreck, a night and a day I have been in the deep; 
In journeyings often, in perils of waters, in perils of robbers, in perils by mine own countrymen, in perils by the heathen, in perils in the city, in perils in the wilderness, in perils in the sea, in perils among false brethren; 
In weariness and painfulness, in watchings often, i
713,fetters, and be holden in cords of affliction; 
Then he sheweth them their work, and their transgressions that they have exceeded. 
He openeth also their ear to discipline, and commandeth that they return from iniquity. 
If they obey and serve him, they shall spend their days in prosperity, and their years in pleasures. 
But if they obey not, they shall perish by the sword, and they shall die without knowledge. 
But the hypocrites in heart heap up wrath: they cry not when he bindeth them. 
They die in youth, and their life is among the unclean. 
He delivereth the poor in his affliction, and openeth their ears in oppression. 
Even so would he have removed thee out of the strait into a broad place, where t
802,tion of words and names, and of your law, look ye to it; for I will be no judge of such matters. 
And he drave them from the judgment seat. 
Then all the Greeks took Sosthenes, the chief ruler of the synagogue, and beat him before the judgment seat. And Gallio cared for none of those things. 
And Paul after this tarried there yet a good while, and then took his leave of the brethren, and sailed thence into Syria, and with him Priscilla and Aquila; having shorn his head in Cenchrea: for he had a vow. 
And he came to Ephesus, and left them there: but he himself entered into the synagogue, and reasoned with the Jews. 
When they desired him to tarry longer time with them, he consented not; 
But bade them farewell, saying, I must by all means keep this feast that cometh in Jerusalem: but I will r
624,ten, My house shall be called of all nations the house of prayer? but ye have made it a den of thieves. 
And the scribes and chief priests heard it, and sought how they might destroy him: for they feared him, because all the people was astonished at his doctrine. 
And when even was come, he went out of the city. 
And in the morning, as they passed by, they saw the fig tree dried up from the roots. 
And Peter calling to remembrance saith unto him, Master, behold, the fig tree which thou cursedst is withered away. 
And Jesus answering saith unto them, Have faith in God. 
For verily I say unto you, That whosoever shall 
631,d I said, No, my lord. 
Then said he, These are the two anointed ones, that stand by the LORD of the whole earth. 
Then I turned, and lifted up mine eyes, and looked, and behold a flying roll. 
And he said unto me, What seest thou? And I answered, I see a flying roll; the length thereof is twenty cubits, and the breadth thereof ten cubits. 
Then said he unto me, This is the curse that goeth forth over the face of the whole earth: for every one that stealeth shall be cut off as on this side according to it; and every one that sweareth shall be cut off as on that side according to it. 
I will bring it forth, saith the LORD of
754,whereas thou wast naked and bare. 
Now when I passed by thee, and looked upon thee, behold, thy time was the time of love; and I spread my skirt over thee, and covered thy nakedness: yea, I sware unto thee, and entered into a covenant with thee, saith the Lord GOD, and thou becamest mine. 
Then washed I thee with water; yea, I throughly washed away thy blood from thee, and I anointed thee with oil. 
I clothed thee also with broidered work, and shod thee with badgers' skin, and I girded thee about with fine linen, and I covered thee with silk. 
I decked thee also with ornaments, and I put bracelets upon thy hands, and a chain on thy neck. 
And I put a jewel on thy forehead, and earrings in thine ears, and a beautiful crown upon thine head. 
Thus
731,o shall dash the young men to pieces; and they shall have no pity on the fruit of the womb; their eyes shall not spare children. 
And Babylon, the glory of kingdoms, the beauty of the Chaldees' excellency, shall be as when God overthrew Sodom and Gomorrah. 
It shall never be inhabited, neither shall it be dwelt in from generation to generation: neither shall the Arabian pitch tent there; neither shall the shepherds make their fold there. 
But wild beasts of the desert shall lie there; and their houses shall be full of doleful creatures; and owls shall dwell there, and satyrs shall dance there. 
And the wild beasts of the islands shall cry in their desolate houses, and dragons in their pleasant palaces: and her time is nea
779,he sons of Eliphaz the firstborn son of Esau; duke Teman, duke Omar, duke Zepho, duke Kenaz, 
Duke Korah, duke Gatam, and duke Amalek: these are the dukes that came of Eliphaz in the land of Edom; these were the sons of Adah. 
And these are the sons of Reuel Esau's son; duke Nahath, duke Zerah, duke Shammah, duke Mizzah: these are the dukes that came of Reuel in the land of Edom; these are the sons of Bashemath Esau's wife. 
And these are the sons of Aholibamah Esau's wife; duke Jeush, duke Jaalam, duke Korah: these were the dukes that came of Aholibamah the daughter of Anah, Esau's wife. 
These are the sons of Esau, who is Edom, and these are their dukes. 
These are the sons of Seir the Horite, who inhabited the land; Lotan, and Shobal, and Zibeon, and Anah, 
And Dish
786,e their worm dieth not, and the fire is not quenched. 
And if thy foot offend thee, cut it off: it is better for thee to enter halt into life, than having two feet to be cast into hell, into the fire that never shall be quenched: 
Where their worm dieth not, and the fire is not quenched. 
And if thine eye offend thee, pluck it out: it is better for thee to enter into the kingdom of God with one eye, than having two eyes to be cast into hell fire: 
Where their worm dieth not, and the fire is not quenched. 
For every one shall be salted with fire, and every sacrifice shall be salted with salt. 
Salt is good: but if the salt have lost his saltness, wherewith will ye season it? Have salt in yourselves, and have peace one with another. 
And he arose from thence, and cometh into th
725,s spread abroad. 
And the border of the Canaanites was from Sidon, as thou comest to Gerar, unto Gaza; as thou goest, unto Sodom, and Gomorrah, and Admah, and Zeboim, even unto Lasha. 
These are the sons of Ham, after their families, after their tongues, in their countries, and in their nations. 
Unto Shem also, the father of all the children of Eber, the brother of Japheth the elder, even to him were children born. 
The children of Shem; Elam, and Asshur, and Arphaxad, and Lud, and Aram. 
And the children of Aram; Uz, and Hul, and Gether, and Mash. 
And Arphaxad begat Salah; and Salah begat Eber. 
And unto Eber were born two sons: the name of one was Peleg; for in his days was the earth divided; and his brother's n
788,n his ass, and his two servants were with him. 
And the ass saw the angel of the LORD standing in the way, and his sword drawn in his hand: and the ass turned aside out of the way, and went into the field: and Balaam smote the ass, to turn her into the way. 
But the angel of the LORD stood in a path of the vineyards, a wall being on this side, and a wall on that side. 
And when the ass saw the angel of the LORD, she thrust herself unto the wall, and crushed Balaam's foot against the wall: and he smote her again. 
And the angel of the LORD went further, and stood in a narrow place, where was no way to turn either to the right hand or to the left. 
And when the ass saw the angel of the LORD, she fell down under Balaam: and Balaam's anger was kindled, and he smote the ass with a s
628,rs whom ye have left shall fall by the sword. 
And ye shall do as I have done: ye shall not cover your lips, nor eat the bread of men. 
And your tires shall be upon your heads, and your shoes upon your feet: ye shall not mourn nor weep; but ye shall pine away for your iniquities, and mourn one toward another. 
Thus Ezekiel is unto you a sign: according to all that he hath done shall ye do: and when this cometh, ye shall know that I am the Lord GOD. 
Also, thou son of man, shall it not be in the day when I take from them their strength, the joy of their glory, the desire of their eyes, and that whereupon they set their mi
580,d. 
For the husband is the head of the wife, even as Christ is the head of the church: and he is the saviour of the body. 
Therefore as the church is subject unto Christ, so let the wives be to their own husbands in every thing. 
Husbands, love your wives, even as Christ also loved the church, and gave himself for it; 
That he might sanctify and cleanse it with the washing of water by the word, 
That he might present it to himself a glorious church, not having spot, or wrinkle, or any such thing; but that it should be holy and without blemish. 
So ought men to love their wi
561,nswered the king, The man that consumed us, and that devised against us that we should be destroyed from remaining in any of the coasts of Israel, 
Let seven men of his sons be delivered unto us, and we will hang them up unto the LORD in Gibeah of Saul, whom the LORD did choose. And the king said, I will give them. 
But the king spared Mephibosheth, the son of Jonathan the son of Saul, because of the LORD's oath that was between them, between David and Jonathan the son of Saul. 
But the king took the two sons of Rizpah the daughter of Aiah, whom she bare 
821,ites that inhabited Zephath, and utterly destroyed it. And the name of the city was called Hormah. 
Also Judah took Gaza with the coast thereof, and Askelon with the coast thereof, and Ekron with the coast thereof. 
And the LORD was with Judah; and he drave out the inhabitants of the mountain; but could not drive out the inhabitants of the valley, because they had chariots of iron. 
And they gave Hebron unto Caleb, as Moses said: and he expelled thence the three sons of Anak. 
And the children of Benjamin did not drive out the Jebusites that inhabited Jerusalem; but the Jebusites dwell with the children of Benjamin in Jerusalem unto this day. 
And the house of Joseph, they also went up against Bethel: and the LORD was with them. 
And the house of Joseph sent to descry Bethel. (Now the name of the city before w
581, which is, The sons of thunder: 
And Andrew, and Philip, and Bartholomew, and Matthew, and Thomas, and James the son of Alphaeus, and Thaddaeus, and Simon the Canaanite, 
And Judas Iscariot, which also betrayed him: and they went into an house. 
And the multitude cometh together again, so that they could not so much as eat bread. 
And when his friends heard of it, they went out to lay hold on him: for they said, He is beside himself. 
And the scribes which came down from Jerusalem said, He hath Beelzebub, and by the prince of the devils casteth he out devils. 
And he called 
633,d portions, and to make great mirth, because they had understood the words that were declared unto them. 
And on the second day were gathered together the chief of the fathers of all the people, the priests, and the Levites, unto Ezra the scribe, even to understand the words of the law. 
And they found written in the law which the LORD had commanded by Moses, that the children of Israel should dwell in booths in the feast of the seventh month: 
And that they should publish and proclaim in all their cities, and in Jerusalem, saying, Go forth unto the mount, and fetch olive branches, and pine branches, and myrtle branches, and 
685,it might be a shadow over his head, to deliver him from his grief. So Jonah was exceeding glad of the gourd. 
But God prepared a worm when the morning rose the next day, and it smote the gourd that it withered. 
And it came to pass, when the sun did arise, that God prepared a vehement east wind; and the sun beat upon the head of Jonah, that he fainted, and wished in himself to die, and said, It is better for me to die than to live. 
And God said to Jonah, Doest thou well to be angry for the gourd? And he said, I do well to be angry, even unto death. 
Then said the LORD, Thou hast had pity on the gourd, for the which thou hast not laboured, neither madest it grow; which came up
716,t unto Christ, so let the wives be to their own husbands in every thing. 
Husbands, love your wives, even as Christ also loved the church, and gave himself for it; 
That he might sanctify and cleanse it with the washing of water by the word, 
That he might present it to himself a glorious church, not having spot, or wrinkle, or any such thing; but that it should be holy and without blemish. 
So ought men to love their wives as their own bodies. He that loveth his wife loveth himself. 
For no man ever yet hated his own flesh; but nourisheth and cherisheth it, even as the Lord the church: 
For we are members of his body, of his flesh, and of his bones. 
For this cause shall a man leave his father and mother, 
650,l the members of that one body, being many, are one body: so also is Christ. 
For by one Spirit are we all baptized into one body, whether we be Jews or Gentiles, whether we be bond or free; and have been all made to drink into one Spirit. 
For the body is not one member, but many. 
If the foot shall say, Because I am not the hand, I am not of the body; is it therefore not of the body? 
And if the ear shall say, Because I am not the eye, I am not of the body; is it therefore not of the body? 
If the whole body were an eye, where were the hearing? If the whole were hearing, where were the smelling? 
But now hath God set the members every one o
797,ording to his burden: thus were they numbered of him, as the LORD commanded Moses. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses, saying, 
Command the children of Israel, that they put out of the camp every leper, and every one that hath an issue, and whosoever is defiled by the dead: 
Both male and female shall ye put out, without the camp shall ye put them; that they defile not their camps, in the midst whereof I dwell. 
And the children of Israel did so, and put them out without the camp: as the LORD spake unto Moses, so did the children of Israel. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses, saying, 
Speak unto the children of Israel, When a man or woman shall commit any sin that men commit, to do a trespass against the LORD, and that person be guilty; 
Then they shall confess their sin which they have done: a
805,, but by Beelzebub the prince of the devils. 
And Jesus knew their thoughts, and said unto them, Every kingdom divided against itself is brought to desolation; and every city or house divided against itself shall not stand: 
And if Satan cast out Satan, he is divided against himself; how shall then his kingdom stand? 
And if I by Beelzebub cast out devils, by whom do your children cast them out? therefore they shall be your judges. 
But if I cast out devils by the Spirit of God, then the kingdom of God is come unto you. 
Or else how can one enter into a strong man's house, and spoil his goods, except he first bind the strong man? and then he will spoil his house. 
He that is not with me is against me; and he that gathereth not with me scattereth abroad. 
Wherefore I say unto you, All manner of 
593,ions beyond you, and not to boast in another man's line of things made ready to our hand. 
But he that glorieth, let him glory in the Lord. 
For not he that commendeth himself is approved, but whom the Lord commendeth. 
Would to God ye could bear with me a little in my folly: and indeed bear with me. 
For I am jealous over you with godly jealousy: for I have espoused you to one husband, that I may present you as a chaste virgin to Christ. 
But I fear, lest by any means, as the serpent beguiled Eve through his subtilty, so your minds should be corrupted from the simplicity that is in Chr
811,ng arose very early in the morning, and went in haste unto the den of lions. 
And when he came to the den, he cried with a lamentable voice unto Daniel: and the king spake and said to Daniel, O Daniel, servant of the living God, is thy God, whom thou servest continually, able to deliver thee from the lions? 
Then said Daniel unto the king, O king, live for ever. 
My God hath sent his angel, and hath shut the lions' mouths, that they have not hurt me: forasmuch as before him innocency was found in me; and also before thee, O king, have I done no hurt. 
Then was the king exceedingly glad for him, and commanded that they should take Daniel up out of the den. So Daniel was taken up out of the den, and no manner of hurt was found upon him, because he believed in his God. 
And the king commanded, and they 
613,a. 
And the Babylonians came to her into the bed of love, and they defiled her with their whoredom, and she was polluted with them, and her mind was alienated from them. 
So she discovered her whoredoms, and discovered her nakedness: then my mind was alienated from her, like as my mind was alienated from her sister. 
Yet she multiplied her whoredoms, in calling to remembrance the days of her youth, wherein she had played the harlot in the land of Egypt. 
For she doted upon their paramours, whose flesh is as the flesh of asses, and whose issue is like the issue of horses. 
Thus thou calledst to remembrance 
758,in of Jacob shall be upon a land of corn and wine; also his heavens shall drop down dew. 
Happy art thou, O Israel: who is like unto thee, O people saved by the LORD, the shield of thy help, and who is the sword of thy excellency! and thine enemies shall be found liars unto thee; and thou shalt tread upon their high places. 
And Moses went up from the plains of Moab unto the mountain of Nebo, to the top of Pisgah, that is over against Jericho. And the LORD shewed him all the land of Gilead, unto Dan, 
And all Naphtali, and the land of Ephraim, and Manasseh, and all the land of Judah, unto the utmost sea, 
And the south, and the plain of the valley of Jericho, the city of palm trees, unto Zoar. 
And the LORD said unto him, This is the land which I s
674,ly, and godly, in this present world; 
Looking for that blessed hope, and the glorious appearing of the great God and our Saviour Jesus Christ; 
Who gave himself for us, that he might redeem us from all iniquity, and purify unto himself a peculiar people, zealous of good works. 
These things speak, and exhort, and rebuke with all authority. Let no man despise thee. 
Put them in mind to be subject to principalities and powers, to obey magistrates, to be ready to every good work, 
To speak evil of no man, to be no brawlers, but gentle, shewing all meekness unto all men. 
For we ourselves also were sometimes foolish, disobedient, deceived, serving divers lusts and plea
647,e a bill of divorcement, and to put her away. 
And Jesus answered and said unto them, For the hardness of your heart he wrote you this precept. 
But from the beginning of the creation God made them male and female. 
For this cause shall a man leave his father and mother, and cleave to his wife; 
And they twain shall be one flesh: so then they are no more twain, but one flesh. 
What therefore God hath joined together, let not man put asunder. 
And in the house his disciples asked him again of the same matter. 
And he saith unto them, Whosoever shall put away his wife, and marry another, committeth adultery against her. 
And if a woman shall
827,Philistine shall be as one of them, seeing he hath defied the armies of the living God. 
David said moreover, The LORD that delivered me out of the paw of the lion, and out of the paw of the bear, he will deliver me out of the hand of this Philistine. And Saul said unto David, Go, and the LORD be with thee. 
And Saul armed David with his armour, and he put an helmet of brass upon his head; also he armed him with a coat of mail. 
And David girded his sword upon his armour, and he assayed to go; for he had not proved it. And David said unto Saul, I cannot go with these; for I have not proved them. And David put them off him. 
And he took his staff in his hand, and chose him five smooth stones out of the brook, and put them in a shepherd's bag which he had, even in a scrip; and his sling was in his hand: and he drew ne
634,iah, and Rephaiah, and Uzziel, the sons of Ishi. 
And they smote the rest of the Amalekites that were escaped, and dwelt there unto this day. 
Now the sons of Reuben the firstborn of Israel, (for he was the firstborn; but forasmuch as he defiled his father's bed, his birthright was given unto the sons of Joseph the son of Israel: and the genealogy is not to be reckoned after the birthright. 
For Judah prevailed above his brethren, and of him came the chief ruler; but the birthright was Joseph's:) 
The sons, I say, of Reuben the firstborn of Israel were, Hanoch, and Pallu, Hezron, and Carmi. 
The sons of Joel; Shemaiah his son,
830,me, saith the LORD, that I will punish all them which are circumcised with the uncircumcised; 
Egypt, and Judah, and Edom, and the children of Ammon, and Moab, and all that are in the utmost corners, that dwell in the wilderness: for all these nations are uncircumcised, and all the house of Israel are uncircumcised in the heart. 
Hear ye the word which the LORD speaketh unto you, O house of Israel: 
Thus saith the LORD, Learn not the way of the heathen, and be not dismayed at the signs of heaven; for the heathen are dismayed at them. 
For the customs of the people are vain: for one cutteth a tree out of the forest, the work of the hands of the workman, with the axe. 
They deck it with silver and with gold; they fasten it with nails and with hammers, that it move not. 
They are upright as the palm tree, but speak not: t
810, goats. 
And he came to the sheepcotes by the way, where was a cave; and Saul went in to cover his feet: and David and his men remained in the sides of the cave. 
And the men of David said unto him, Behold the day of which the LORD said unto thee, Behold, I will deliver thine enemy into thine hand, that thou mayest do to him as it shall seem good unto thee. Then David arose, and cut off the skirt of Saul's robe privily. 
And it came to pass afterward, that David's heart smote him, because he had cut off Saul's skirt. 
And he said unto his men, The LORD forbid that I should do this thing unto my master, the LORD's anointed, to stretch forth mine hand against him, seeing he is the anointed of the LORD. 
So David stayed his servants with these words, and suffered them not to rise against Saul. But Saul
672,e mount, and the voice of the trumpet exceeding loud; so that all the people that was in the camp trembled. 
And Moses brought forth the people out of the camp to meet with God; and they stood at the nether part of the mount. 
And mount Sinai was altogether on a smoke, because the LORD descended upon it in fire: and the smoke thereof ascended as the smoke of a furnace, and the whole mount quaked greatly. 
And when the voice of the trumpet sounded long, and waxed louder and louder, Moses spake, and God answered him by a voice. 
And the LORD came down upon mount Sinai, on the top of the mount: and the LORD called Moses up to the top of the mount; and Moses went up. 
623,roth. 
There went up a smoke out of his nostrils, and fire out of his mouth devoured: coals were kindled by it. 
He bowed the heavens also, and came down; and darkness was under his feet. 
And he rode upon a cherub, and did fly: and he was seen upon the wings of the wind. 
And he made darkness pavilions round about him, dark waters, and thick clouds of the skies. 
Through the brightness before him were coals of fire kindled. 
The LORD thundered from heaven, and the most High uttered his voice. 
And he sent out arrows, and scattered them; lightning, and discomfited them. 
And the channels of the sea appeared, the fou
562, hand: as it seemeth good and right unto thee to do unto us, do. 
And so did he unto them, and delivered them out of the hand of the children of Israel, that they slew them not. 
And Joshua made them that day hewers of wood and drawers of water for the congregation, and for the altar of the LORD, even unto this day, in the place which he should choose. 
Now it came to pass, when Adonizedec king of Jerusalem had heard how Joshua had taken Ai, and had utterly destroyed it; as he had done to Jericho and her king, so he had done to Ai and her king; and how the
740,do according to this thing: 
Behold, the money, which we found in our sacks' mouths, we brought again unto thee out of the land of Canaan: how then should we steal out of thy lord's house silver or gold? 
With whomsoever of thy servants it be found, both let him die, and we also will be my lord's bondmen. 
And he said, Now also let it be according unto your words: he with whom it is found shall be my servant; and ye shall be blameless. 
Then they speedily took down every man his sack to the ground, and opened every man his sack. 
And he searched, and began at the eldest, and left at the youngest: and the cup was found in Benjamin's sack. 
Then they rent their clothes, and laded every man his ass, and returned to the city. 
And Jud
839,And their meat offering of flour mingled with oil, three tenth deals unto one bullock, two tenth deals unto one ram, 
A several tenth deal unto one lamb, throughout the seven lambs; 
And one kid of the goats, to make an atonement for you. 
Ye shall offer them beside the continual burnt offering, and his meat offering, (they shall be unto you without blemish) and their drink offerings. 
And in the seventh month, on the first day of the month, ye shall have an holy convocation; ye shall do no servile work: it is a day of blowing the trumpets unto you. 
And ye shall offer a burnt offering for a sweet savour unto the LORD; one young bullock, one ram, and seven lambs of the first year without blemish: 
And their meat offering shall be of flour mingled with oil, three tenth deals for a bullock, and two tenth deals for a ram, 
And one
769,hered all Israel together to Jerusalem, to bring up the ark of the LORD unto his place, which he had prepared for it. 
And David assembled the children of Aaron, and the Levites: 
Of the sons of Kohath; Uriel the chief, and his brethren an hundred and twenty: 
Of the sons of Merari; Asaiah the chief, and his brethren two hundred and twenty: 
Of the sons of Gershom; Joel the chief and his brethren an hundred and thirty: 
Of the sons of Elizaphan; Shemaiah the chief, and his brethren two hundred: 
Of the sons of Hebron; Eliel the chief, and his brethren fourscore: 
Of the sons of Uzziel; Amminadab the chief, and his brethren an hundred and twelve. 
And David called for Zadok and Abiathar the priests, and for the Levites, for Uriel, Asaiah, and Joel, Shemaiah, a
573,ad began to grow again after he was shaven. 
Then the lords of the Philistines gathered them together for to offer a great sacrifice unto Dagon their god, and to rejoice: for they said, Our god hath delivered Samson our enemy into our hand. 
And when the people saw him, they praised their god: for they said, Our god hath delivered into our hands our enemy, and the destroyer of our country, which slew many of us. 
And it came to pass, when their hearts were merry, that they said, Call for Samson, that he may make us sport. And they called for Samson out of the prison 
693,ents, and put them upon Eleazar his son: and Aaron shall be gathered unto his people, and shall die there. 
And Moses did as the LORD commanded: and they went up into mount Hor in the sight of all the congregation. 
And Moses stripped Aaron of his garments, and put them upon Eleazar his son; and Aaron died there in the top of the mount: and Moses and Eleazar came down from the mount. 
And when all the congregation saw that Aaron was dead, they mourned for Aaron thirty days, even all the house of Israel. 
And when king Arad the Canaanite, which dwelt in the south, heard tell that Israel came by the way of the spies; then he fought against Israel, and took some of them prisoners. 
And I
840, sought to lay hands on the king Ahasuerus. 
And the thing was known to Mordecai, who told it unto Esther the queen; and Esther certified the king thereof in Mordecai's name. 
And when inquisition was made of the matter, it was found out; therefore they were both hanged on a tree: and it was written in the book of the chronicles before the king. 
After these things did king Ahasuerus promote Haman the son of Hammedatha the Agagite, and advanced him, and set his seat above all the princes that were with him. 
And all the king's servants, that were in the king's gate, bowed, and reverenced Haman: for the king had so commanded concerning him. But Mordecai bowed not, nor did him reverence. 
Then the king's servants, which were in the king's gate, said unto Mordecai, Why transgressest thou the king's commandment? 
Now it came to pass
591,hou shalt offer at even: 
And with the one lamb a tenth deal of flour mingled with the fourth part of an hin of beaten oil; and the fourth part of an hin of wine for a drink offering. 
And the other lamb thou shalt offer at even, and shalt do thereto according to the meat offering of the morning, and according to the drink offering thereof, for a sweet savour, an offering made by fire unto the LORD. 
This shall be a continual burnt offering throughout your generations at the door of the tabernacle of the congregation before the LORD: where I will meet you, to speak there unto thee. 
A
685,ar that was in Shechem. 
And when they told it to Jotham, he went and stood in the top of mount Gerizim, and lifted up his voice, and cried, and said unto them, Hearken unto me, ye men of Shechem, that God may hearken unto you. 
The trees went forth on a time to anoint a king over them; and they said unto the olive tree, Reign thou over us. 
But the olive tree said unto them, Should I leave my fatness, wherewith by me they honour God and man, and go to be promoted over the trees? 
And the trees said to the fig tree, Come thou, and reign over us. 
But the fig tree said unto them, Should I forsake my sweetness, and my good fruit, and go to be promoted over the trees? 
Then said 
773,If my covenant be not with day and night, and if I have not appointed the ordinances of heaven and earth; 
Then will I cast away the seed of Jacob and David my servant, so that I will not take any of his seed to be rulers over the seed of Abraham, Isaac, and Jacob: for I will cause their captivity to return, and have mercy on them. 
The word which came unto Jeremiah from the LORD, when Nebuchadnezzar king of Babylon, and all his army, and all the kingdoms of the earth of his dominion, and all the people, fought against Jerusalem, and against all the cities thereof, saying, 
Thus saith the LORD, the God of Israel; Go and speak to Zedekiah king of Judah, and tell him, Thus saith the LORD; Behold, I will give this city into the hand of the king of Babylon, and he sh
608,it was meet for no work: how much less shall it be meet yet for any work, when the fire hath devoured it, and it is burned? 
Therefore thus saith the Lord GOD; As the vine tree among the trees of the forest, which I have given to the fire for fuel, so will I give the inhabitants of Jerusalem. 
And I will set my face against them; they shall go out from one fire, and another fire shall devour them; and ye shall know that I am the LORD, when I set my face against them. 
And I will make the land desolate, because they have committed a trespass, saith the Lord GOD. 
Again the word of the LORD came unto me
603,shouldest thou be as a stranger in the land, and as a wayfaring man that turneth aside to tarry for a night? 
Why shouldest thou be as a man astonied, as a mighty man that cannot save? yet thou, O LORD, art in the midst of us, and we are called by thy name; leave us not. 
Thus saith the LORD unto this people, Thus have they loved to wander, they have not refrained their feet, therefore the LORD doth not accept them; he will now remember their iniquity, and visit their sins. 
Then said the LORD unto me, Pray not for this people for their good. 
When they fast, I will not hear their cry; and when t
627, answered him and said, Lord, if it be thou, bid me come unto thee on the water. 
And he said, Come. And when Peter was come down out of the ship, he walked on the water, to go to Jesus. 
But when he saw the wind boisterous, he was afraid; and beginning to sink, he cried, saying, Lord, save me. 
And immediately Jesus stretched forth his hand, and caught him, and said unto him, O thou of little faith, wherefore didst thou doubt? 
And when they were come into the ship, the wind ceased. 
Then they that were in the ship came and worshipped him, saying, Of a truth thou art the Son of God. 
And when they were gone over, they 
626,you, and make up beforehand your bounty, whereof ye had notice before, that the same might be ready, as a matter of bounty, and not as of covetousness. 
But this I say, He which soweth sparingly shall reap also sparingly; and he which soweth bountifully shall reap also bountifully. 
Every man according as he purposeth in his heart, so let him give; not grudgingly, or of necessity: for God loveth a cheerful giver. 
And God is able to make all grace abound toward you; that ye, always having all sufficiency in all things, may abound to every good work: 
(As it is written, He hath dispersed abroad; he hath given to the poo
666,nd I am set in my ward whole nights: 
And, behold, here cometh a chariot of men, with a couple of horsemen. And he answered and said, Babylon is fallen, is fallen; and all the graven images of her gods he hath broken unto the ground. 
O my threshing, and the corn of my floor: that which I have heard of the LORD of hosts, the God of Israel, have I declared unto you. 
The burden of Dumah. He calleth to me out of Seir, Watchman, what of the night? Watchman, what of the night? 
The watchman said, The morning cometh, and also the night: if ye will enquire, enquire ye: return, come. 
The burden upon Arabia. In the forest in Arabia shall ye lodge, O ye travelling c
692,nations the LORD thy God doth drive them out from before thee. 
Thou shalt be perfect with the LORD thy God. 
For these nations, which thou shalt possess, hearkened unto observers of times, and unto diviners: but as for thee, the LORD thy God hath not suffered thee so to do. 
The LORD thy God will raise up unto thee a Prophet from the midst of thee, of thy brethren, like unto me; unto him ye shall hearken; 
According to all that thou desiredst of the LORD thy God in Horeb in the day of the assembly, saying, Let me not hear again the voice of the LORD my God, neither let me see this great fire any more, that I die not. 
And the LORD said unto me, They have well spoken that which they 
561,ion. 
And Jesus sat over against the treasury, and beheld how the people cast money into the treasury: and many that were rich cast in much. 
And there came a certain poor widow, and she threw in two mites, which make a farthing. 
And he called unto him his disciples, and saith unto them, Verily I say unto you, That this poor widow hath cast more in, than all they which have cast into the treasury: 
For all they did cast in of their abundance; but she of her want did cast in all that she had, even all her living. 
And as he went out of the temple, one of 
591,uds; 
Yet he shall perish for ever like his own dung: they which have seen him shall say, Where is he? 
He shall fly away as a dream, and shall not be found: yea, he shall be chased away as a vision of the night. 
The eye also which saw him shall see him no more; neither shall his place any more behold him. 
His children shall seek to please the poor, and his hands shall restore their goods. 
His bones are full of the sin of his youth, which shall lie down with him in the dust. 
Though wickedness be sweet in his mouth, though he hide it under his tongue; 
Though he spare it, and forsa
579,ift up thine eyes now the way toward the north. So I lifted up mine eyes the way toward the north, and behold northward at the gate of the altar this image of jealousy in the entry. 
He said furthermore unto me, Son of man, seest thou what they do? even the great abominations that the house of Israel committeth here, that I should go far off from my sanctuary? but turn thee yet again, and thou shalt see greater abominations. 
And he brought me to the door of the court; and when I looked, behold a hole in the wall. 
Then said he unto me, Son of man, dig now in the wall: and
836,d the daughter of Ahab to wife: and he wrought that which was evil in the eyes of the LORD. 
Howbeit the LORD would not destroy the house of David, because of the covenant that he had made with David, and as he promised to give a light to him and to his sons for ever. 
In his days the Edomites revolted from under the dominion of Judah, and made themselves a king. 
Then Jehoram went forth with his princes, and all his chariots with him: and he rose up by night, and smote the Edomites which compassed him in, and the captains of the chariots. 
So the Edomites revolted from under the hand of Judah unto this day. The same time also did Libnah revolt from under his hand; because he had forsaken the LORD God of his fathers. 
Moreover he made high places in the mountains of Judah and caused the inhabitants of Jerusalem to commit for
822,thanoth, and Eltekon; six cities with their villages: 
Kirjathbaal, which is Kirjathjearim, and Rabbah; two cities with their villages: 
In the wilderness, Betharabah, Middin, and Secacah, 
And Nibshan, and the city of Salt, and Engedi; six cities with their villages. 
As for the Jebusites the inhabitants of Jerusalem, the children of Judah could not drive them out; but the Jebusites dwell with the children of Judah at Jerusalem unto this day. 
And the lot of the children of Joseph fell from Jordan by Jericho, unto the water of Jericho on the east, to the wilderness that goeth up from Jericho throughout mount Bethel, 
And goeth out from Bethel to Luz, and passeth along unto the borders of Archi to Ataroth, 
And goeth down westward to the coast of Japhleti, unto the coast of Bethhoron the nether, and to Gezer; a
623,nsume them at once, lest the beasts of the field increase upon thee. 
But the LORD thy God shall deliver them unto thee, and shall destroy them with a mighty destruction, until they be destroyed. 
And he shall deliver their kings into thine hand, and thou shalt destroy their name from under heaven: there shall no man be able to stand before thee, until thou have destroyed them. 
The graven images of their gods shall ye burn with fire: thou shalt not desire the silver or gold that is on them, nor take it unto thee, lest thou be snared therin: for it is an abomination to the LORD thy God. 
Neither shalt thou bring an 
828, winked at; but now commandeth all men every where to repent: 
Because he hath appointed a day, in the which he will judge the world in righteousness by that man whom he hath ordained; whereof he hath given assurance unto all men, in that he hath raised him from the dead. 
And when they heard of the resurrection of the dead, some mocked: and others said, We will hear thee again of this matter. 
So Paul departed from among them. 
Howbeit certain men clave unto him, and believed: among the which was Dionysius the Areopagite, and a woman named Damaris, and others with them. 
After these things Paul departed from Athens, and came to Corinth; 
And found a certain Jew named Aquila, born in Pontus, lately come from Italy, with his wife Priscilla; (because that Claudius had commanded all Jews to depart from Rome:) and came u
619, an hundred round about. 
And the captain of the guard took Seraiah the chief priest, and Zephaniah the second priest, and the three keepers of the door: 
He took also out of the city an eunuch, which had the charge of the men of war; and seven men of them that were near the king's person, which were found in the city; and the principal scribe of the host, who mustered the people of the land; and threescore men of the people of the land, that were found in the midst of the city. 
So Nebuzaradan the captain of the guard took them, and brought them to the king of Babylon to Riblah. 
And the king of Babylon smote t
615, God of his salvation. 
This is the generation of them that seek him, that seek thy face, O Jacob. Selah. 
Lift up your heads, O ye gates; and be ye lift up, ye everlasting doors; and the King of glory shall come in. 
Who is this King of glory? The LORD strong and mighty, the LORD mighty in battle. 
Lift up your heads, O ye gates; even lift them up, ye everlasting doors; and the King of glory shall come in. 
Who is this King of glory? The LORD of hosts, he is the King of glory. Selah. 
Unto thee, O LORD, do I lift up my soul. 
O my God, I trust in thee: let me not be ashamed, let not mine enemies triumph ove
625,us go over unto the garrison of these uncircumcised: it may be that the LORD will work for us: for there is no restraint to the LORD to save by many or by few. 
And his armourbearer said unto him, Do all that is in thine heart: turn thee; behold, I am with thee according to thy heart. 
Then said Jonathan, Behold, we will pass over unto these men, and we will discover ourselves unto them. 
If they say thus unto us, Tarry until we come to you; then we will stand still in our place, and will not go up unto them. 
But if they say thus, Come up unto us; then we will go up: for the LORD hath delivered them into our hand: an
804,standing the journey that thou takest shall not be for thine honour; for the LORD shall sell Sisera into the hand of a woman. And Deborah arose, and went with Barak to Kedesh. 
And Barak called Zebulun and Naphtali to Kedesh; and he went up with ten thousand men at his feet: and Deborah went up with him. 
Now Heber the Kenite, which was of the children of Hobab the father in law of Moses, had severed himself from the Kenites, and pitched his tent unto the plain of Zaanaim, which is by Kedesh. 
And they shewed Sisera that Barak the son of Abinoam was gone up to mount Tabor. 
And Sisera gathered together all his chariots, even nine hundred chariots of iron, and all the people that were with him, from Harosheth of the Gentiles unto the river of Kishon. 
And Deborah said unto Barak, Up; for this i
824,, and pulled away the shoulder, and stopped their ears, that they should not hear. 
Yea, they made their hearts as an adamant stone, lest they should hear the law, and the words which the LORD of hosts hath sent in his spirit by the former prophets: therefore came a great wrath from the LORD of hosts. 
Therefore it is come to pass, that as he cried, and they would not hear; so they cried, and I would not hear, saith the LORD of hosts: 
But I scattered them with a whirlwind among all the nations whom they knew not. Thus the land was desolate after them, that no man passed through nor returned: for they laid the pleasant land desolate. 
Again the word of the LORD of hosts came to me, saying, 
Thus saith the LORD of hosts; I was jealous for Zion with great jealousy, and I was jealous for her with great fury. 
Thus s
803,to answer, and for this I make haste. 
I have heard the check of my reproach, and the spirit of my understanding causeth me to answer. 
Knowest thou not this of old, since man was placed upon earth, 
That the triumphing of the wicked is short, and the joy of the hypocrite but for a moment? 
Though his excellency mount up to the heavens, and his head reach unto the clouds; 
Yet he shall perish for ever like his own dung: they which have seen him shall say, Where is he? 
He shall fly away as a dream, and shall not be found: yea, he shall be chased away as a vision of the night. 
The eye also which saw him shall see him no more; neither shall his place any more behold him. 
His children shall seek to please the poor, and his hands shall restore their goods. 
His bones are full of the sin of his 
612, then shalt thou arise, and get thee up into the place which the LORD thy God shall choose; 
And thou shalt come unto the priests the Levites, and unto the judge that shall be in those days, and enquire; and they shall shew thee the sentence of judgment: 
And thou shalt do according to the sentence, which they of that place which the LORD shall choose shall shew thee; and thou shalt observe to do according to all that they inform thee: 
According to the sentence of the law which they shall teach thee, and according to the judgment which they shall tell thee, thou shalt do: thou shalt not decline from the 
580,on for us with groanings which cannot be uttered. 
And he that searcheth the hearts knoweth what is the mind of the Spirit, because he maketh intercession for the saints according to the will of God. 
And we know that all things work together for good to them that love God, to them who are the called according to his purpose. 
For whom he did foreknow, he also did predestinate to be conformed to the image of his Son, that he might be the firstborn among many brethren. 
Moreover whom he did predestinate, them he also called: and whom he called, them he also justified: and wh
701, and Bildad the Shuhite, and Zophar the Naamathite: for they had made an appointment together to come to mourn with him and to comfort him. 
And when they lifted up their eyes afar off, and knew him not, they lifted up their voice, and wept; and they rent every one his mantle, and sprinkled dust upon their heads toward heaven. 
So they sat down with him upon the ground seven days and seven nights, and none spake a word unto him: for they saw that his grief was very great. 
After this opened Job his mouth, and cursed his day. 
And Job spake, and said, 
Let the day perish wherein I was born, and the night in which it was said, There is a man child conceived. 
Let that day be darkness; let not G
618,ed down thine altars; and I am left alone, and they seek my life. 
But what saith the answer of God unto him? I have reserved to myself seven thousand men, who have not bowed the knee to the image of Baal. 
Even so then at this present time also there is a remnant according to the election of grace. 
And if by grace, then is it no more of works: otherwise grace is no more grace. But if it be of works, then it is no more grace: otherwise work is no more work. 
What then? Israel hath not obtained that which he seeketh for; but the election hath obtained it, and the rest were blinded. 
(According as it is written,
826,f our state, and of our kindred, saying, Is your father yet alive? have ye another brother? and we told him according to the tenor of these words: could we certainly know that he would say, Bring your brother down? 
And Judah said unto Israel his father, Send the lad with me, and we will arise and go; that we may live, and not die, both we, and thou, and also our little ones. 
I will be surety for him; of my hand shalt thou require him: if I bring him not unto thee, and set him before thee, then let me bear the blame for ever: 
For except we had lingered, surely now we had returned this second time. 
And their father Israel said unto them, If it must be so now, do this; take of the best fruits in the land in your vessels, and carry down the man a present, a little balm, and a little honey, spices, and myrrh, nuts, 
815,es, and said unto them, Why have ye done this thing, and have saved the men children alive? 
And the midwives said unto Pharaoh, Because the Hebrew women are not as the Egyptian women; for they are lively, and are delivered ere the midwives come in unto them. 
Therefore God dealt well with the midwives: and the people multiplied, and waxed very mighty. 
And it came to pass, because the midwives feared God, that he made them houses. 
And Pharaoh charged all his people, saying, Every son that is born ye shall cast into the river, and every daughter ye shall save alive. 
And there went a man of the house of Levi, and took to wife a daughter of Levi. 
And the woman conceived, and bare a son: and when she saw him that he was a goodly child, she hid him three months. 
And when she could not longer hide him, sh
634, year after the children of Israel were come out of the land of Egypt, in the first day of the fifth month. 
And Aaron was an hundred and twenty and three years old when he died in mount Hor. 
And king Arad the Canaanite, which dwelt in the south in the land of Canaan, heard of the coming of the children of Israel. 
And they departed from mount Hor, and pitched in Zalmonah. 
And they departed from Zalmonah, and pitched in Punon. 
And they departed from Punon, and pitched in Oboth. 
And they departed from Oboth, and pitched in Ijeabarim, in the border of Moab. 
And they departed from Iim, and pitched in Dibongad. 
And they remo
758, children which God hath given me. 
Forasmuch then as the children are partakers of flesh and blood, he also himself likewise took part of the same; that through death he might destroy him that had the power of death, that is, the devil; 
And deliver them who through fear of death were all their lifetime subject to bondage. 
For verily he took not on him the nature of angels; but he took on him the seed of Abraham. 
Wherefore in all things it behoved him to be made like unto his brethren, that he might be a merciful and faithful high priest in things pertaining to God, to make reconciliation for the sins of the people. 
For in that he himself hath suffered being tempted, he is able to succour them that are tempted. 
Wherefore, holy brethren, partak
742,d for a shew make long prayers: the same shall receive greater damnation. 
And he looked up, and saw the rich men casting their gifts into the treasury. 
And he saw also a certain poor widow casting in thither two mites. 
And he said, Of a truth I say unto you, that this poor widow hath cast in more than they all: 
For all these have of their abundance cast in unto the offerings of God: but she of her penury hath cast in all the living that she had. 
And as some spake of the temple, how it was adorned with goodly stones and gifts, he said, 
As for these things which ye behold, the days will come, in the which there shall not be left one stone upon another, that shall not be thrown down. 
And they asked him, saying, Master, but when 
634,r portion: therefore in their land they shall possess the double: everlasting joy shall be unto them. 
For I the LORD love judgment, I hate robbery for burnt offering; and I will direct their work in truth, and I will make an everlasting covenant with them. 
And their seed shall be known among the Gentiles, and their offspring among the people: all that see them shall acknowledge them, that they are the seed which the LORD hath blessed. 
I will greatly rejoice in the LORD, my soul shall be joyful in my God; for he hath clothed me with the garments of salvation, he hath covered me with the robe of righteousness, as a bridegroom
699, give heed to any of his words. 
Give heed to me, O LORD, and hearken to the voice of them that contend with me. 
Shall evil be recompensed for good? for they have digged a pit for my soul. Remember that I stood before thee to speak good for them, and to turn away thy wrath from them. 
Therefore deliver up their children to the famine, and pour out their blood by the force of the sword; and let their wives be bereaved of their children, and be widows; and let their men be put to death; let their young men be slain by the sword in battle. 
Let a cry be heard from their houses, when thou shalt bring a troop suddenly upon them: for they have digged a pit to take me, and hid snares for my feet.
758,herein was found written, that the Ammonite and the Moabite should not come into the congregation of God for ever; 
Because they met not the children of Israel with bread and with water, but hired Balaam against them, that he should curse them: howbeit our God turned the curse into a blessing. 
Now it came to pass, when they had heard the law, that they separated from Israel all the mixed multitude. 
And before this, Eliashib the priest, having the oversight of the chamber of the house of our God, was allied unto Tobiah: 
And he had prepared for him a great chamber, where aforetime they laid the meat offerings, the frankincense, and the vessels, and the tithes of the corn, the new wine, and the oil, which was commanded to be given to the Levites, a
792, is at rest, and is quiet: they break forth into singing. 
Yea, the fir trees rejoice at thee, and the cedars of Lebanon, saying, Since thou art laid down, no feller is come up against us. 
Hell from beneath is moved for thee to meet thee at thy coming: it stirreth up the dead for thee, even all the chief ones of the earth; it hath raised up from their thrones all the kings of the nations. 
All they shall speak and say unto thee, Art thou also become weak as we? art thou become like unto us? 
Thy pomp is brought down to the grave, and the noise of thy viols: the worm is spread under thee, and the worms cover thee. 
How art thou fallen from heaven, O Lucifer, son of the morning! how art thou cut down to the ground, which didst weaken the nations! 
For thou hast said in thine heart, 
838,ying strange wives? 
And one of the sons of Joiada, the son of Eliashib the high priest, was son in law to Sanballat the Horonite: therefore I chased him from me. 
Remember them, O my God, because they have defiled the priesthood, and the covenant of the priesthood, and of the Levites. 
Thus cleansed I them from all strangers, and appointed the wards of the priests and the Levites, every one in his business; 
And for the wood offering, at times appointed, and for the firstfruits. Remember me, O my God, for good. 
Now it came to pass in the days of Ahasuerus, (this is Ahasuerus which reigned, from India even unto Ethiopia, over an hundred and seven and twenty provinces:) 
That in those days, when the king Ahasuerus sat on the throne of his kingdom, which was in Shushan the palace, 
In the third year of his reign, he made a feas
594, be laid waste and made desolate, and your idols may be broken and cease, and your images may be cut down, and your works may be abolished. 
And the slain shall fall in the midst of you, and ye shall know that I am the LORD. 
Yet will I leave a remnant, that ye may have some that shall escape the sword among the nations, when ye shall be scattered through the countries. 
And they that escape of you shall remember me among the nations whither they shall be carried captives, because I am broken with their whorish heart, which hath departed from me, and with their eyes, which go a whoring a
667,nly places in Christ: 
According as he hath chosen us in him before the foundation of the world, that we should be holy and without blame before him in love: 
Having predestinated us unto the adoption of children by Jesus Christ to himself, according to the good pleasure of his will, 
To the praise of the glory of his grace, wherein he hath made us accepted in the beloved. 
In whom we have redemption through his blood, the forgiveness of sins, according to the riches of his grace; 
Wherein he hath abounded toward us in all wisdom and prudence; 
Having made known unto us the mystery of his will, according to his good pleasure which he hath purposed in himself:
834,e tribes, and for the half tribe. 
For Moses had given the inheritance of two tribes and an half tribe on the other side Jordan: but unto the Levites he gave none inheritance among them. 
For the children of Joseph were two tribes, Manasseh and Ephraim: therefore they gave no part unto the Levites in the land, save cities to dwell in, with their suburbs for their cattle and for their substance. 
As the LORD commanded Moses, so the children of Israel did, and they divided the land. 
Then the children of Judah came unto Joshua in Gilgal: and Caleb the son of Jephunneh the Kenezite said unto him, Thou knowest the thing that the LORD said unto Moses the man of God concerning me and thee in Kadeshbarnea. 
Forty years old was I when Moses the servant of the LORD sent me from Kadeshbarnea to espy out the land; and I brought him w
796,nd their dust made fat with fatness. 
For it is the day of the LORD's vengeance, and the year of recompences for the controversy of Zion. 
And the streams thereof shall be turned into pitch, and the dust thereof into brimstone, and the land thereof shall become burning pitch. 
It shall not be quenched night nor day; the smoke thereof shall go up for ever: from generation to generation it shall lie waste; none shall pass through it for ever and ever. 
But the cormorant and the bittern shall possess it; the owl also and the raven shall dwell in it: and he shall stretch out upon it the line of confusion, and the stones of emptiness. 
They shall call the nobles thereof to the kingdom, but none shall be there, and all her princes shall be nothing. 
And thorns shall come up in her palaces, n
832,d: this do ye, as oft as ye drink it, in remembrance of me. 
For as often as ye eat this bread, and drink this cup, ye do shew the Lord's death till he come. 
Wherefore whosoever shall eat this bread, and drink this cup of the Lord, unworthily, shall be guilty of the body and blood of the Lord. 
But let a man examine himself, and so let him eat of that bread, and drink of that cup. 
For he that eateth and drinketh unworthily, eateth and drinketh damnation to himself, not discerning the Lord's body. 
For this cause many are weak and sickly among you, and many sleep. 
For if we would judge ourselves, we should not be judged. 
But when we are judged, we are chastened of the Lord, that we should not be condemned with the world. 
Wherefore, my brethren, when ye come together to eat, tarry one for another. 
And if any man hung
709,ne. 
And all mine are thine, and thine are mine; and I am glorified in them. 
And now I am no more in the world, but these are in the world, and I come to thee. Holy Father, keep through thine own name those whom thou hast given me, that they may be one, as we are. 
While I was with them in the world, I kept them in thy name: those that thou gavest me I have kept, and none of them is lost, but the son of perdition; that the scripture might be fulfilled. 
And now come I to thee; and these things I speak in the world, that they might have my joy fulfilled in themselves. 
I have given them thy word; and the world hath hated them, because they are not of the world, even as I am not of the world. 
I pray 
739,od, and kissed him. 
And Moses told Aaron all the words of the LORD who had sent him, and all the signs which he had commanded him. 
And Moses and Aaron went and gathered together all the elders of the children of Israel: 
And Aaron spake all the words which the LORD had spoken unto Moses, and did the signs in the sight of the people. 
And the people believed: and when they heard that the LORD had visited the children of Israel, and that he had looked upon their affliction, then they bowed their heads and worshipped. 
And afterward Moses and Aaron went in, and told Pharaoh, Thus saith the LORD God of Israel, Let my people go, that they may hold a feast unto me in the wilderness. 
And Pharaoh said, Who is the LORD, that I should o
606,ael: and ye shall know that I am the LORD. 
As for you, O house of Israel, thus saith the Lord GOD; Go ye, serve ye every one his idols, and hereafter also, if ye will not hearken unto me: but pollute ye my holy name no more with your gifts, and with your idols. 
For in mine holy mountain, in the mountain of the height of Israel, saith the Lord GOD, there shall all the house of Israel, all of them in the land, serve me: there will I accept them, and there will I require your offerings, and the firstfruits of your oblations, with all your holy things. 
I will accept you with your sweet savour, when I
604,n his disciples saw it, they had indignation, saying, To what purpose is this waste? 
For this ointment might have been sold for much, and given to the poor. 
When Jesus understood it, he said unto them, Why trouble ye the woman? for she hath wrought a good work upon me. 
For ye have the poor always with you; but me ye have not always. 
For in that she hath poured this ointment on my body, she did it for my burial. 
Verily I say unto you, Wheresoever this gospel shall be preached in the whole world, there shall also this, that this woman hath done, be told for a memorial of her. 
Then one of the t
793,so of the Jews with their rulers, to use them despitefully, and to stone them, 
They were ware of it, and fled unto Lystra and Derbe, cities of Lycaonia, and unto the region that lieth round about: 
And there they preached the gospel. 
And there sat a certain man at Lystra, impotent in his feet, being a cripple from his mother's womb, who never had walked: 
The same heard Paul speak: who stedfastly beholding him, and perceiving that he had faith to be healed, 
Said with a loud voice, Stand upright on thy feet. And he leaped and walked. 
And when the people saw what Paul had done, they lifted up their voices, saying in the speech of Lycaonia, The gods are come down to us in the likeness of men. 
And they called Barnabas, Jupiter; and Paul, Mercurius, because he was the chief speaker.
831,earieth the thick cloud: he scattereth his bright cloud: 
And it is turned round about by his counsels: that they may do whatsoever he commandeth them upon the face of the world in the earth. 
He causeth it to come, whether for correction, or for his land, or for mercy. 
Hearken unto this, O Job: stand still, and consider the wondrous works of God. 
Dost thou know when God disposed them, and caused the light of his cloud to shine? 
Dost thou know the balancings of the clouds, the wondrous works of him which is perfect in knowledge? 
How thy garments are warm, when he quieteth the earth by the south wind? 
Hast thou with him spread out the sky, which is strong, and as a molten looking glass? 
Teach us what we shall say unto him; for we cannot order our speech by reason of darkness. 
Shall it be told him that I speak? if 
712,sight: as for all his enemies, he puffeth at them. 
He hath said in his heart, I shall not be moved: for I shall never be in adversity. 
His mouth is full of cursing and deceit and fraud: under his tongue is mischief and vanity. 
He sitteth in the lurking places of the villages: in the secret places doth he murder the innocent: his eyes are privily set against the poor. 
He lieth in wait secretly as a lion in his den: he lieth in wait to catch the poor: he doth catch the poor, when he draweth him into his net. 
He croucheth, and humbleth himself, that the poor may fall by his strong ones. 
He hath said in his heart, God hath forgotten: he hideth his face; he will never see it. 
Arise, O LORD; O God, lif
838,ezer, and for the children of Helek, and for the children of Asriel, and for the children of Shechem, and for the children of Hepher, and for the children of Shemida: these were the male children of Manasseh the son of Joseph by their families. 
But Zelophehad, the son of Hepher, the son of Gilead, the son of Machir, the son of Manasseh, had no sons, but daughters: and these are the names of his daughters, Mahlah, and Noah, Hoglah, Milcah, and Tirzah. 
And they came near before Eleazar the priest, and before Joshua the son of Nun, and before the princes, saying, The LORD commanded Moses to give us an inheritance among our brethren. Therefore according to the commandment of the LORD he gave them an inheritance among the brethren of their father. 
And there fell ten portions to Manasseh, beside the land of Gilead and Bashan, whi
577,Surely in vain have I kept all that this fellow hath in the wilderness, so that nothing was missed of all that pertained unto him: and he hath requited me evil for good. 
So and more also do God unto the enemies of David, if I leave of all that pertain to him by the morning light any that pisseth against the wall. 
And when Abigail saw David, she hasted, and lighted off the ass, and fell before David on her face, and bowed herself to the ground, 
And fell at his feet, and said, Upon me, my lord, upon me let this iniquity be: and let thine handmaid, I pray thee, speak in 
633,elf proudly against the ancient, and the base against the honourable. 
When a man shall take hold of his brother of the house of his father, saying, Thou hast clothing, be thou our ruler, and let this ruin be under thy hand: 
In that day shall he swear, saying, I will not be an healer; for in my house is neither bread nor clothing: make me not a ruler of the people. 
For Jerusalem is ruined, and Judah is fallen: because their tongue and their doings are against the LORD, to provoke the eyes of his glory. 
The shew of their countenance doth witness against them; and they declare their sin as Sodom, they hide it not. Woe unto t
689,ed himself to the people of the land, even to the children of Heth. 
And he communed with them, saying, If it be your mind that I should bury my dead out of my sight; hear me, and intreat for me to Ephron the son of Zohar, 
That he may give me the cave of Machpelah, which he hath, which is in the end of his field; for as much money as it is worth he shall give it me for a possession of a buryingplace amongst you. 
And Ephron dwelt among the children of Heth: and Ephron the Hittite answered Abraham in the audience of the children of Heth, even of all that went in at the gate of his city, saying, 
Nay, my lord, hear me: the field give I thee, and the cave that is therein, I give it 
657,w ye not, that so many of us as were baptized into Jesus Christ were baptized into his death? 
Therefore we are buried with him by baptism into death: that like as Christ was raised up from the dead by the glory of the Father, even so we also should walk in newness of life. 
For if we have been planted together in the likeness of his death, we shall be also in the likeness of his resurrection: 
Knowing this, that our old man is crucified with him, that the body of sin might be destroyed, that henceforth we should not serve sin. 
For he that is dead is freed from sin. 
Now if we be dead with Christ, we believe that we shall also live with him: 
Knowi
561,he hath increased the altars; according to the goodness of his land they have made goodly images. 
Their heart is divided; now shall they be found faulty: he shall break down their altars, he shall spoil their images. 
For now they shall say, We have no king, because we feared not the LORD; what then should a king do to us? 
They have spoken words, swearing falsely in making a covenant: thus judgment springeth up as hemlock in the furrows of the field. 
The inhabitants of Samaria shall fear because of the calves of Bethaven: for the people thereof shall m
767,nd the number of the fourth part of Israel? Let me die the death of the righteous, and let my last end be like his! 
And Balak said unto Balaam, What hast thou done unto me? I took thee to curse mine enemies, and, behold, thou hast blessed them altogether. 
And he answered and said, Must I not take heed to speak that which the LORD hath put in my mouth? 
And Balak said unto him, Come, I pray thee, with me unto another place, from whence thou mayest see them: thou shalt see but the utmost part of them, and shalt not see them all: and curse me them from thence. 
And he brought him into the field of Zophim, to the top of Pisgah, and built seven altars, and offered a bullock and a ram on every altar. 
And he said unto Balak, Stand here by thy burnt offering, wh
626,of the house shall be brought unto the judges, to see whether he have put his hand unto his neighbour's goods. 
For all manner of trespass, whether it be for ox, for ass, for sheep, for raiment, or for any manner of lost thing which another challengeth to be his, the cause of both parties shall come before the judges; and whom the judges shall condemn, he shall pay double unto his neighbour. 
If a man deliver unto his neighbour an ass, or an ox, or a sheep, or any beast, to keep; and it die, or be hurt, or driven away, no man seeing it: 
Then shall an oath of the LORD be between them both, that he hath not put his hand
776,and the women ravished; and half of the city shall go forth into captivity, and the residue of the people shall not be cut off from the city. 
Then shall the LORD go forth, and fight against those nations, as when he fought in the day of battle. 
And his feet shall stand in that day upon the mount of Olives, which is before Jerusalem on the east, and the mount of Olives shall cleave in the midst thereof toward the east and toward the west, and there shall be a very great valley; and half of the mountain shall remove toward the north, and half of it toward the south. 
And ye shall flee to the valley of the mountains; for the valley of the mountains shall reach unto Azal: yea, ye shall flee, like as ye fled from before the earthquake in the days of Uzziah king of Juda
823,with famine shall they be consumed in the midst of thee: and a third part shall fall by the sword round about thee; and I will scatter a third part into all the winds, and I will draw out a sword after them. 
Thus shall mine anger be accomplished, and I will cause my fury to rest upon them, and I will be comforted: and they shall know that I the LORD have spoken it in my zeal, when I have accomplished my fury in them. 
Moreover I will make thee waste, and a reproach among the nations that are round about thee, in the sight of all that pass by. 
So it shall be a reproach and a taunt, an instruction and an astonishment unto the nations that are round about thee, when I shall execute judgments in thee in anger and in fury and in furious rebukes. I the LORD have spoken it. 
When I shall send upon them the evil arrow
584,h is God known: his name is great in Israel. 
In Salem also is his tabernacle, and his dwelling place in Zion. 
There brake he the arrows of the bow, the shield, and the sword, and the battle. Selah. 
Thou art more glorious and excellent than the mountains of prey. 
The stouthearted are spoiled, they have slept their sleep: and none of the men of might have found their hands. 
At thy rebuke, O God of Jacob, both the chariot and horse are cast into a dead sleep. 
Thou, even thou, art to be feared: and who may stand in thy sight when once thou art angry? 
Thou didst cause judgmen
769,an with her suburbs, and Bethshemesh with her suburbs: 
And out of the tribe of Benjamin; Geba with her suburbs, and Alemeth with her suburbs, and Anathoth with her suburbs. All their cities throughout their families were thirteen cities. 
And unto the sons of Kohath, which were left of the family of that tribe, were cities given out of the half tribe, namely, out of the half tribe of Manasseh, by lot, ten cities. 
And to the sons of Gershom throughout their families out of the tribe of Issachar, and out of the tribe of Asher, and out of the tribe of Naphtali, and out of the tribe of Manasseh in Bashan, thirteen cities. 
Unto the sons of Merari were given by lot, throughout their families, out of the tribe of Reuben, and out of the tribe of Gad, and out of th
674,sed we flattering words, as ye know, nor a cloke of covetousness; God is witness: 
Nor of men sought we glory, neither of you, nor yet of others, when we might have been burdensome, as the apostles of Christ. 
But we were gentle among you, even as a nurse cherisheth her children: 
So being affectionately desirous of you, we were willing to have imparted unto you, not the gospel of God only, but also our own souls, because ye were dear unto us. 
For ye remember, brethren, our labour and travail: for labouring night and day, because we would not be chargeable unto any of you, we preached unto you the gospel of God. 
Ye are witnesses, and God also, how holily and justl
820, for he had not proved it. And David said unto Saul, I cannot go with these; for I have not proved them. And David put them off him. 
And he took his staff in his hand, and chose him five smooth stones out of the brook, and put them in a shepherd's bag which he had, even in a scrip; and his sling was in his hand: and he drew near to the Philistine. 
And the Philistine came on and drew near unto David; and the man that bare the shield went before him. 
And when the Philistine looked about, and saw David, he disdained him: for he was but a youth, and ruddy, and of a fair countenance. 
And the Philistine said unto David, Am I a dog, that thou comest to me with staves? And the Philistine cursed David by his gods. 
And the Philistine said to David, Come to me, and I will give thy flesh unto the fowls of the air, a
712, unto them: and when he saw the wagons which Joseph had sent to carry him, the spirit of Jacob their father revived: 
And Israel said, It is enough; Joseph my son is yet alive: I will go and see him before I die. 
And Israel took his journey with all that he had, and came to Beersheba, and offered sacrifices unto the God of his father Isaac. 
And God spake unto Israel in the visions of the night, and said, Jacob, Jacob. And he said, Here am I. 
And he said, I am God, the God of thy father: fear not to go down into Egypt; for I will there make of thee a great nation: 
I will go down with thee into Egypt; and I will also surely bring thee up again: and Joseph shall put his hand upon thine eyes. 
And Jacob
758,is doctrine. 
And when even was come, he went out of the city. 
And in the morning, as they passed by, they saw the fig tree dried up from the roots. 
And Peter calling to remembrance saith unto him, Master, behold, the fig tree which thou cursedst is withered away. 
And Jesus answering saith unto them, Have faith in God. 
For verily I say unto you, That whosoever shall say unto this mountain, Be thou removed, and be thou cast into the sea; and shall not doubt in his heart, but shall believe that those things which he saith shall come to pass; he shall have whatsoever he saith. 
Therefore I say unto you, What things soever ye desire, when ye pray, believe that ye receive them, and ye shall have them. 
And when ye stand praying, forgive, if ye have 
602,st neither circumcision availeth any thing, nor uncircumcision; but faith which worketh by love. 
Ye did run well; who did hinder you that ye should not obey the truth? 
This persuasion cometh not of him that calleth you. 
A little leaven leaveneth the whole lump. 
I have confidence in you through the Lord, that ye will be none otherwise minded: but he that troubleth you shall bear his judgment, whosoever he be. 
And I, brethren, if I yet preach circumcision, why do I yet suffer persecution? then is the offence of the cross ceased. 
I would they were even cut off which trouble you. 
For, brethre
623,ring Israel again to his habitation, and he shall feed on Carmel and Bashan, and his soul shall be satisfied upon mount Ephraim and Gilead. 
In those days, and in that time, saith the LORD, the iniquity of Israel shall be sought for, and there shall be none; and the sins of Judah, and they shall not be found: for I will pardon them whom I reserve. 
Go up against the land of Merathaim, even against it, and against the inhabitants of Pekod: waste and utterly destroy after them, saith the LORD, and do according to all that I have commanded thee. 
A sound of battle is in the land, and of great destruction. 
How is the h
790,e Christs and false prophets shall rise, and shall shew signs and wonders, to seduce, if it were possible, even the elect. 
But take ye heed: behold, I have foretold you all things. 
But in those days, after that tribulation, the sun shall be darkened, and the moon shall not give her light, 
And the stars of heaven shall fall, and the powers that are in heaven shall be shaken. 
And then shall they see the Son of man coming in the clouds with great power and glory. 
And then shall he send his angels, and shall gather together his elect from the four winds, from the uttermost part of the earth to the uttermost part of heaven. 
Now learn a parable of the fig tree; When her branch is yet tender, and putteth forth leaves, ye know that summer is near: 
So ye in like manner, when ye sha
749,; 
Beside that which chapmen and merchants brought. And all the kings of Arabia and governors of the country brought gold and silver to Solomon. 
And king Solomon made two hundred targets of beaten gold: six hundred shekels of beaten gold went to one target. 
And three hundred shields made he of beaten gold: three hundred shekels of gold went to one shield. And the king put them in the house of the forest of Lebanon. 
Moreover the king made a great throne of ivory, and overlaid it with pure gold. 
And there were six steps to the throne, with a footstool of gold, which were fastened to the throne, and stays on each side of the sitting place, and two lions standing by the stays: 
And twelve lions stood there on the one side and on the other 
831,eam, by Eglah David's wife. These were born to David in Hebron. 
And it came to pass, while there was war between the house of Saul and the house of David, that Abner made himself strong for the house of Saul. 
And Saul had a concubine, whose name was Rizpah, the daughter of Aiah: and Ishbosheth said to Abner, Wherefore hast thou gone in unto my father's concubine? 
Then was Abner very wroth for the words of Ishbosheth, and said, Am I a dog's head, which against Judah do shew kindness this day unto the house of Saul thy father, to his brethren, and to his friends, and have not delivered thee into the hand of David, that thou chargest me to day with a fault concerning this woman? 
So do God to Abner, and more also, except, as the LORD hath sworn to David, even so I do to him; 
To translate the kingdom from the house of S
819,brought him forth out of Egypt; he hath as it were the strength of an unicorn: he shall eat up the nations his enemies, and shall break their bones, and pierce them through with his arrows. 
He couched, he lay down as a lion, and as a great lion: who shall stir him up? Blessed is he that blesseth thee, and cursed is he that curseth thee. 
And Balak's anger was kindled against Balaam, and he smote his hands together: and Balak said unto Balaam, I called thee to curse mine enemies, and, behold, thou hast altogether blessed them these three times. 
Therefore now flee thou to thy place: I thought to promote thee unto great honour; but, lo, the LORD hath kept thee back from honour. 
And Balaam said unto Balak, Spake I not also to thy messengers which thou sentest unto me, saying, 
If Balak would give me his house
830, they shall eat those things wherewith the atonement was made, to consecrate and to sanctify them: but a stranger shall not eat thereof, because they are holy. 
And if ought of the flesh of the consecrations, or of the bread, remain unto the morning, then thou shalt burn the remainder with fire: it shall not be eaten, because it is holy. 
And thus shalt thou do unto Aaron, and to his sons, according to all things which I have commanded thee: seven days shalt thou consecrate them. 
And thou shalt offer every day a bullock for a sin offering for atonement: and thou shalt cleanse the altar, when thou hast made an atonement for it, and thou shalt anoint it, to sanctify it. 
Seven days thou shalt make an atonement for the altar, and sanctify it; and it shall be an altar most holy: whatsoever toucheth the altar shall be holy
763,of Jordan. 
And Caleb stilled the people before Moses, and said, Let us go up at once, and possess it; for we are well able to overcome it. 
But the men that went up with him said, We be not able to go up against the people; for they are stronger than we. 
And they brought up an evil report of the land which they had searched unto the children of Israel, saying, The land, through which we have gone to search it, is a land that eateth up the inhabitants thereof; and all the people that we saw in it are men of a great stature. 
And there we saw the giants, the sons of Anak, which come of the giants: and we were in our own sight as grasshoppers, and so we were in their sight. 
And all the congregation lifted up their voice, and cried; and the people wept t
786,, which was the son of Juda, 
Which was the son of Joanna, which was the son of Rhesa, which was the son of Zorobabel, which was the son of Salathiel, which was the son of Neri, 
Which was the son of Melchi, which was the son of Addi, which was the son of Cosam, which was the son of Elmodam, which was the son of Er, 
Which was the son of Jose, which was the son of Eliezer, which was the son of Jorim, which was the son of Matthat, which was the son of Levi, 
Which was the son of Simeon, which was the son of Juda, which was the son of Joseph, which was the son of Jonan, which was the son of Eliakim, 
Which was the son of Melea, which was the son of Menan, which was the son of Mattatha, which was the son of Nathan, which was the son of David, 
Which was the son of Jesse, which w
721,and day; 
Greatly desiring to see thee, being mindful of thy tears, that I may be filled with joy; 
When I call to remembrance the unfeigned faith that is in thee, which dwelt first in thy grandmother Lois, and thy mother Eunice; and I am persuaded that in thee also. 
Wherefore I put thee in remembrance that thou stir up the gift of God, which is in thee by the putting on of my hands. 
For God hath not given us the spirit of fear; but of power, and of love, and of a sound mind. 
Be not thou therefore ashamed of the testimony of our Lord, nor of me his prisoner: but be thou partaker of the afflictions of the gospel according to the power of God; 
Who hath saved us, and called us with an holy calling, not accordin
774,only. 
And as they came down from the mountain, Jesus charged them, saying, Tell the vision to no man, until the Son of man be risen again from the dead. 
And his disciples asked him, saying, Why then say the scribes that Elias must first come? 
And Jesus answered and said unto them, Elias truly shall first come, and restore all things. 
But I say unto you, That Elias is come already, and they knew him not, but have done unto him whatsoever they listed. Likewise shall also the Son of man suffer of them. 
Then the disciples understood that he spake unto them of John the Baptist. 
And when they were come to the multitude, there came to him a certain man, kneeling down to him, and saying, 
Lord, have mercy on my son: for he is lunatick, and sore vexed: for ofttimes h
685,hat excelleth. 
For if that which is done away was glorious, much more that which remaineth is glorious. 
Seeing then that we have such hope, we use great plainness of speech: 
And not as Moses, which put a vail over his face, that the children of Israel could not stedfastly look to the end of that which is abolished: 
But their minds were blinded: for until this day remaineth the same vail untaken away in the reading of the old testament; which vail is done away in Christ. 
But even unto this day, when Moses is read, the vail is upon their heart. 
Nevertheless when it shall turn to the Lord, the vail shall be taken away. 
Now the Lord is that Spirit: and where the Spirit of t
776, in them, and I in them. 
When Jesus had spoken these words, he went forth with his disciples over the brook Cedron, where was a garden, into the which he entered, and his disciples. 
And Judas also, which betrayed him, knew the place: for Jesus ofttimes resorted thither with his disciples. 
Judas then, having received a band of men and officers from the chief priests and Pharisees, cometh thither with lanterns and torches and weapons. 
Jesus therefore, knowing all things that should come upon him, went forth, and said unto them, Whom seek ye? 
They answered him, Jesus of Nazareth. Jesus saith unto them, I am he. And Judas also, which betrayed him, stood with them. 
As soon then as he had said unto them, I am he, they went backward, and fell to the ground. 
Then ask
835,st. Jesus saith unto them, Verily I say unto you, That the publicans and the harlots go into the kingdom of God before you. 
For John came unto you in the way of righteousness, and ye believed him not: but the publicans and the harlots believed him: and ye, when ye had seen it, repented not afterward, that ye might believe him. 
Hear another parable: There was a certain householder, which planted a vineyard, and hedged it round about, and digged a winepress in it, and built a tower, and let it out to husbandmen, and went into a far country: 
And when the time of the fruit drew near, he sent his servants to the husbandmen, that they might receive the fruits of it. 
And the husbandmen took his servants, and beat one, and killed another, and stoned another. 
Again, he sent other servants more than the first: and they did unto 
637,ird cast out of the nest, so the daughters of Moab shall be at the fords of Arnon. 
Take counsel, execute judgment; make thy shadow as the night in the midst of the noonday; hide the outcasts; bewray not him that wandereth. 
Let mine outcasts dwell with thee, Moab; be thou a covert to them from the face of the spoiler: for the extortioner is at an end, the spoiler ceaseth, the oppressors are consumed out of the land. 
And in mercy shall the throne be established: and he shall sit upon it in truth in the tabernacle of David, judging, and seeking judgment, and hasting righteousness. 
We have heard of the pride of Moab; he is very p
762,the house of their fathers, 
From thirty years old and upward even until fifty years old, all that enter into the host, to do the work in the tabernacle of the congregation. 
This shall be the service of the sons of Kohath in the tabernacle of the congregation, about the most holy things: 
And when the camp setteth forward, Aaron shall come, and his sons, and they shall take down the covering vail, and cover the ark of testimony with it: 
And shall put thereon the covering of badgers' skins, and shall spread over it a cloth wholly of blue, and shall put in the staves thereof. 
And upon the table of shewbread they shall spread a cloth of blue, and put thereon the dishes, and the spoons, and the bowls, and covers to cover withal: and the continual bread 
810,d and to the fowls of the heaven. 
And all the inhabitants of Egypt shall know that I am the LORD, because they have been a staff of reed to the house of Israel. 
When they took hold of thee by thy hand, thou didst break, and rend all their shoulder: and when they leaned upon thee, thou brakest, and madest all their loins to be at a stand. 
Therefore thus saith the Lord GOD; Behold, I will bring a sword upon thee, and cut off man and beast out of thee. 
And the land of Egypt shall be desolate and waste; and they shall know that I am the LORD: because he hath said, The river is mine, and I have made it. 
Behold, therefore I am against thee, and against thy rivers, and I will make the land of Egypt utterly waste and desolate, from the tower of Syene even unto the border of Ethiopia. 
No foot of man sh
761,all bind thee with them, and thou shalt not go out among them: 
And I will make thy tongue cleave to the roof of thy mouth, that thou shalt be dumb, and shalt not be to them a reprover: for they are a rebellious house. 
But when I speak with thee, I will open thy mouth, and thou shalt say unto them, Thus saith the Lord GOD; He that heareth, let him hear; and he that forbeareth, let him forbear: for they are a rebellious house. 
Thou also, son of man, take thee a tile, and lay it before thee, and pourtray upon it the city, even Jerusalem: 
And lay siege against it, and build a fort against it, and cast a mount against it; set the camp also against it, and set battering rams against it round about. 
Moreover take thou unto thee an iron pan, and set it f
736, be rinsed in water. 
And when he that hath an issue is cleansed of his issue; then he shall number to himself seven days for his cleansing, and wash his clothes, and bathe his flesh in running water, and shall be clean. 
And on the eighth day he shall take to him two turtledoves, or two young pigeons, and come before the LORD unto the door of the tabernacle of the congregation, and give them unto the priest: 
And the priest shall offer them, the one for a sin offering, and the other for a burnt offering; and the priest shall make an atonement for him before the LORD for his issue. 
And if any man's seed of copulation go out from him, then he shall wash all his flesh in water, and be unclean until the even. 
And every garment,
771,a well of life: but violence covereth the mouth of the wicked. 
Hatred stirreth up strifes: but love covereth all sins. 
In the lips of him that hath understanding wisdom is found: but a rod is for the back of him that is void of understanding. 
Wise men lay up knowledge: but the mouth of the foolish is near destruction. 
The rich man's wealth is his strong city: the destruction of the poor is their poverty. 
The labour of the righteous tendeth to life: the fruit of the wicked to sin. 
He is in the way of life that keepeth instruction: but he that refuseth reproof erreth. 
He that hideth hatred with lying lips, and he that uttereth a slander, is a fool. 
In the multitude of words there wanteth not sin: but he that refraineth his lips is wise. 
The tongue of the
578,m I trusted, which did eat of my bread, hath lifted up his heel against me. 
But thou, O LORD, be merciful unto me, and raise me up, that I may requite them. 
By this I know that thou favourest me, because mine enemy doth not triumph over me. 
And as for me, thou upholdest me in mine integrity, and settest me before thy face for ever. 
Blessed be the LORD God of Israel from everlasting, and to everlasting. Amen, and Amen. 
As the hart panteth after the water brooks, so panteth my soul after thee, O God. 
My soul thirsteth for God, for the living God: when shall I come and
608,. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses in the wilderness of Sinai, in the first month of the second year after they were come out of the land of Egypt, saying, 
Let the children of Israel also keep the passover at his appointed season. 
In the fourteenth day of this month, at even, ye shall keep it in his appointed season: according to all the rites of it, and according to all the ceremonies thereof, shall ye keep it. 
And Moses spake unto the children of Israel, that they should keep the passover. 
And they kept the passover on the fourteenth day of the first month at even in the wilderness of Sinai: accor
760, Nun, and the heads of the fathers of the tribes of the children of Israel, divided for an inheritance by lot in Shiloh before the LORD, at the door of the tabernacle of the congregation. So they made an end of dividing the country. 
The LORD also spake unto Joshua, saying, 
Speak to the children of Israel, saying, Appoint out for you cities of refuge, whereof I spake unto you by the hand of Moses: 
That the slayer that killeth any person unawares and unwittingly may flee thither: and they shall be your refuge from the avenger of blood. 
And when he that doth flee unto one of those cities shall stand at the entering of the gate of the city, and shall declare his cause in the ears of the elders of that city, they shall take him into the city unto them
614,d dark day. 
And I will bring them out from the people, and gather them from the countries, and will bring them to their own land, and feed them upon the mountains of Israel by the rivers, and in all the inhabited places of the country. 
I will feed them in a good pasture, and upon the high mountains of Israel shall their fold be: there shall they lie in a good fold, and in a fat pasture shall they feed upon the mountains of Israel. 
I will feed my flock, and I will cause them to lie down, saith the Lord GOD. 
I will seek that which was lost, and bring again that which was driven away, and will bind up that
839,lteries from between her breasts; 
Lest I strip her naked, and set her as in the day that she was born, and make her as a wilderness, and set her like a dry land, and slay her with thirst. 
And I will not have mercy upon her children; for they be the children of whoredoms. 
For their mother hath played the harlot: she that conceived them hath done shamefully: for she said, I will go after my lovers, that give me my bread and my water, my wool and my flax, mine oil and my drink. 
Therefore, behold, I will hedge up thy way with thorns, and make a wall, that she shall not find her paths. 
And she shall follow after her lovers, but she shall not overtake them; and she shall seek them, but shall not find them: then shall she say, I will go and return to my first husband; for then was it better with me than now. 
For she did not know
762,sgressions; so iniquity shall not be your ruin. 
Cast away from you all your transgressions, whereby ye have transgressed; and make you a new heart and a new spirit: for why will ye die, O house of Israel? 
For I have no pleasure in the death of him that dieth, saith the Lord GOD: wherefore turn yourselves, and live ye. 
Moreover take thou up a lamentation for the princes of Israel, 
And say, What is thy mother? A lioness: she lay down among lions, she nourished her whelps among young lions. 
And she brought up one of her whelps: it became a young lion, and it learned to catch the prey; it devoured men. 
The nations also heard of him; he was taken in their pit, and they brought him with chains unto the land of Egypt. 
Now when she saw that she had wait
707, not in thine anger, lest thou bring me to nothing. 
Pour out thy fury upon the heathen that know thee not, and upon the families that call not on thy name: for they have eaten up Jacob, and devoured him, and consumed him, and have made his habitation desolate. 
The word that came to Jeremiah from the LORD saying, 
Hear ye the words of this covenant, and speak unto the men of Judah, and to the inhabitants of Jerusalem; 
And say thou unto them, Thus saith the LORD God of Israel; Cursed be the man that obeyeth not the words of this covenant, 
Which I commanded your fathers in the day that I brought them forth out of the land of Egypt, from the iron furnace, saying, Obey my voice, and do them, accordi
661,sware unto thy fathers, as it is this day. 
And it shall be, if thou do at all forget the LORD thy God, and walk after other gods, and serve them, and worship them, I testify against you this day that ye shall surely perish. 
As the nations which the LORD destroyeth before your face, so shall ye perish; because ye would not be obedient unto the voice of the LORD your God. 
Hear, O Israel: Thou art to pass over Jordan this day, to go in to possess nations greater and mightier than thyself, cities great and fenced up to heaven, 
A people great and tall, the children of the Anakims, whom thou knowest, and of whom thou hast heard say, Who can stand before t
834,ns enter ye not: 
But go rather to the lost sheep of the house of Israel. 
And as ye go, preach, saying, The kingdom of heaven is at hand. 
Heal the sick, cleanse the lepers, raise the dead, cast out devils: freely ye have received, freely give. 
Provide neither gold, nor silver, nor brass in your purses, 
Nor scrip for your journey, neither two coats, neither shoes, nor yet staves: for the workman is worthy of his meat. 
And into whatsoever city or town ye shall enter, enquire who in it is worthy; and there abide till ye go thence. 
And when ye come into an house, salute it. 
And if the house be worthy, let your peace come upon it: but if it be not worthy, let your peace return to you. 
And whosoever shall not receive you, nor hear your words, when ye depart out of that house or city, shake off the dust of your feet. 
Ver
694,s, and laid him on the wood, and said, Fill four barrels with water, and pour it on the burnt sacrifice, and on the wood. 
And he said, Do it the second time. And they did it the second time. And he said, Do it the third time. And they did it the third time. 
And the water ran round about the altar; and he filled the trench also with water. 
And it came to pass at the time of the offering of the evening sacrifice, that Elijah the prophet came near, and said, LORD God of Abraham, Isaac, and of Israel, let it be known this day that thou art God in Israel, and that I am thy servant, and that I have done all these things at thy word. 
Hear me, O LORD, hear me, that this people may know tha
813,ations not a few. 
For he saith, Are not my princes altogether kings? 
Is not Calno as Carchemish? is not Hamath as Arpad? is not Samaria as Damascus? 
As my hand hath found the kingdoms of the idols, and whose graven images did excel them of Jerusalem and of Samaria; 
Shall I not, as I have done unto Samaria and her idols, so do to Jerusalem and her idols? 
Wherefore it shall come to pass, that when the Lord hath performed his whole work upon mount Zion and on Jerusalem, I will punish the fruit of the stout heart of the king of Assyria, and the glory of his high looks. 
For he saith, By the strength of my hand I have done it, and by my wisdom; for I am prudent: and I have removed the bounds of the people, and have robbed their treasures, and I have put down the inhabitants like a valiant man: 
And my 
715, I will speak thus; behold, I should offend against the generation of thy children. 
When I thought to know this, it was too painful for me; 
Until I went into the sanctuary of God; then understood I their end. 
Surely thou didst set them in slippery places: thou castedst them down into destruction. 
How are they brought into desolation, as in a moment! they are utterly consumed with terrors. 
As a dream when one awaketh; so, O Lord, when thou awakest, thou shalt despise their image. 
Thus my heart was grieved, and I was pricked in my reins. 
So foolish was I, and ignorant: I was as a beast before thee. 
Nevertheless I am continually with thee: thou hast holden me by my right hand. 
Thou shalt guide me wit
722,lt not see a fierce people, a people of a deeper speech than thou canst perceive; of a stammering tongue, that thou canst not understand. 
Look upon Zion, the city of our solemnities: thine eyes shall see Jerusalem a quiet habitation, a tabernacle that shall not be taken down; not one of the stakes thereof shall ever be removed, neither shall any of the cords thereof be broken. 
But there the glorious LORD will be unto us a place of broad rivers and streams; wherein shall go no galley with oars, neither shall gallant ship pass thereby. 
For the LORD is our judge, the LORD is our lawgiver, the LORD is our king; he will save us. 
Thy tacklings are loosed; they could not well strengthen their mast, they could not sp
824,And there they were with David three days, eating and drinking: for their brethren had prepared for them. 
Moreover they that were nigh them, even unto Issachar and Zebulun and Naphtali, brought bread on asses, and on camels, and on mules, and on oxen, and meat, meal, cakes of figs, and bunches of raisins, and wine, and oil, and oxen, and sheep abundantly: for there was joy in Israel. 
And David consulted with the captains of thousands and hundreds, and with every leader. 
And David said unto all the congregation of Israel, If it seem good unto you, and that it be of the LORD our God, let us send abroad unto our brethren every where, that are left in all the land of Israel, and with them also to the priests and Levites which are in their cities and suburbs, that they may gather themselves unto us: 
And let us bri
586, thou eat not the blood: for the blood is the life; and thou mayest not eat the life with the flesh. 
Thou shalt not eat it; thou shalt pour it upon the earth as water. 
Thou shalt not eat it; that it may go well with thee, and with thy children after thee, when thou shalt do that which is right in the sight of the LORD. 
Only thy holy things which thou hast, and thy vows, thou shalt take, and go unto the place which the LORD shall choose: 
And thou shalt offer thy burnt offerings, the flesh and the blood, upon the altar of the LORD thy God: and the blood of thy sacrifices shall 
750,th the dew of heaven, and seven times shall pass over thee, till thou know that the most High ruleth in the kingdom of men, and giveth it to whomsoever he will. 
And whereas they commanded to leave the stump of the tree roots; thy kingdom shall be sure unto thee, after that thou shalt have known that the heavens do rule. 
Wherefore, O king, let my counsel be acceptable unto thee, and break off thy sins by righteousness, and thine iniquities by shewing mercy to the poor; if it may be a lengthening of thy tranquillity. 
All this came upon the king Nebuchadnezzar. 
At the end of twelve months he walked in the palace of the kingdom of Babylon. 
The king spake, and said, Is not this great Babylon, that I have built for the house of the kingdom b
787,ngdom to Israel? 
And he said unto them, It is not for you to know the times or the seasons, which the Father hath put in his own power. 
But ye shall receive power, after that the Holy Ghost is come upon you: and ye shall be witnesses unto me both in Jerusalem, and in all Judaea, and in Samaria, and unto the uttermost part of the earth. 
And when he had spoken these things, while they beheld, he was taken up; and a cloud received him out of their sight. 
And while they looked stedfastly toward heaven as he went up, behold, two men stood by them in white apparel; 
Which also said, Ye men of Galilee, why stand ye gazing up into heaven? this same Jesus, which is taken up from you into heaven, shall so come in like manner as ye have seen him go into heaven. 
Then returned they un
735,lious, and companions of thieves: every one loveth gifts, and followeth after rewards: they judge not the fatherless, neither doth the cause of the widow come unto them. 
Therefore saith the LORD, the LORD of hosts, the mighty One of Israel, Ah, I will ease me of mine adversaries, and avenge me of mine enemies: 
And I will turn my hand upon thee, and purely purge away thy dross, and take away all thy tin: 
And I will restore thy judges as at the first, and thy counsellors as at the beginning: afterward thou shalt be called, The city of righteousness, the faithful city. 
Zion shall be redeemed with judgment, and her converts with righteousness. 
And the destruction of the transgressors and of the sinners shall be together, and
734,n men's shoulders; but they themselves will not move them with one of their fingers. 
But all their works they do for to be seen of men: they make broad their phylacteries, and enlarge the borders of their garments, 
And love the uppermost rooms at feasts, and the chief seats in the synagogues, 
And greetings in the markets, and to be called of men, Rabbi, Rabbi. 
But be not ye called Rabbi: for one is your Master, even Christ; and all ye are brethren. 
And call no man your father upon the earth: for one is your Father, which is in heaven. 
Neither be ye called masters: for one is your Master, even Christ. 
But he that is greatest among you shall be your servant. 
And whosoever shall exalt himself shall be abased; and he tha
658,oud happy; yea, they that work wickedness are set up; yea, they that tempt God are even delivered. 
Then they that feared the LORD spake often one to another: and the LORD hearkened, and heard it, and a book of remembrance was written before him for them that feared the LORD, and that thought upon his name. 
And they shall be mine, saith the LORD of hosts, in that day when I make up my jewels; and I will spare them, as a man spareth his own son that serveth him. 
Then shall ye return, and discern between the righteous and the wicked, between him that serveth God and him that serveth him not. 
For, behold, the day cometh, that shall burn as an oven; a
566,of snow in the time of harvest, so is a faithful messenger to them that send him: for he refresheth the soul of his masters. 
Whoso boasteth himself of a false gift is like clouds and wind without rain. 
By long forbearing is a prince persuaded, and a soft tongue breaketh the bone. 
Hast thou found honey? eat so much as is sufficient for thee, lest thou be filled therewith, and vomit it. 
Withdraw thy foot from thy neighbour's house; lest he be weary of thee, and so hate thee. 
A man that beareth false witness against his neighbour is a maul, and a sword, and 
786,b the son of Rechab shall not want a man to stand before me for ever. 
And it came to pass in the fourth year of Jehoiakim the son of Josiah king of Judah, that this word came unto Jeremiah from the LORD, saying, 
Take thee a roll of a book, and write therein all the words that I have spoken unto thee against Israel, and against Judah, and against all the nations, from the day I spake unto thee, from the days of Josiah, even unto this day. 
It may be that the house of Judah will hear all the evil which I purpose to do unto them; that they may return every man from his evil way; that I may forgive their iniquity and their sin. 
Then Jeremiah called Baruch the son of Neriah: and Baruch wrote from the mouth of Jeremiah all the words of the LORD, which he had spoken unto him, upo
748, when he shall enter into thy gates, as men enter into a city wherein is made a breach. 
With the hoofs of his horses shall he tread down all thy streets: he shall slay thy people by the sword, and thy strong garrisons shall go down to the ground. 
And they shall make a spoil of thy riches, and make a prey of thy merchandise: and they shall break down thy walls, and destroy thy pleasant houses: and they shall lay thy stones and thy timber and thy dust in the midst of the water. 
And I will cause the noise of thy songs to cease; and the sound of thy harps shall be no more heard. 
And I will make thee like the top of a rock: thou shalt be a place to spread nets upon; thou shalt be built no more: for I the LORD have spoken it, saith the Lord
760,me, and see my glory. 
And I will set a sign among them, and I will send those that escape of them unto the nations, to Tarshish, Pul, and Lud, that draw the bow, to Tubal, and Javan, to the isles afar off, that have not heard my fame, neither have seen my glory; and they shall declare my glory among the Gentiles. 
And they shall bring all your brethren for an offering unto the LORD out of all nations upon horses, and in chariots, and in litters, and upon mules, and upon swift beasts, to my holy mountain Jerusalem, saith the LORD, as the children of Israel bring an offering in a clean vessel into the house of the LORD. 
And I will also take of them for priests and for Levites, saith the LORD. 
For as the new heavens and the new earth, which I will ma
667,ed offered an offering of gold unto the LORD. 
And every man, with whom was found blue, and purple, and scarlet, and fine linen, and goats' hair, and red skins of rams, and badgers' skins, brought them. 
Every one that did offer an offering of silver and brass brought the LORD's offering: and every man, with whom was found shittim wood for any work of the service, brought it. 
And all the women that were wise hearted did spin with their hands, and brought that which they had spun, both of blue, and of purple, and of scarlet, and of fine linen. 
And all the women whose heart stirred them up in wisdom spun goats' hair. 
And the rulers brought onyx stones, and s
777,e children of Gibeon, ninety and five. 
The men of Bethlehem and Netophah, an hundred fourscore and eight. 
The men of Anathoth, an hundred twenty and eight. 
The men of Bethazmaveth, forty and two. 
The men of Kirjathjearim, Chephirah, and Beeroth, seven hundred forty and three. 
The men of Ramah and Gaba, six hundred twenty and one. 
The men of Michmas, an hundred and twenty and two. 
The men of Bethel and Ai, an hundred twenty and three. 
The men of the other Nebo, fifty and two. 
The children of the other Elam, a thousand two hundred fifty and four. 
The children of Harim, three hundred and twenty. 
The children of Jericho, three hundred forty and five. 
The children of Lod, Hadid, and Ono, seven hundred twenty and one. 
The children of Senaah, three thousand nin
792,ouse: 
And also let the golden and silver vessels of the house of God, which Nebuchadnezzar took forth out of the temple which is at Jerusalem, and brought unto Babylon, be restored, and brought again unto the temple which is at Jerusalem, every one to his place, and place them in the house of God. 
Now therefore, Tatnai, governor beyond the river, Shetharboznai, and your companions the Apharsachites, which are beyond the river, be ye far from thence: 
Let the work of this house of God alone; let the governor of the Jews and the elders of the Jews build this house of God in his place. 
Moreover I make a decree what ye shall do to the elders of these Jews for the building of this house of God: that of the king's goods, even of the tribute beyond the river, forthwith expenses be give
580,ich dwell in Seir, and the Moabites which dwell in Ar, did unto me;) until I shall pass over Jordan into the land which the LORD our God giveth us. 
But Sihon king of Heshbon would not let us pass by him: for the LORD thy God hardened his spirit, and made his heart obstinate, that he might deliver him into thy hand, as appeareth this day. 
And the LORD said unto me, Behold, I have begun to give Sihon and his land before thee: begin to possess, that thou mayest inherit his land. 
Then Sihon came out against us, he and all his people, to fight at Jahaz. 
And the LORD our God 
569,so will be my lord's bondmen. 
And he said, Now also let it be according unto your words: he with whom it is found shall be my servant; and ye shall be blameless. 
Then they speedily took down every man his sack to the ground, and opened every man his sack. 
And he searched, and began at the eldest, and left at the youngest: and the cup was found in Benjamin's sack. 
Then they rent their clothes, and laded every man his ass, and returned to the city. 
And Judah and his brethren came to Joseph's house; for he was yet there: and they fell before him on the ground. 
574, concerning a kingdom, to build and to plant it; 
If it do evil in my sight, that it obey not my voice, then I will repent of the good, wherewith I said I would benefit them. 
Now therefore go to, speak to the men of Judah, and to the inhabitants of Jerusalem, saying, Thus saith the LORD; Behold, I frame evil against you, and devise a device against you: return ye now every one from his evil way, and make your ways and your doings good. 
And they said, There is no hope: but we will walk after our own devices, and we will every one do the imagination of his evil heart.
601, against thee in the midst of the house of Israel: the land is not able to bear all his words. 
For thus Amos saith, Jeroboam shall die by the sword, and Israel shall surely be led away captive out of their own land. 
Also Amaziah said unto Amos, O thou seer, go, flee thee away into the land of Judah, and there eat bread, and prophesy there: 
But prophesy not again any more at Bethel: for it is the king's chapel, and it is the king's court. 
Then answered Amos, and said to Amaziah, I was no prophet, neither was I a prophet's son; but I was an herdman, and a gatherer of sycomore fruit: 
And the 
605,r the groves, or the images. 
In that day shall his strong cities be as a forsaken bough, and an uppermost branch, which they left because of the children of Israel: and there shall be desolation. 
Because thou hast forgotten the God of thy salvation, and hast not been mindful of the rock of thy strength, therefore shalt thou plant pleasant plants, and shalt set it with strange slips: 
In the day shalt thou make thy plant to grow, and in the morning shalt thou make thy seed to flourish: but the harvest shall be a heap in the day of grief and of desperate sorrow. 
Woe to the multitude of many people
686,her, and hate her, 
And give occasions of speech against her, and bring up an evil name upon her, and say, I took this woman, and when I came to her, I found her not a maid: 
Then shall the father of the damsel, and her mother, take and bring forth the tokens of the damsel's virginity unto the elders of the city in the gate: 
And the damsel's father shall say unto the elders, I gave my daughter unto this man to wife, and he hateth her; 
And, lo, he hath given occasions of speech against her, saying, I found not thy daughter a maid; and yet these are the tokens of my daughter's virginity. And they shall spread the cloth before the elders of the city. 
And the elders of that city
781,said, Wherefore is it that thou dost ask after my name? And he blessed him there. 
And Jacob called the name of the place Peniel: for I have seen God face to face, and my life is preserved. 
And as he passed over Penuel the sun rose upon him, and he halted upon his thigh. 
Therefore the children of Israel eat not of the sinew which shrank, which is upon the hollow of the thigh, unto this day: because he touched the hollow of Jacob's thigh in the sinew that shrank. 
And Jacob lifted up his eyes, and looked, and, behold, Esau came, and with him four hundred men. And he divided the children unto Leah, and unto Rachel, and unto the two handmaids. 
And he put the handmaids and their children foremost, and Leah and her children after, and Rachel and Joseph hindermost. 
And he 
695,. 
And they said one to another, Go to, let us make brick, and burn them thoroughly. And they had brick for stone, and slime had they for morter. 
And they said, Go to, let us build us a city and a tower, whose top may reach unto heaven; and let us make us a name, lest we be scattered abroad upon the face of the whole earth. 
And the LORD came down to see the city and the tower, which the children of men builded. 
And the LORD said, Behold, the people is one, and they have all one language; and this they begin to do: and now nothing will be restrained from them, which they have imagined to do. 
Go to, let us go down, and there confound their language, that they may not understand one an
751,, after the shekel of the sanctuary. 
And if it be a female, then thy estimation shall be thirty shekels. 
And if it be from five years old even unto twenty years old, then thy estimation shall be of the male twenty shekels, and for the female ten shekels. 
And if it be from a month old even unto five years old, then thy estimation shall be of the male five shekels of silver, and for the female thy estimation shall be three shekels of silver. 
And if it be from sixty years old and above; if it be a male, then thy estimation shall be fifteen shekels, and for the female ten shekels. 
But if he be poorer than thy estimation, then he shall present himself before the priest, and the priest shall value him; according to his ability that vowed shal
740,rn. 
Then shall the dust return to the earth as it was: and the spirit shall return unto God who gave it. 
Vanity of vanities, saith the preacher; all is vanity. 
And moreover, because the preacher was wise, he still taught the people knowledge; yea, he gave good heed, and sought out, and set in order many proverbs. 
The preacher sought to find out acceptable words: and that which was written was upright, even words of truth. 
The words of the wise are as goads, and as nails fastened by the masters of assemblies, which are given from one shepherd. 
And further, by these, my son, be admonished: of making many books there is no end; and much study is a weariness of the flesh. 
Let us hear the conclusion of the whole matter: Fear God
820,to it, Thus saith the Lord GOD; Behold, O mount Seir, I am against thee, and I will stretch out mine hand against thee, and I will make thee most desolate. 
I will lay thy cities waste, and thou shalt be desolate, and thou shalt know that I am the LORD. 
Because thou hast had a perpetual hatred, and hast shed the blood of the children of Israel by the force of the sword in the time of their calamity, in the time that their iniquity had an end: 
Therefore, as I live, saith the Lord GOD, I will prepare thee unto blood, and blood shall pursue thee: sith thou hast not hated blood, even blood shall pursue thee. 
Thus will I make mount Seir most desolate, and cut off from it him that passeth out and him that returneth. 
And I will fill his mountains with his slain men: in thy hills, and in thy valleys, and in all t
585,e call me Master and Lord: and ye say well; for so I am. 
If I then, your Lord and Master, have washed your feet; ye also ought to wash one another's feet. 
For I have given you an example, that ye should do as I have done to you. 
Verily, verily, I say unto you, The servant is not greater than his lord; neither he that is sent greater than he that sent him. 
If ye know these things, happy are ye if ye do them. 
I speak not of you all: I know whom I have chosen: but that the scripture may be fulfilled, He that eateth bread with me hath lifted up his heel against me. 
Now I tell 
794,and all the wisdom of Egypt. 
For he was wiser than all men; than Ethan the Ezrahite, and Heman, and Chalcol, and Darda, the sons of Mahol: and his fame was in all nations round about. 
And he spake three thousand proverbs: and his songs were a thousand and five. 
And he spake of trees, from the cedar tree that is in Lebanon even unto the hyssop that springeth out of the wall: he spake also of beasts, and of fowl, and of creeping things, and of fishes. 
And there came of all people to hear the wisdom of Solomon, from all kings of the earth, which had heard of his wisdom. 
And Hiram king of Tyre sent his servants unto Solomon; for he had heard that they had anointed him king in the room of his father: for Hiram was ever a lover of David. 
And Solomon sent to Hiram, saying, 
Thou knowe
758,e three sons of Anak. 
And the children of Benjamin did not drive out the Jebusites that inhabited Jerusalem; but the Jebusites dwell with the children of Benjamin in Jerusalem unto this day. 
And the house of Joseph, they also went up against Bethel: and the LORD was with them. 
And the house of Joseph sent to descry Bethel. (Now the name of the city before was Luz.) 
And the spies saw a man come forth out of the city, and they said unto him, Shew us, we pray thee, the entrance into the city, and we will shew thee mercy. 
And when he shewed them the entrance into the city, they smote the city with the edge of the sword; but they let go the man and all his family. 
And the man went into the land of the Hittites, and built a city, and called the nam
613,made sinners, so by the obedience of one shall many be made righteous. 
Moreover the law entered, that the offence might abound. But where sin abounded, grace did much more abound: 
That as sin hath reigned unto death, even so might grace reign through righteousness unto eternal life by Jesus Christ our Lord. 
What shall we say then? Shall we continue in sin, that grace may abound? 
God forbid. How shall we, that are dead to sin, live any longer therein? 
Know ye not, that so many of us as were baptized into Jesus Christ were baptized into his death? 
Therefore we are buried with him by baptism into death:
663,found grace in thine eyes, let them give me a place in some town in the country, that I may dwell there: for why should thy servant dwell in the royal city with thee? 
Then Achish gave him Ziklag that day: wherefore Ziklag pertaineth unto the kings of Judah unto this day. 
And the time that David dwelt in the country of the Philistines was a full year and four months. 
And David and his men went up, and invaded the Geshurites, and the Gezrites, and the Amalekites: for those nations were of old the inhabitants of the land, as thou goest to Shur, even unto the land of Egypt. 
And David smote the land, and left neither man nor woman alive, and took away the 
789,pipe to come into the mountain of the LORD, to the mighty One of Israel. 
And the LORD shall cause his glorious voice to be heard, and shall shew the lighting down of his arm, with the indignation of his anger, and with the flame of a devouring fire, with scattering, and tempest, and hailstones. 
For through the voice of the LORD shall the Assyrian be beaten down, which smote with a rod. 
And in every place where the grounded staff shall pass, which the LORD shall lay upon him, it shall be with tabrets and harps: and in battles of shaking will he fight with it. 
For Tophet is ordained of old; yea, for the king it is prepared; he hath made it deep and large: the pile thereof is fire and much wood; the breath of the LORD, like a stream of brimstone, doth kindle it. 
Woe to them th
760,things, to make thy servant know them. 
Wherefore thou art great, O LORD God: for there is none like thee, neither is there any God beside thee, according to all that we have heard with our ears. 
And what one nation in the earth is like thy people, even like Israel, whom God went to redeem for a people to himself, and to make him a name, and to do for you great things and terrible, for thy land, before thy people, which thou redeemedst to thee from Egypt, from the nations and their gods? 
For thou hast confirmed to thyself thy people Israel to be a people unto thee for ever: and thou, LORD, art become their God. 
And now, O LORD God, the word that thou hast spoken concerning thy servant, and concerning his house, establish it for ever, and do as tho
673,ppers for multitude; and their camels were without number, as the sand by the sea side for multitude. 
And when Gideon was come, behold, there was a man that told a dream unto his fellow, and said, Behold, I dreamed a dream, and, lo, a cake of barley bread tumbled into the host of Midian, and came unto a tent, and smote it that it fell, and overturned it, that the tent lay along. 
And his fellow answered and said, This is nothing else save the sword of Gideon the son of Joash, a man of Israel: for into his hand hath God delivered Midian, and all the host. 
And it was so, when Gideon heard the telling of the dream, and the interpretation thereof, that he worshipped,
814,ay thereof there is no death. 
A wise son heareth his father's instruction: but a scorner heareth not rebuke. 
A man shall eat good by the fruit of his mouth: but the soul of the transgressors shall eat violence. 
He that keepeth his mouth keepeth his life: but he that openeth wide his lips shall have destruction. 
The soul of the sluggard desireth, and hath nothing: but the soul of the diligent shall be made fat. 
A righteous man hateth lying: but a wicked man is loathsome, and cometh to shame. 
Righteousness keepeth him that is upright in the way: but wickedness overthroweth the sinner. 
There is that maketh himself rich, yet hath nothing: there is that maketh himself poor, yet hath great riches. 
The ransom of a man's life are his riches: but the poor heareth not rebuke. 
The light of the righteous r
753,ying the truth through the Spirit unto unfeigned love of the brethren, see that ye love one another with a pure heart fervently: 
Being born again, not of corruptible seed, but of incorruptible, by the word of God, which liveth and abideth for ever. 
For all flesh is as grass, and all the glory of man as the flower of grass. The grass withereth, and the flower thereof falleth away: 
But the word of the Lord endureth for ever. And this is the word which by the gospel is preached unto you. 
Wherefore laying aside all malice, and all guile, and hypocrisies, and envies, all evil speakings, 
As newborn babes, desire the sincere milk of the word, that ye may grow thereby: 
If so be ye have tasted that the Lord is gracious. 
To whom coming, as unto a
781,t the children of Benjamin? And the LORD said, Judah shall go up first. 
And the children of Israel rose up in the morning, and encamped against Gibeah. 
And the men of Israel went out to battle against Benjamin; and the men of Israel put themselves in array to fight against them at Gibeah. 
And the children of Benjamin came forth out of Gibeah, and destroyed down to the ground of the Israelites that day twenty and two thousand men. 
And the people the men of Israel encouraged themselves, and set their battle again in array in the place where they put themselves in array the first day. 
(And the children of Israel went up and wept before the LORD until even, and asked counsel of the LORD, saying, Shall I go up again to battle against the children of Benjamin my brother? 
802,vy and displeased, and came to Samaria. 
And it came to pass after these things, that Naboth the Jezreelite had a vineyard, which was in Jezreel, hard by the palace of Ahab king of Samaria. 
And Ahab spake unto Naboth, saying, Give me thy vineyard, that I may have it for a garden of herbs, because it is near unto my house: and I will give thee for it a better vineyard than it; or, if it seem good to thee, I will give thee the worth of it in money. 
And Naboth said to Ahab, The LORD forbid it me, that I should give the inheritance of my fathers unto thee. 
And Ahab came into his house heavy and displeased because of the word which Naboth the Jezreelite had spoken to him: for he had said, I will not give thee the inheritance of my fathers. And he laid him down upon his bed, and turned away his
573,nd that they might have matter for an evil report, that they might reproach me. 
My God, think thou upon Tobiah and Sanballat according to these their works, and on the prophetess Noadiah, and the rest of the prophets, that would have put me in fear. 
So the wall was finished in the twenty and fifth day of the month Elul, in fifty and two days. 
And it came to pass, that when all our enemies heard thereof, and all the heathen that were about us saw these things, they were much cast down in their own eyes: for they perceived that this work was wrought of our God. 
Mor
619,d and said unto them, Why do ye also transgress the commandment of God by your tradition? 
For God commanded, saying, Honour thy father and mother: and, He that curseth father or mother, let him die the death. 
But ye say, Whosoever shall say to his father or his mother, It is a gift, by whatsoever thou mightest be profited by me; 
And honour not his father or his mother, he shall be free. Thus have ye made the commandment of God of none effect by your tradition. 
Ye hypocrites, well did Esaias prophesy of you, saying, 
This people draweth nigh unto me with their mouth, and honoureth me with their lips; but thei
814,ful man in time of trouble is like a broken tooth, and a foot out of joint. 
As he that taketh away a garment in cold weather, and as vinegar upon nitre, so is he that singeth songs to an heavy heart. 
If thine enemy be hungry, give him bread to eat; and if he be thirsty, give him water to drink: 
For thou shalt heap coals of fire upon his head, and the LORD shall reward thee. 
The north wind driveth away rain: so doth an angry countenance a backbiting tongue. 
It is better to dwell in the corner of the housetop, than with a brawling woman and in a wide house. 
As cold waters to a thirsty soul, so is good news from a far country. 
A righteous man falling down before the wicked is as a troubled fountain, and a corrupt spring. 
It is not good to eat much honey: so for men to search their own glory is not 
806,e miracle done by him. 
Then he questioned with him in many words; but he answered him nothing. 
And the chief priests and scribes stood and vehemently accused him. 
And Herod with his men of war set him at nought, and mocked him, and arrayed him in a gorgeous robe, and sent him again to Pilate. 
And the same day Pilate and Herod were made friends together: for before they were at enmity between themselves. 
And Pilate, when he had called together the chief priests and the rulers and the people, 
Said unto them, Ye have brought this man unto me, as one that perverteth the people: and, behold, I, having examined him before you, have found no fault in this man touching those things whereof ye accuse him: 
No, nor yet Herod: for I sent you to him; and, lo, nothing worthy of death is done unto him. 
584,; shout, O Israel; be glad and rejoice with all the heart, O daughter of Jerusalem. 
The LORD hath taken away thy judgments, he hath cast out thine enemy: the king of Israel, even the LORD, is in the midst of thee: thou shalt not see evil any more. 
In that day it shall be said to Jerusalem, Fear thou not: and to Zion, Let not thine hands be slack. 
The LORD thy God in the midst of thee is mighty; he will save, he will rejoice over thee with joy; he will rest in his love, he will joy over thee with singing. 
I will gather them that are sorrowful for the solemn assembly, who are
813,d for ever. 
And I will make thy seed as the dust of the earth: so that if a man can number the dust of the earth, then shall thy seed also be numbered. 
Arise, walk through the land in the length of it and in the breadth of it; for I will give it unto thee. 
Then Abram removed his tent, and came and dwelt in the plain of Mamre, which is in Hebron, and built there an altar unto the LORD. 
And it came to pass in the days of Amraphel king of Shinar, Arioch king of Ellasar, Chedorlaomer king of Elam, and Tidal king of nations; 
That these made war with Bera king of Sodom, and with Birsha king of Gomorrah, Shinab king of Admah, and Shemeber king of Zeboiim, and the king of Bela, which is Zoar. 
All these were joined together in the vale of Siddim, which is the salt sea. 
Twelve years they served Chedorlaom
648,ty man; so are children of the youth. 
Happy is the man that hath his quiver full of them: they shall not be ashamed, but they shall speak with the enemies in the gate. 
Blessed is every one that feareth the LORD; that walketh in his ways. 
For thou shalt eat the labour of thine hands: happy shalt thou be, and it shall be well with thee. 
Thy wife shall be as a fruitful vine by the sides of thine house: thy children like olive plants round about thy table. 
Behold, that thus shall the man be blessed that feareth the LORD. 
The LORD shall bless thee out of Zion: and thou shalt see the good of Jerusalem all the days of thy life. 
Yea, thou sh
740, LORD, who shall intreat for him? Notwithstanding they hearkened not unto the voice of their father, because the LORD would slay them. 
And the child Samuel grew on, and was in favour both with the LORD, and also with men. 
And there came a man of God unto Eli, and said unto him, Thus saith the LORD, Did I plainly appear unto the house of thy father, when they were in Egypt in Pharaoh's house? 
And did I choose him out of all the tribes of Israel to be my priest, to offer upon mine altar, to burn incense, to wear an ephod before me? and did I give unto the house of thy father all the offerings made by fire of the children of Israel? 
Wherefore kick ye at my sacrifice and at mine offering, which I have commanded in my habitation; a
781,D; Behold, I will kindle a fire in thee, and it shall devour every green tree in thee, and every dry tree: the flaming flame shall not be quenched, and all faces from the south to the north shall be burned therein. 
And all flesh shall see that I the LORD have kindled it: it shall not be quenched. 
Then said I, Ah Lord GOD! they say of me, Doth he not speak parables? 
And the word of the LORD came unto me, saying, 
Son of man, set thy face toward Jerusalem, and drop thy word toward the holy places, and prophesy against the land of Israel, 
And say to the land of Israel, Thus saith the LORD; Behold, I am against thee, and will draw forth my sword out of his sheath, and will cut off from thee the righteous and the wicked. 
Seeing then that I will cut off from thee the righ
829,ide Shechem, and mete out the valley of Succoth. 
Gilead is mine, and Manasseh is mine; Ephraim also is the strength of mine head; Judah is my lawgiver; 
Moab is my washpot; over Edom will I cast out my shoe: Philistia, triumph thou because of me. 
Who will bring me into the strong city? who will lead me into Edom? 
Wilt not thou, O God, which hadst cast us off? and thou, O God, which didst not go out with our armies? 
Give us help from trouble: for vain is the help of man. 
Through God we shall do valiantly: for he it is that shall tread down our enemies. 
Hear my cry, O God; attend unto my prayer. 
From the end of the earth will I cry unto thee, when my heart is overwhelmed: lead me to the rock that is higher than I. 
For thou hast been a shelter for me, and a strong tower from the enemy. 
I will abide in thy tabern
615,, clear as crystal; 
And had a wall great and high, and had twelve gates, and at the gates twelve angels, and names written thereon, which are the names of the twelve tribes of the children of Israel: 
On the east three gates; on the north three gates; on the south three gates; and on the west three gates. 
And the wall of the city had twelve foundations, and in them the names of the twelve apostles of the Lamb. 
And he that talked with me had a golden reed to measure the city, and the gates thereof, and the wall thereof. 
And the city lieth foursquare, and the length is as large as the breadth: and he measu
749,o Jeremiah, Thou speakest falsely: the LORD our God hath not sent thee to say, Go not into Egypt to sojourn there: 
But Baruch the son of Neriah setteth thee on against us, for to deliver us into the hand of the Chaldeans, that they might put us to death, and carry us away captives into Babylon. 
So Johanan the son of Kareah, and all the captains of the forces, and all the people, obeyed not the voice of the LORD, to dwell in the land of Judah. 
But Johanan the son of Kareah, and all the captains of the forces, took all the remnant of Judah, that were returned from all nations, whither they had been driven, to dwell in the land of Judah; 
Even men, and women, and children, and the king's daughters, and every person that Nebuzaradan the cap
661,in the wilderness, and he was not in the company of them that gathered themselves together against the LORD in the company of Korah; but died in his own sin, and had no sons. 
Why should the name of our father be done away from among his family, because he hath no son? Give unto us therefore a possession among the brethren of our father. 
And Moses brought their cause before the LORD. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses, saying, 
The daughters of Zelophehad speak right: thou shalt surely give them a possession of an inheritance among their father's brethren; and thou shalt cause the inheritance of their father to pass unto them. 
And thou shalt speak unto th
810, Jordan! 
O LORD, what shall I say, when Israel turneth their backs before their enemies! 
For the Canaanites and all the inhabitants of the land shall hear of it, and shall environ us round, and cut off our name from the earth: and what wilt thou do unto thy great name? 
And the LORD said unto Joshua, Get thee up; wherefore liest thou thus upon thy face? 
Israel hath sinned, and they have also transgressed my covenant which I commanded them: for they have even taken of the accursed thing, and have also stolen, and dissembled also, and they have put it even among their own stuff. 
Therefore the children of Israel could not stand before their enemies, but turned their backs before their enemies, because they were accursed: neither will I be with you any more, except ye destroy the accursed from among
760,nt until they came to Bethlehem. And it came to pass, when they were come to Bethlehem, that all the city was moved about them, and they said, Is this Naomi? 
And she said unto them, Call me not Naomi, call me Mara: for the Almighty hath dealt very bitterly with me. 
I went out full and the LORD hath brought me home again empty: why then call ye me Naomi, seeing the LORD hath testified against me, and the Almighty hath afflicted me? 
So Naomi returned, and Ruth the Moabitess, her daughter in law, with her, which returned out of the country of Moab: and they came to Bethlehem in the beginning of barley harvest. 
And Naomi had a kinsman of her husband's, a mighty man of wealth, of the family of Elimelech; and his name was Boaz. 
And Ruth the Moabitess 
800, king shall now be comfortable: for as an angel of God, so is my lord the king to discern good and bad: therefore the LORD thy God will be with thee. 
Then the king answered and said unto the woman, Hide not from me, I pray thee, the thing that I shall ask thee. And the woman said, Let my lord the king now speak. 
And the king said, Is not the hand of Joab with thee in all this? And the woman answered and said, As thy soul liveth, my lord the king, none can turn to the right hand or to the left from ought that my lord the king hath spoken: for thy servant Joab, he bade me, and he put all these words in the mouth of thine handmaid: 
To fetch about this form of speech hath thy servant Joab done this thing: and my lord is wise, according to the wisdom of an angel of God, to know all things th
766,ength thereof was an hundred cubits, and the breadth thereof fifty cubits, and the height thereof thirty cubits, upon four rows of cedar pillars, with cedar beams upon the pillars. 
And it was covered with cedar above upon the beams, that lay on forty five pillars, fifteen in a row. 
And there were windows in three rows, and light was against light in three ranks. 
And all the doors and posts were square, with the windows: and light was against light in three ranks. 
And he made a porch of pillars; the length thereof was fifty cubits, and the breadth thereof thirty cubits: and the porch was before them: and the other pillars and the thick beam were before them. 
Then he made a porch for the throne where he might judge, even the porch of judgment: and it wa
809,e my face. 
And David sent messengers to Ishbosheth Saul's son, saying, Deliver me my wife Michal, which I espoused to me for an hundred foreskins of the Philistines. 
And Ishbosheth sent, and took her from her husband, even from Phaltiel the son of Laish. 
And her husband went with her along weeping behind her to Bahurim. Then said Abner unto him, Go, return. And he returned. 
And Abner had communication with the elders of Israel, saying, Ye sought for David in times past to be king over you: 
Now then do it: for the LORD hath spoken of David, saying, By the hand of my servant David I will save my people Israel out of the hand of the Philistines, and out of the hand of all their enemies. 
And Abner also spake in the ears of Benjamin: and Abner went also to speak in the ears of David in Hebron all 
704, because it seeth him not, neither knoweth him: but ye know him; for he dwelleth with you, and shall be in you. 
I will not leave you comfortless: I will come to you. 
Yet a little while, and the world seeth me no more; but ye see me: because I live, ye shall live also. 
At that day ye shall know that I am in my Father, and ye in me, and I in you. 
He that hath my commandments, and keepeth them, he it is that loveth me: and he that loveth me shall be loved of my Father, and I will love him, and will manifest myself to him. 
Judas saith unto him, not Iscariot, Lord, how is it that thou wilt manifest thyself unto us, and not unto the world? 
Jesus answered and said unto him, If a man love me, he w
579,her wings: 
So the LORD alone did lead him, and there was no strange god with him. 
He made him ride on the high places of the earth, that he might eat the increase of the fields; and he made him to suck honey out of the rock, and oil out of the flinty rock; 
Butter of kine, and milk of sheep, with fat of lambs, and rams of the breed of Bashan, and goats, with the fat of kidneys of wheat; and thou didst drink the pure blood of the grape. 
But Jeshurun waxed fat, and kicked: thou art waxen fat, thou art grown thick, thou art covered with fatness; then he forsook God which m
815, distraction. 
But if any man think that he behaveth himself uncomely toward his virgin, if she pass the flower of her age, and need so require, let him do what he will, he sinneth not: let them marry. 
Nevertheless he that standeth stedfast in his heart, having no necessity, but hath power over his own will, and hath so decreed in his heart that he will keep his virgin, doeth well. 
So then he that giveth her in marriage doeth well; but he that giveth her not in marriage doeth better. 
The wife is bound by the law as long as her husband liveth; but if her husband be dead, she is at liberty to be married to whom she will; only in the Lord. 
But she is happier if she so abide, after my judgment: and I think also that I have the Spirit of God. 
Now as touching things offered unto idols, we know that we all
636, understand all mysteries, and all knowledge; and though I have all faith, so that I could remove mountains, and have not charity, I am nothing. 
And though I bestow all my goods to feed the poor, and though I give my body to be burned, and have not charity, it profiteth me nothing. 
Charity suffereth long, and is kind; charity envieth not; charity vaunteth not itself, is not puffed up, 
Doth not behave itself unseemly, seeketh not her own, is not easily provoked, thinketh no evil; 
Rejoiceth not in iniquity, but rejoiceth in the truth; 
Beareth all things, believeth all things, hopeth all things, endureth all things. 
Charity n
822,ast ordained; 
What is man, that thou art mindful of him? and the son of man, that thou visitest him? 
For thou hast made him a little lower than the angels, and hast crowned him with glory and honour. 
Thou madest him to have dominion over the works of thy hands; thou hast put all things under his feet: 
All sheep and oxen, yea, and the beasts of the field; 
The fowl of the air, and the fish of the sea, and whatsoever passeth through the paths of the seas. 
O LORD our Lord, how excellent is thy name in all the earth! 
I will praise thee, O LORD, with my whole heart; I will shew forth all thy marvellous works. 
I will be glad and rejoice in thee: I will sing praise to thy name, O thou most High. 
When mine enemies are turned back, they shall fall and perish at thy presence. 
For thou hast maintained my right an
779, name. 
And to this agree the words of the prophets; as it is written, 
After this I will return, and will build again the tabernacle of David, which is fallen down; and I will build again the ruins thereof, and I will set it up: 
That the residue of men might seek after the Lord, and all the Gentiles, upon whom my name is called, saith the Lord, who doeth all these things. 
Known unto God are all his works from the beginning of the world. 
Wherefore my sentence is, that we trouble not them, which from among the Gentiles are turned to God: 
But that we write unto them, that they abstain from pollutions of idols, and from fornication, and from things strangled, and from blood. 
For Moses of old time hath in every city them that preach him, being read in the synagogues e
786,is fathers, and Nadab his son reigned in his stead. 
And Rehoboam the son of Solomon reigned in Judah. Rehoboam was forty and one years old when he began to reign, and he reigned seventeen years in Jerusalem, the city which the LORD did choose out of all the tribes of Israel, to put his name there. And his mother's name was Naamah an Ammonitess. 
And Judah did evil in the sight of the LORD, and they provoked him to jealousy with their sins which they had committed, above all that their fathers had done. 
For they also built them high places, and images, and groves, on every high hill, and under every green tree. 
And there were also sodomites in the land: and they did according to all the abominations of the nations which the LORD cast out before the children of Israel. 
And 
710,ndly unto them. 
And Joseph dwelt in Egypt, he, and his father's house: and Joseph lived an hundred and ten years. 
And Joseph saw Ephraim's children of the third generation: the children also of Machir the son of Manasseh were brought up upon Joseph's knees. 
And Joseph said unto his brethren, I die: and God will surely visit you, and bring you out of this land unto the land which he sware to Abraham, to Isaac, and to Jacob. 
And Joseph took an oath of the children of Israel, saying, God will surely visit you, and ye shall carry up my bones from hence. 
So Joseph died, being an hundred and ten years old: and they embalmed him, and he was put in a coffin in Egypt. 
Now these are the names of the child
833,, dreadful and terrible, and strong exceedingly; and it had great iron teeth: it devoured and brake in pieces, and stamped the residue with the feet of it: and it was diverse from all the beasts that were before it; and it had ten horns. 
I considered the horns, and, behold, there came up among them another little horn, before whom there were three of the first horns plucked up by the roots: and, behold, in this horn were eyes like the eyes of man, and a mouth speaking great things. 
I beheld till the thrones were cast down, and the Ancient of days did sit, whose garment was white as snow, and the hair of his head like the pure wool: his throne was like the fiery flame, and his wheels as burning fire. 
A fiery stream issued and came forth from before him: thousand thousands ministered unto him, and ten thousand times ten 
711, will; for thou art my God: thy spirit is good; lead me into the land of uprightness. 
Quicken me, O LORD, for thy name's sake: for thy righteousness' sake bring my soul out of trouble. 
And of thy mercy cut off mine enemies, and destroy all them that afflict my soul: for I am thy servant. 
Blessed be the LORD my strength which teacheth my hands to war, and my fingers to fight: 
My goodness, and my fortress; my high tower, and my deliverer; my shield, and he in whom I trust; who subdueth my people under me. 
LORD, what is man, that thou takest knowledge of him! or the son of man, that thou makest account of him! 
Man is like to vanity: his days are as a shadow that passeth away. 
Bow thy heavens, O LOR
563,nto your fathers. 
But I said, How shall I put thee among the children, and give thee a pleasant land, a goodly heritage of the hosts of nations? and I said, Thou shalt call me, My father; and shalt not turn away from me. 
Surely as a wife treacherously departeth from her husband, so have ye dealt treacherously with me, O house of Israel, saith the LORD. 
A voice was heard upon the high places, weeping and supplications of the children of Israel: for they have perverted their way, and they have forgotten the LORD their God. 
Return, ye backsliding children,
818, fight against thee; but they shall not prevail against thee; for I am with thee, saith the LORD, to deliver thee. 
Moreover the word of the LORD came to me, saying, 
Go and cry in the ears of Jerusalem, saying, Thus saith the LORD; I remember thee, the kindness of thy youth, the love of thine espousals, when thou wentest after me in the wilderness, in a land that was not sown. 
Israel was holiness unto the LORD, and the firstfruits of his increase: all that devour him shall offend; evil shall come upon them, saith the LORD. 
Hear ye the word of the LORD, O house of Jacob, and all the families of the house of Israel: 
Thus saith the LORD, What iniquity have your fathers found in me, that they are gone far from me, and have walked after vanity, and are become vain? 
Neither said they, Where is the LORD that 
734,lf from the dust; arise, and sit down, O Jerusalem: loose thyself from the bands of thy neck, O captive daughter of Zion. 
For thus saith the LORD, Ye have sold yourselves for nought; and ye shall be redeemed without money. 
For thus saith the Lord GOD, My people went down aforetime into Egypt to sojourn there; and the Assyrian oppressed them without cause. 
Now therefore, what have I here, saith the LORD, that my people is taken away for nought? they that rule over them make them to howl, saith the LORD; and my name continually every day is blasphemed. 
Therefore my people shall know my name: therefore they shall know in that day that I am he that doth speak: behold, it is I. 
How beautiful upon the mountains are the feet o
819,ies, and thou shalt have none to rescue them. 
Thy sons and thy daughters shall be given unto another people, and thine eyes shall look, and fail with longing for them all the day long; and there shall be no might in thine hand. 
The fruit of thy land, and all thy labours, shall a nation which thou knowest not eat up; and thou shalt be only oppressed and crushed alway: 
So that thou shalt be mad for the sight of thine eyes which thou shalt see. 
The LORD shall smite thee in the knees, and in the legs, with a sore botch that cannot be healed, from the sole of thy foot unto the top of thy head. 
The LORD shall bring thee, and thy king which thou shalt set over thee, unto a nation which neither thou nor thy fathers have known; and there shalt thou serve other gods, wood and stone. 
And thou shalt become an asto
603,t also be a crown of glory in the hand of the LORD, and a royal diadem in the hand of thy God. 
Thou shalt no more be termed Forsaken; neither shall thy land any more be termed Desolate: but thou shalt be called Hephzibah, and thy land Beulah: for the LORD delighteth in thee, and thy land shall be married. 
For as a young man marrieth a virgin, so shall thy sons marry thee: and as the bridegroom rejoiceth over the bride, so shall thy God rejoice over thee. 
I have set watchmen upon thy walls, O Jerusalem, which shall never hold their peace day nor night: ye that make mention of the LORD, keep not
803,ye be ready that at what time ye hear the sound of the cornet, flute, harp, sackbut, psaltery, and dulcimer, and all kinds of musick, ye fall down and worship the image which I have made; well: but if ye worship not, ye shall be cast the same hour into the midst of a burning fiery furnace; and who is that God that shall deliver you out of my hands? 
Shadrach, Meshach, and Abednego, answered and said to the king, O Nebuchadnezzar, we are not careful to answer thee in this matter. 
If it be so, our God whom we serve is able to deliver us from the burning fiery furnace, and he will deliver us out of thine hand, O king. 
But if not, be it known unto thee, O king, that we will not serve thy gods, nor worship the golden image which thou hast set up. 
Then was Nebuchadnezzar full of fury, and the fo
686,But I keep under my body, and bring it into subjection: lest that by any means, when I have preached to others, I myself should be a castaway. 
Moreover, brethren, I would not that ye should be ignorant, how that all our fathers were under the cloud, and all passed through the sea; 
And were all baptized unto Moses in the cloud and in the sea; 
And did all eat the same spiritual meat; 
And did all drink the same spiritual drink: for they drank of that spiritual Rock that followed them: and that Rock was Christ. 
But with many of them God was not well pleased: for they were overthrown in the wilderness. 
Now these things were our examples, to the intent we should not lust after 
601,ckets shall be of brass; the hooks of the pillars and their fillets shall be of silver. 
And likewise for the north side in length there shall be hangings of an hundred cubits long, and his twenty pillars and their twenty sockets of brass; the hooks of the pillars and their fillets of silver. 
And for the breadth of the court on the west side shall be hangings of fifty cubits: their pillars ten, and their sockets ten. 
And the breadth of the court on the east side eastward shall be fifty cubits. 
The hangings of one side of the gate shall be fifteen cubits: their pillars three, and their socket
778, shine forth, thou shalt be as the morning. 
And thou shalt be secure, because there is hope; yea, thou shalt dig about thee, and thou shalt take thy rest in safety. 
Also thou shalt lie down, and none shall make thee afraid; yea, many shall make suit unto thee. 
But the eyes of the wicked shall fail, and they shall not escape, and their hope shall be as the giving up of the ghost. 
And Job answered and said, 
No doubt but ye are the people, and wisdom shall die with you. 
But I have understanding as well as you; I am not inferior to you: yea, who knoweth not such things as these? 
I am as one mocked of his neighbour, who calleth upon God, and he answereth him: the just upright man is laughed to scorn. 
He that is ready to slip with his feet is as a lamp despised in t
688,ade myself servant unto all, that I might gain the more. 
And unto the Jews I became as a Jew, that I might gain the Jews; to them that are under the law, as under the law, that I might gain them that are under the law; 
To them that are without law, as without law, (being not without law to God, but under the law to Christ,) that I might gain them that are without law. 
To the weak became I as weak, that I might gain the weak: I am made all things to all men, that I might by all means save some. 
And this I do for the gospel's sake, that I might be partaker thereof with you. 
Know ye not that they which run in a race run all, but one receiveth the prize? So run, that ye may obta
617,ot his hand; nor he that bindeth sheaves his bosom. 
Neither do they which go by say, The blessing of the LORD be upon you: we bless you in the name of the LORD. 
Out of the depths have I cried unto thee, O LORD. 
Lord, hear my voice: let thine ears be attentive to the voice of my supplications. 
If thou, LORD, shouldest mark iniquities, O Lord, who shall stand? 
But there is forgiveness with thee, that thou mayest be feared. 
I wait for the LORD, my soul doth wait, and in his word do I hope. 
My soul waiteth for the Lord more than they that watch for the morning: I say, more than they that watch for the morni
645,hath thrown down, and hath not pitied: and he hath caused thine enemy to rejoice over thee, he hath set up the horn of thine adversaries. 
Their heart cried unto the LORD, O wall of the daughter of Zion, let tears run down like a river day and night: give thyself no rest; let not the apple of thine eye cease. 
Arise, cry out in the night: in the beginning of the watches pour out thine heart like water before the face of the LORD: lift up thy hands toward him for the life of thy young children, that faint for hunger in the top of every street. 
Behold, O LORD, and consider to whom thou hast done this. Shall the women eat their fruit, and 
675,soul. 
I sink in deep mire, where there is no standing: I am come into deep waters, where the floods overflow me. 
I am weary of my crying: my throat is dried: mine eyes fail while I wait for my God. 
They that hate me without a cause are more than the hairs of mine head: they that would destroy me, being mine enemies wrongfully, are mighty: then I restored that which I took not away. 
O God, thou knowest my foolishness; and my sins are not hid from thee. 
Let not them that wait on thee, O Lord GOD of hosts, be ashamed for my sake: let not those that seek thee be confounded for my sake, O God of Israel. 
Because for thy sake I have borne reproach; shame hath covered 
685,to them, Render therefore unto Caesar the things which be Caesar's, and unto God the things which be God's. 
And they could not take hold of his words before the people: and they marvelled at his answer, and held their peace. 
Then came to him certain of the Sadducees, which deny that there is any resurrection; and they asked him, 
Saying, Master, Moses wrote unto us, If any man's brother die, having a wife, and he die without children, that his brother should take his wife, and raise up seed unto his brother. 
There were therefore seven brethren: and the first took a wife, and died without children. 
And the second took her to wife, and he died childless. 
And the third took 
574, legs of iron, his feet part of iron and part of clay. 
Thou sawest till that a stone was cut out without hands, which smote the image upon his feet that were of iron and clay, and brake them to pieces. 
Then was the iron, the clay, the brass, the silver, and the gold, broken to pieces together, and became like the chaff of the summer threshingfloors; and the wind carried them away, that no place was found for them: and the stone that smote the image became a great mountain, and filled the whole earth. 
This is the dream; and we will tell the interpretation thereof be
603,y gate: for so had David the man of God commanded. 
And they departed not from the commandment of the king unto the priests and Levites concerning any matter, or concerning the treasures. 
Now all the work of Solomon was prepared unto the day of the foundation of the house of the LORD, and until it was finished. So the house of the LORD was perfected. 
Then went Solomon to Eziongeber, and to Eloth, at the sea side in the land of Edom. 
And Huram sent him by the hands of his servants ships, and servants that had knowledge of the sea; and they went with the servants of Solomon to Ophir, and took th
640, the habitation of the LORD, and turned their backs. 
Also they have shut up the doors of the porch, and put out the lamps, and have not burned incense nor offered burnt offerings in the holy place unto the God of Israel. 
Wherefore the wrath of the LORD was upon Judah and Jerusalem, and he hath delivered them to trouble, to astonishment, and to hissing, as ye see with your eyes. 
For, lo, our fathers have fallen by the sword, and our sons and our daughters and our wives are in captivity for this. 
Now it is in mine heart to make a covenant with the LORD God of Israel, that his fierce wrath may turn away from us. 
My sons, be not no
745,reb. 
The LORD made not this covenant with our fathers, but with us, even us, who are all of us here alive this day. 
The LORD talked with you face to face in the mount out of the midst of the fire, 
(I stood between the LORD and you at that time, to shew you the word of the LORD: for ye were afraid by reason of the fire, and went not up into the mount;) saying, 
I am the LORD thy God, which brought thee out of the land of Egypt, from the house of bondage. 
Thou shalt have none other gods before me. 
Thou shalt not make thee any graven image, or any likeness of any thing that is in heaven above, or that is in the earth beneath, or that is in the waters beneath the earth: 
Thou shalt not bow down thyself unto them, nor serve them: for I
605,f God; then understood I their end. 
Surely thou didst set them in slippery places: thou castedst them down into destruction. 
How are they brought into desolation, as in a moment! they are utterly consumed with terrors. 
As a dream when one awaketh; so, O Lord, when thou awakest, thou shalt despise their image. 
Thus my heart was grieved, and I was pricked in my reins. 
So foolish was I, and ignorant: I was as a beast before thee. 
Nevertheless I am continually with thee: thou hast holden me by my right hand. 
Thou shalt guide me with thy counsel, and afterward receive me to glory. 
Whom have I in
597, they were filled, he said unto his disciples, Gather up the fragments that remain, that nothing be lost. 
Therefore they gathered them together, and filled twelve baskets with the fragments of the five barley loaves, which remained over and above unto them that had eaten. 
Then those men, when they had seen the miracle that Jesus did, said, This is of a truth that prophet that should come into the world. 
When Jesus therefore perceived that they would come and take him by force, to make him a king, he departed again into a mountain himself alone. 
And when even was now come, his disciples 
636,ter of Cozbi, the daughter of a prince of Midian, their sister, which was slain in the day of the plague for Peor's sake. 
And it came to pass after the plague, that the LORD spake unto Moses and unto Eleazar the son of Aaron the priest, saying, 
Take the sum of all the congregation of the children of Israel, from twenty years old and upward, throughout their fathers' house, all that are able to go to war in Israel. 
And Moses and Eleazar the priest spake with them in the plains of Moab by Jordan near Jericho, saying, 
Take the sum of the people, from twenty years old and upward; as the LORD commanded Moses and the children of I
802, so spake, that a great multitude both of the Jews and also of the Greeks believed. 
But the unbelieving Jews stirred up the Gentiles, and made their minds evil affected against the brethren. 
Long time therefore abode they speaking boldly in the Lord, which gave testimony unto the word of his grace, and granted signs and wonders to be done by their hands. 
But the multitude of the city was divided: and part held with the Jews, and part with the apostles. 
And when there was an assault made both of the Gentiles, and also of the Jews with their rulers, to use them despitefully, and to stone them, 
They were ware of it, and fled unto Lystra and Derbe, cities of Lycaonia, and unto the region that lieth round about: 
And there they preached the gospel. 
And there sat a certain man at Lystra, imp
786,he dogs. 
And she answered and said unto him, Yes, Lord: yet the dogs under the table eat of the children's crumbs. 
And he said unto her, For this saying go thy way; the devil is gone out of thy daughter. 
And when she was come to her house, she found the devil gone out, and her daughter laid upon the bed. 
And again, departing from the coasts of Tyre and Sidon, he came unto the sea of Galilee, through the midst of the coasts of Decapolis. 
And they bring unto him one that was deaf, and had an impediment in his speech; and they beseech him to put his hand upon him. 
And he took him aside from the multitude, and put his fingers into his ears, and he spit, and touched his tongue; 
And looking up to heaven, he sighed, and saith unto him, Ephphatha, that is, Be opened. 
And stra
705,the son in law of the Timnite, because he had taken his wife, and given her to his companion. And the Philistines came up, and burnt her and her father with fire. 
And Samson said unto them, Though ye have done this, yet will I be avenged of you, and after that I will cease. 
And he smote them hip and thigh with a great slaughter: and he went down and dwelt in the top of the rock Etam. 
Then the Philistines went up, and pitched in Judah, and spread themselves in Lehi. 
And the men of Judah said, Why are ye come up against us? And they answered, To bind Samson are we come up, to do to him as he hath done to us. 
Then three thousand men of Judah went to the top of the rock Etam, and said to Samson,
644,, and they shall not be few; I will also glorify them, and they shall not be small. 
Their children also shall be as aforetime, and their congregation shall be established before me, and I will punish all that oppress them. 
And their nobles shall be of themselves, and their governor shall proceed from the midst of them; and I will cause him to draw near, and he shall approach unto me: for who is this that engaged his heart to approach unto me? saith the LORD. 
And ye shall be my people, and I will be your God. 
Behold, the whirlwind of the LORD goeth forth with fury, a continuing whirlwind: it shall fall with pain upon the head of the 
606,nications, thefts, false witness, blasphemies: 
These are the things which defile a man: but to eat with unwashen hands defileth not a man. 
Then Jesus went thence, and departed into the coasts of Tyre and Sidon. 
And, behold, a woman of Canaan came out of the same coasts, and cried unto him, saying, Have mercy on me, O Lord, thou son of David; my daughter is grievously vexed with a devil. 
But he answered her not a word. And his disciples came and besought him, saying, Send her away; for she crieth after us. 
But he answered and said, I am not sent but unto the lost sheep of the house of Israel. 
T
619,th into the holy place every year with blood of others; 
For then must he often have suffered since the foundation of the world: but now once in the end of the world hath he appeared to put away sin by the sacrifice of himself. 
And as it is appointed unto men once to die, but after this the judgment: 
So Christ was once offered to bear the sins of many; and unto them that look for him shall he appear the second time without sin unto salvation. 
For the law having a shadow of good things to come, and not the very image of the things, can never with those sacrifices which they offered year by year continually mak
826, doest thou here, Elijah? 
And he said, I have been very jealous for the LORD God of hosts: because the children of Israel have forsaken thy covenant, thrown down thine altars, and slain thy prophets with the sword; and I, even I only, am left; and they seek my life, to take it away. 
And the LORD said unto him, Go, return on thy way to the wilderness of Damascus: and when thou comest, anoint Hazael to be king over Syria: 
And Jehu the son of Nimshi shalt thou anoint to be king over Israel: and Elisha the son of Shaphat of Abelmeholah shalt thou anoint to be prophet in thy room. 
And it shall come to pass, that him that escapeth the sword of Hazael shall Jehu slay: and him that escapeth from the sword of Jehu shall Elisha slay. 
Yet I have left me seven thousand in Israel, all the knees which have not bowed unto Ba
770, their tongues: for I have seen violence and strife in the city. 
Day and night they go about it upon the walls thereof: mischief also and sorrow are in the midst of it. 
Wickedness is in the midst thereof: deceit and guile depart not from her streets. 
For it was not an enemy that reproached me; then I could have borne it: neither was it he that hated me that did magnify himself against me; then I would have hid myself from him: 
But it was thou, a man mine equal, my guide, and mine acquaintance. 
We took sweet counsel together, and walked unto the house of God in company. 
Let death seize upon them, and let them go down quick into hell: for wickedness is in their dwellings, and among them. 
As for me, I will call upon God; and the LORD shall save me. 
Evenin
807,ve thee counsel, that thou mayest save thine own life, and the life of thy son Solomon. 
Go and get thee in unto king David, and say unto him, Didst not thou, my lord, O king, swear unto thine handmaid, saying, Assuredly Solomon thy son shall reign after me, and he shall sit upon my throne? why then doth Adonijah reign? 
Behold, while thou yet talkest there with the king, I also will come in after thee, and confirm thy words. 
And Bathsheba went in unto the king into the chamber: and the king was very old; and Abishag the Shunammite ministered unto the king. 
And Bathsheba bowed, and did obeisance unto the king. And the king said, What wouldest thou? 
And she said unto him, My lord, thou swarest by the LORD thy God unto thine handmaid, saying, Assuredly Solomon thy son shall reign after me, and h
753,, Have not I chosen you twelve, and one of you is a devil? 
He spake of Judas Iscariot the son of Simon: for he it was that should betray him, being one of the twelve. 
After these things Jesus walked in Galilee: for he would not walk in Jewry, because the Jews sought to kill him. 
Now the Jew's feast of tabernacles was at hand. 
His brethren therefore said unto him, Depart hence, and go into Judaea, that thy disciples also may see the works that thou doest. 
For there is no man that doeth any thing in secret, and he himself seeketh to be known openly. If thou do these things, shew thyself to the world. 
For neither did his brethren believe in him. 
Then Jesus said unto them, My time is not yet come: but your time is alway ready. 
The world ca
766,en it presumptuously: thou shalt not be afraid of him. 
When the LORD thy God hath cut off the nations, whose land the LORD thy God giveth thee, and thou succeedest them, and dwellest in their cities, and in their houses; 
Thou shalt separate three cities for thee in the midst of thy land, which the LORD thy God giveth thee to possess it. 
Thou shalt prepare thee a way, and divide the coasts of thy land, which the LORD thy God giveth thee to inherit, into three parts, that every slayer may flee thither. 
And this is the case of the slayer, which shall flee thither, that he may live: Whoso killeth his neighbour ignorantly, whom he hated not in time past; 
As when a man goeth into the wood with his neighbour to hew wood, and his hand fetcheth a stroke with t
678, only officer which was in the land. 
Judah and Israel were many, as the sand which is by the sea in multitude, eating and drinking, and making merry. 
And Solomon reigned over all kingdoms from the river unto the land of the Philistines, and unto the border of Egypt: they brought presents, and served Solomon all the days of his life. 
And Solomon's provision for one day was thirty measures of fine flour, and threescore measures of meal, 
Ten fat oxen, and twenty oxen out of the pastures, and an hundred sheep, beside harts, and roebucks, and fallowdeer, and fatted fowl. 
For he had dominion over all the region on this side the river, from Tiphsah even to Azzah, over all
649,We are very far from you; when ye dwell among us? 
Now therefore ye are cursed, and there shall none of you be freed from being bondmen, and hewers of wood and drawers of water for the house of my God. 
And they answered Joshua, and said, Because it was certainly told thy servants, how that the LORD thy God commanded his servant Moses to give you all the land, and to destroy all the inhabitants of the land from before you, therefore we were sore afraid of our lives because of you, and have done this thing. 
And now, behold, we are in thine hand: as it seemeth good and right unto thee to do unto us, do. 
And so did he unto them, and delivered
799,w that there was corn in Egypt, Jacob said unto his sons, Why do ye look one upon another? 
And he said, Behold, I have heard that there is corn in Egypt: get you down thither, and buy for us from thence; that we may live, and not die. 
And Joseph's ten brethren went down to buy corn in Egypt. 
But Benjamin, Joseph's brother, Jacob sent not with his brethren; for he said, Lest peradventure mischief befall him. 
And the sons of Israel came to buy corn among those that came: for the famine was in the land of Canaan. 
And Joseph was the governor over the land, and he it was that sold to all the people of the land: and Joseph's brethren came, and bowed down themselves before him with their faces to the earth. 
And Joseph saw his brethren, and he knew them, but made himself strange unto them, 
777,or him, we will be glad and rejoice in his salvation. 
For in this mountain shall the hand of the LORD rest, and Moab shall be trodden down under him, even as straw is trodden down for the dunghill. 
And he shall spread forth his hands in the midst of them, as he that swimmeth spreadeth forth his hands to swim: and he shall bring down their pride together with the spoils of their hands. 
And the fortress of the high fort of thy walls shall he bring down, lay low, and bring to the ground, even to the dust. 
In that day shall this song be sung in the land of Judah; We have a strong city; salvation will God appoint for walls and bulwarks. 
Open ye the gates, that the righteous nation which keepeth the truth may enter in. 
Thou wilt keep him in perfect peace, whose mind 
651,ns be the husbands of one wife, ruling their children and their own houses well. 
For they that have used the office of a deacon well purchase to themselves a good degree, and great boldness in the faith which is in Christ Jesus. 
These things write I unto thee, hoping to come unto thee shortly: 
But if I tarry long, that thou mayest know how thou oughtest to behave thyself in the house of God, which is the church of the living God, the pillar and ground of the truth. 
And without controversy great is the mystery of godliness: God was manifest in the flesh, justified in the Spirit, seen of angels, preached unto the Gentiles, believed on in the
797,ld, thou hast spoken and done evil things as thou couldest. 
The LORD said also unto me in the days of Josiah the king, Hast thou seen that which backsliding Israel hath done? she is gone up upon every high mountain and under every green tree, and there hath played the harlot. 
And I said after she had done all these things, Turn thou unto me. But she returned not. And her treacherous sister Judah saw it. 
And I saw, when for all the causes whereby backsliding Israel committed adultery I had put her away, and given her a bill of divorce; yet her treacherous sister Judah feared not, but went and played the harlot also. 
And it came to pass through the lightness of her whoredom, that she defiled the land, and committed adultery with stones and with stocks. 
And yet for all this her treach
705, upon thine own head. 
For as ye have drunk upon my holy mountain, so shall all the heathen drink continually, yea, they shall drink, and they shall swallow down, and they shall be as though they had not been. 
But upon mount Zion shall be deliverance, and there shall be holiness; and the house of Jacob shall possess their possessions. 
And the house of Jacob shall be a fire, and the house of Joseph a flame, and the house of Esau for stubble, and they shall kindle in them, and devour them; and there shall not be any remaining of the house of Esau; for the LORD hath spoken it. 
And they of the south shall possess the mount of Esau; and they of the plain the Philistines: and they shall possess the 
567,. 
And Mephibosheth the son of Saul came down to meet the king, and had neither dressed his feet, nor trimmed his beard, nor washed his clothes, from the day the king departed until the day he came again in peace. 
And it came to pass, when he was come to Jerusalem to meet the king, that the king said unto him, Wherefore wentest not thou with me, Mephibosheth? 
And he answered, My lord, O king, my servant deceived me: for thy servant said, I will saddle me an ass, that I may ride thereon, and go to the king; because thy servant is lame. 
And he hath slandered t
654,overed with cedar above upon the beams, that lay on forty five pillars, fifteen in a row. 
And there were windows in three rows, and light was against light in three ranks. 
And all the doors and posts were square, with the windows: and light was against light in three ranks. 
And he made a porch of pillars; the length thereof was fifty cubits, and the breadth thereof thirty cubits: and the porch was before them: and the other pillars and the thick beam were before them. 
Then he made a porch for the throne where he might judge, even the porch of judgment: and it was covered with cedar from one side of the floor to the other. 
And his house where
614,kingdom of God, and you yourselves thrust out. 
And they shall come from the east, and from the west, and from the north, and from the south, and shall sit down in the kingdom of God. 
And, behold, there are last which shall be first, and there are first which shall be last. 
The same day there came certain of the Pharisees, saying unto him, Get thee out, and depart hence: for Herod will kill thee. 
And he said unto them, Go ye, and tell that fox, Behold, I cast out devils, and I do cures to day and to morrow, and the third day I shall be perfected. 
Nevertheless I must walk to day, and to morrow, and the d
587,h day. 
But Jesus answered them, My Father worketh hitherto, and I work. 
Therefore the Jews sought the more to kill him, because he not only had broken the sabbath, but said also that God was his Father, making himself equal with God. 
Then answered Jesus and said unto them, Verily, verily, I say unto you, The Son can do nothing of himself, but what he seeth the Father do: for what things soever he doeth, these also doeth the Son likewise. 
For the Father loveth the Son, and sheweth him all things that himself doeth: and he will shew him greater works than these, that ye may marv
696,nty males. 
And of the sons of Shephatiah; Zebadiah the son of Michael, and with him fourscore males. 
Of the sons of Joab; Obadiah the son of Jehiel, and with him two hundred and eighteen males. 
And of the sons of Shelomith; the son of Josiphiah, and with him an hundred and threescore males. 
And of the sons of Bebai; Zechariah the son of Bebai, and with him twenty and eight males. 
And of the sons of Azgad; Johanan the son of Hakkatan, and with him an hundred and ten males. 
And of the last sons of Adonikam, whose names are these, Eliphelet, Jeiel, and Shemaiah, and with them threescore males. 
Of the sons also of Bigvai; Uthai, and Zabbud, and with them seventy males. 
And I gathered
797,many angels round about the throne and the beasts and the elders: and the number of them was ten thousand times ten thousand, and thousands of thousands; 
Saying with a loud voice, Worthy is the Lamb that was slain to receive power, and riches, and wisdom, and strength, and honour, and glory, and blessing. 
And every creature which is in heaven, and on the earth, and under the earth, and such as are in the sea, and all that are in them, heard I saying, Blessing, and honour, and glory, and power, be unto him that sitteth upon the throne, and unto the Lamb for ever and ever. 
And the four beasts said, Amen. And the four and twenty elders fell down and worshipped him that liveth for ever and ever. 
And I saw when the Lamb opened one of the seals, and I heard, as it were the noise of thunde
705,ORD spake unto you in the mount out of the midst of the fire in the day of the assembly: and the LORD gave them unto me. 
And I turned myself and came down from the mount, and put the tables in the ark which I had made; and there they be, as the LORD commanded me. 
And the children of Israel took their journey from Beeroth of the children of Jaakan to Mosera: there Aaron died, and there he was buried; and Eleazar his son ministered in the priest's office in his stead. 
From thence they journeyed unto Gudgodah; and from Gudgodah to Jotbath, a land of rivers of waters. 
At that time the LORD separated the tribe of Levi, to bear the ark of the covenant of the LORD, to stand before the LORD to minist
760,e morning, and builded an altar under the hill, and twelve pillars, according to the twelve tribes of Israel. 
And he sent young men of the children of Israel, which offered burnt offerings, and sacrificed peace offerings of oxen unto the LORD. 
And Moses took half of the blood, and put it in basons; and half of the blood he sprinkled on the altar. 
And he took the book of the covenant, and read in the audience of the people: and they said, All that the LORD hath said will we do, and be obedient. 
And Moses took the blood, and sprinkled it on the people, and said, Behold the blood of the covenant, which the LORD hath made with you concerning all these words. 
Then went up Moses, and Aaron, Nadab, and Abihu, and seventy of the elders of Israel: 
And t
825,streets, they shall justle one against another in the broad ways: they shall seem like torches, they shall run like the lightnings. 
He shall recount his worthies: they shall stumble in their walk; they shall make haste to the wall thereof, and the defence shall be prepared. 
The gates of the rivers shall be opened, and the palace shall be dissolved. 
And Huzzab shall be led away captive, she shall be brought up, and her maids shall lead her as with the voice of doves, tabering upon their breasts. 
But Nineveh is of old like a pool of water: yet they shall flee away. Stand, stand, shall they cry; but none shall look back. 
Take ye the spoil of silver, take the spoil of gold: for there is none end of the store and glory out of all the pleasant furniture. 
She is empty, and void, and waste: and the heart melteth, an
706,d the son of Jonathan was Meribbaal; and Meribbaal begat Micah. 
And the sons of Micah were, Pithon, and Melech, and Tarea, and Ahaz. 
And Ahaz begat Jehoadah; and Jehoadah begat Alemeth, and Azmaveth, and Zimri; and Zimri begat Moza, 
And Moza begat Binea: Rapha was his son, Eleasah his son, Azel his son: 
And Azel had six sons, whose names are these, Azrikam, Bocheru, and Ishmael, and Sheariah, and Obadiah, and Hanan. All these were the sons of Azel. 
And the sons of Eshek his brother were, Ulam his firstborn, Jehush the second, and Eliphelet the third. 
And the sons of Ulam were mighty men of valour, archers, and had many sons, and sons' sons, an hundred and fifty. All these are of the sons of 
602,cry himself, but shall not be heard. 
A gift in secret pacifieth anger: and a reward in the bosom strong wrath. 
It is joy to the just to do judgment: but destruction shall be to the workers of iniquity. 
The man that wandereth out of the way of understanding shall remain in the congregation of the dead. 
He that loveth pleasure shall be a poor man: he that loveth wine and oil shall not be rich. 
The wicked shall be a ransom for the righteous, and the transgressor for the upright. 
It is better to dwell in the wilderness, than with a contentious and an angry woman. 
There is treasure to be desir
566,eroboam; and get thee to Shiloh: behold, there is Ahijah the prophet, which told me that I should be king over this people. 
And take with thee ten loaves, and cracknels, and a cruse of honey, and go to him: he shall tell thee what shall become of the child. 
And Jeroboam's wife did so, and arose, and went to Shiloh, and came to the house of Ahijah. But Ahijah could not see; for his eyes were set by reason of his age. 
And the LORD said unto Ahijah, Behold, the wife of Jeroboam cometh to ask a thing of thee for her son; for he is sick: thus and thus shalt thou
699,uthward, from the hill that lieth before Bethhoron southward; and the goings out thereof were at Kirjathbaal, which is Kirjathjearim, a city of the children of Judah: this was the west quarter. 
And the south quarter was from the end of Kirjathjearim, and the border went out on the west, and went out to the well of waters of Nephtoah: 
And the border came down to the end of the mountain that lieth before the valley of the son of Hinnom, and which is in the valley of the giants on the north, and descended to the valley of Hinnom, to the side of Jebusi on the south, and descended to Enrogel, 
And was drawn from the north, and went forth to Enshemesh, and went forth toward Geliloth, which is o
682,ntil the day break, and the shadows flee away, turn, my beloved, and be thou like a roe or a young hart upon the mountains of Bether. 
By night on my bed I sought him whom my soul loveth: I sought him, but I found him not. 
I will rise now, and go about the city in the streets, and in the broad ways I will seek him whom my soul loveth: I sought him, but I found him not. 
The watchmen that go about the city found me: to whom I said, Saw ye him whom my soul loveth? 
It was but a little that I passed from them, but I found him whom my soul loveth: I held him, and would not let him go, until I had brought him into my mother's house, and into the chamber of her that conceived me
659,s none abiding. 
O LORD our God, all this store that we have prepared to build thee an house for thine holy name cometh of thine hand, and is all thine own. 
I know also, my God, that thou triest the heart, and hast pleasure in uprightness. As for me, in the uprightness of mine heart I have willingly offered all these things: and now have I seen with joy thy people, which are present here, to offer willingly unto thee. 
O LORD God of Abraham, Isaac, and of Israel, our fathers, keep this for ever in the imagination of the thoughts of the heart of thy people, and prepare their heart unto thee: 
And give unto Solomon my son a perfect heart, to keep thy c
598,lly the parchments. 
Alexander the coppersmith did me much evil: the Lord reward him according to his works: 
Of whom be thou ware also; for he hath greatly withstood our words. 
At my first answer no man stood with me, but all men forsook me: I pray God that it may not be laid to their charge. 
Notwithstanding the Lord stood with me, and strengthened me; that by me the preaching might be fully known, and that all the Gentiles might hear: and I was delivered out of the mouth of the lion. 
And the Lord shall deliver me from every evil work, and will preserve me unto his heavenly kingdom: to w
741,ught and could not find them, they returned to Jerusalem. 
And it came to pass, after they were departed, that they came up out of the well, and went and told king David, and said unto David, Arise, and pass quickly over the water: for thus hath Ahithophel counselled against you. 
Then David arose, and all the people that were with him, and they passed over Jordan: by the morning light there lacked not one of them that was not gone over Jordan. 
And when Ahithophel saw that his counsel was not followed, he saddled his ass, and arose, and gat him home to his house, to his city, and put his household in order, and hanged himself, and died, and was buried in the sepulchre of his father. 
Then David came to Mahanaim. And Absalom passed
561,hall break down the house, the stones of it, and the timber thereof, and all the morter of the house; and he shall carry them forth out of the city into an unclean place. 
Moreover he that goeth into the house all the while that it is shut up shall be unclean until the even. 
And he that lieth in the house shall wash his clothes; and he that eateth in the house shall wash his clothes. 
And if the priest shall come in, and look upon it, and, behold, the plague hath not spread in the house, after the house was plaistered: then the priest shall pronounce the
812, work of righteousness shall be peace; and the effect of righteousness quietness and assurance for ever. 
And my people shall dwell in a peaceable habitation, and in sure dwellings, and in quiet resting places; 
When it shall hail, coming down on the forest; and the city shall be low in a low place. 
Blessed are ye that sow beside all waters, that send forth thither the feet of the ox and the ass. 
Woe to thee that spoilest, and thou wast not spoiled; and dealest treacherously, and they dealt not treacherously with thee! when thou shalt cease to spoil, thou shalt be spoiled; and when thou shalt make an end to deal treacherously, they shall deal treacherously with thee. 
O LORD, be gracious unto us; we have waited for thee: be thou their arm every morning, our salvation also in the time of trouble. 
At
800,tempted. 
Wherefore, holy brethren, partakers of the heavenly calling, consider the Apostle and High Priest of our profession, Christ Jesus; 
Who was faithful to him that appointed him, as also Moses was faithful in all his house. 
For this man was counted worthy of more glory than Moses, inasmuch as he who hath builded the house hath more honour than the house. 
For every house is builded by some man; but he that built all things is God. 
And Moses verily was faithful in all his house, as a servant, for a testimony of those things which were to be spoken after; 
But Christ as a son over his own house; whose house are we, if we hold fast the confidence and the rejoicing of the hope firm unto the end. 
Wherefore (as the Holy Ghost saith, To day if ye will hear his voice, 
Harden not your he
668,Thus saith the LORD of hosts, the God of Israel; Thus shall ye say unto your masters; 
I have made the earth, the man and the beast that are upon the ground, by my great power and by my outstretched arm, and have given it unto whom it seemed meet unto me. 
And now have I given all these lands into the hand of Nebuchadnezzar the king of Babylon, my servant; and the beasts of the field have I given him also to serve him. 
And all nations shall serve him, and his son, and his son's son, until the very time of his land come: and then many nations and great kings shall serve themselves of him. 
And it shall come to pass, that the nation and kingdom which will not s
734,Of the sons of Kohath; Uriel the chief, and his brethren an hundred and twenty: 
Of the sons of Merari; Asaiah the chief, and his brethren two hundred and twenty: 
Of the sons of Gershom; Joel the chief and his brethren an hundred and thirty: 
Of the sons of Elizaphan; Shemaiah the chief, and his brethren two hundred: 
Of the sons of Hebron; Eliel the chief, and his brethren fourscore: 
Of the sons of Uzziel; Amminadab the chief, and his brethren an hundred and twelve. 
And David called for Zadok and Abiathar the priests, and for the Levites, for Uriel, Asaiah, and Joel, Shemaiah, and Eliel, and Amminadab, 
And said unto them, Ye are the chief of the fathers of the Levites: sanctify yourselves, both ye and your brethren, tha
748,s, even white bright spots; 
Then the priest shall look: and, behold, if the bright spots in the skin of their flesh be darkish white; it is a freckled spot that groweth in the skin; he is clean. 
And the man whose hair is fallen off his head, he is bald; yet is he clean. 
And he that hath his hair fallen off from the part of his head toward his face, he is forehead bald: yet is he clean. 
And if there be in the bald head, or bald forehead, a white reddish sore; it is a leprosy sprung up in his bald head, or his bald forehead. 
Then the priest shall look upon it: and, behold, if the rising of the sore be white reddish in his bald head, or in his bald forehead, as the leprosy appeareth in the skin of the flesh; 
He is a leprous man, he is 
568,the standard of the camp of Reuben according to their armies: and the captain of the children of Reuben shall be Elizur the son of Shedeur. 
And his host, and those that were numbered thereof, were forty and six thousand and five hundred. 
And those which pitch by him shall be the tribe of Simeon: and the captain of the children of Simeon shall be Shelumiel the son of Zurishaddai. 
And his host, and those that were numbered of them, were fifty and nine thousand and three hundred. 
Then the tribe of Gad: and the captain of the sons of Gad shall be Eliasaph the so
813, as though he would go to Jerusalem. 
And when his disciples James and John saw this, they said, Lord, wilt thou that we command fire to come down from heaven, and consume them, even as Elias did? 
But he turned, and rebuked them, and said, Ye know not what manner of spirit ye are of. 
For the Son of man is not come to destroy men's lives, but to save them. And they went to another village. 
And it came to pass, that, as they went in the way, a certain man said unto him, Lord, I will follow thee whithersoever thou goest. 
And Jesus said unto him, Foxes have holes, and birds of the air have nests; but the Son of man hath not where to lay his head. 
And he said unto another, Follow me. But he said, Lord, suffer me first to go and bury my father. 
Jesus said unto him, Let the dead bury their dead: but go 
770, after them went Hoshaiah, and half of the princes of Judah, 
And Azariah, Ezra, and Meshullam, 
Judah, and Benjamin, and Shemaiah, and Jeremiah, 
And certain of the priests' sons with trumpets; namely, Zechariah the son of Jonathan, the son of Shemaiah, the son of Mattaniah, the son of Michaiah, the son of Zaccur, the son of Asaph: 
And his brethren, Shemaiah, and Azarael, Milalai, Gilalai, Maai, Nethaneel, and Judah, Hanani, with the musical instruments of David the man of God, and Ezra the scribe before them. 
And at the fountain gate, which was over against them, they went up by the stairs of the city of David, at the going up of the wall, above the house of David, even unto the water gate eastward. 
And the other company of them that gave thanks went over
819,tion shall praise thy works to another, and shall declare thy mighty acts. 
I will speak of the glorious honour of thy majesty, and of thy wondrous works. 
And men shall speak of the might of thy terrible acts: and I will declare thy greatness. 
They shall abundantly utter the memory of thy great goodness, and shall sing of thy righteousness. 
The LORD is gracious, and full of compassion; slow to anger, and of great mercy. 
The LORD is good to all: and his tender mercies are over all his works. 
All thy works shall praise thee, O LORD; and thy saints shall bless thee. 
They shall speak of the glory of thy kingdom, and talk of thy power; 
To make known to the sons of men his mighty acts, and the glorious majesty of his kingdom. 
Thy kingdom is an everlasting kingdom, and thy dominion endureth throughout all g
642,le. 
And he saith unto them, Ye shall drink indeed of my cup, and be baptized with the baptism that I am baptized with: but to sit on my right hand, and on my left, is not mine to give, but it shall be given to them for whom it is prepared of my Father. 
And when the ten heard it, they were moved with indignation against the two brethren. 
But Jesus called them unto him, and said, Ye know that the princes of the Gentiles exercise dominion over them, and they that are great exercise authority upon them. 
But it shall not be so among you: but whosoever will be great among you, let him be your minister; 
And whosoever will be chief among
839,hold, the children of Ammon and Moab and mount Seir, whom thou wouldest not let Israel invade, when they came out of the land of Egypt, but they turned from them, and destroyed them not; 
Behold, I say, how they reward us, to come to cast us out of thy possession, which thou hast given us to inherit. 
O our God, wilt thou not judge them? for we have no might against this great company that cometh against us; neither know we what to do: but our eyes are upon thee. 
And all Judah stood before the LORD, with their little ones, their wives, and their children. 
Then upon Jahaziel the son of Zechariah, the son of Benaiah, the son of Jeiel, the son of Mattaniah, a Levite of the sons of Asaph, came the Spirit of the LORD in the midst of the congregation; 
And he said, Hearken ye, all Judah, and ye inhabitants of Jerusalem, and thou ki
737, unto another, and said, Holy, holy, holy, is the LORD of hosts: the whole earth is full of his glory. 
And the posts of the door moved at the voice of him that cried, and the house was filled with smoke. 
Then said I, Woe is me! for I am undone; because I am a man of unclean lips, and I dwell in the midst of a people of unclean lips: for mine eyes have seen the King, the LORD of hosts. 
Then flew one of the seraphims unto me, having a live coal in his hand, which he had taken with the tongs from off the altar: 
And he laid it upon my mouth, and said, Lo, this hath touched thy lips; and thine iniquity is taken away, and thy sin purged. 
Also I heard the voice of the Lord, saying, Whom shall I send, and who will go for us? Then 
593, the LORD. 
And they gathered together to Mizpeh, and drew water, and poured it out before the LORD, and fasted on that day, and said there, We have sinned against the LORD. And Samuel judged the children of Israel in Mizpeh. 
And when the Philistines heard that the children of Israel were gathered together to Mizpeh, the lords of the Philistines went up against Israel. And when the children of Israel heard it, they were afraid of the Philistines. 
And the children of Israel said to Samuel, Cease not to cry unto the LORD our God for us, that he will save us out of the hand of the Philis
605,se. 
And I perceived that the portions of the Levites had not been given them: for the Levites and the singers, that did the work, were fled every one to his field. 
Then contended I with the rulers, and said, Why is the house of God forsaken? And I gathered them together, and set them in their place. 
Then brought all Judah the tithe of the corn and the new wine and the oil unto the treasuries. 
And I made treasurers over the treasuries, Shelemiah the priest, and Zadok the scribe, and of the Levites, Pedaiah: and next to them was Hanan the son of Zaccur, the son of Mattaniah: for they were counted
750,o say unto him, Lord, is it I? 
And he answered and said, He that dippeth his hand with me in the dish, the same shall betray me. 
The Son of man goeth as it is written of him: but woe unto that man by whom the Son of man is betrayed! it had been good for that man if he had not been born. 
Then Judas, which betrayed him, answered and said, Master, is it I? He said unto him, Thou hast said. 
And as they were eating, Jesus took bread, and blessed it, and brake it, and gave it to the disciples, and said, Take, eat; this is my body. 
And he took the cup, and gave thanks, and gave it to them, saying, Drink ye all of it; 
For this is my blood of the new testament, which is shed for many for the remission of sins. 
But I say unto you, I will not d
695,man whether ye had yet a brother? 
And they said, The man asked us straitly of our state, and of our kindred, saying, Is your father yet alive? have ye another brother? and we told him according to the tenor of these words: could we certainly know that he would say, Bring your brother down? 
And Judah said unto Israel his father, Send the lad with me, and we will arise and go; that we may live, and not die, both we, and thou, and also our little ones. 
I will be surety for him; of my hand shalt thou require him: if I bring him not unto thee, and set him before thee, then let me bear the blame for ever: 
For except we had lingered, surely now we had returned this second time. 
And their 
601,ng an hundred sheep, if he lose one of them, doth not leave the ninety and nine in the wilderness, and go after that which is lost, until he find it? 
And when he hath found it, he layeth it on his shoulders, rejoicing. 
And when he cometh home, he calleth together his friends and neighbours, saying unto them, Rejoice with me; for I have found my sheep which was lost. 
I say unto you, that likewise joy shall be in heaven over one sinner that repenteth, more than over ninety and nine just persons, which need no repentance. 
Either what woman having ten pieces of silver, if she lose one piece, do
793,eping of his covenant it might stand. 
But he rebelled against him in sending his ambassadors into Egypt, that they might give him horses and much people. Shall he prosper? shall he escape that doeth such things? or shall he break the covenant, and be delivered? 
As I live, saith the Lord GOD, surely in the place where the king dwelleth that made him king, whose oath he despised, and whose covenant he brake, even with him in the midst of Babylon he shall die. 
Neither shall Pharaoh with his mighty army and great company make for him in the war, by casting up mounts, and building forts, to cut off many persons: 
Seeing he despised the oath by breaking the covenant, when, lo, he had given his hand, and hath done all these things, he shall not escape. 
Therefore thus saith the Lord GOD
693,d to you and to your fathers. 
When Jacob was come into Egypt, and your fathers cried unto the LORD, then the LORD sent Moses and Aaron, which brought forth your fathers out of Egypt, and made them dwell in this place. 
And when they forgat the LORD their God, he sold them into the hand of Sisera, captain of the host of Hazor, and into the hand of the Philistines, and into the hand of the king of Moab, and they fought against them. 
And they cried unto the LORD, and said, We have sinned, because we have forsaken the LORD, and have served Baalim and Ashtaroth: but now deliver us out of the hand of our enemies, and we will serve thee. 
And the LORD sent Jerubbaal, and Bedan, and Jephtha
647,brands, and turned tail to tail, and put a firebrand in the midst between two tails. 
And when he had set the brands on fire, he let them go into the standing corn of the Philistines, and burnt up both the shocks, and also the standing corn, with the vineyards and olives. 
Then the Philistines said, Who hath done this? And they answered, Samson, the son in law of the Timnite, because he had taken his wife, and given her to his companion. And the Philistines came up, and burnt her and her father with fire. 
And Samson said unto them, Though ye have done this, yet will I be avenged of you, and after that I will cease. 
And he smote them hip 
745,t ye have not spoken of me the thing which is right, like my servant Job. 
So Eliphaz the Temanite and Bildad the Shuhite and Zophar the Naamathite went, and did according as the LORD commanded them: the LORD also accepted Job. 
And the LORD turned the captivity of Job, when he prayed for his friends: also the LORD gave Job twice as much as he had before. 
Then came there unto him all his brethren, and all his sisters, and all they that had been of his acquaintance before, and did eat bread with him in his house: and they bemoaned him, and comforted him over all the evil that the LORD had brought upon him: every man also gave him a piece of money, and every one an earring of gold. 
So the LORD blessed the latter end of Job more than hi
738,, and get you over the brook Zered. And we went over the brook Zered. 
And the space in which we came from Kadeshbarnea, until we were come over the brook Zered, was thirty and eight years; until all the generation of the men of war were wasted out from among the host, as the LORD sware unto them. 
For indeed the hand of the LORD was against them, to destroy them from among the host, until they were consumed. 
So it came to pass, when all the men of war were consumed and dead from among the people, 
That the LORD spake unto me, saying, 
Thou art to pass over through Ar, the coast of Moab, this day: 
And when thou comest nigh over against the children of Ammon, distress them not, nor meddle with them: for I will not give thee of 
810,would not adventure to set the sole of her foot upon the ground for delicateness and tenderness, her eye shall be evil toward the husband of her bosom, and toward her son, and toward her daughter, 
And toward her young one that cometh out from between her feet, and toward her children which she shall bear: for she shall eat them for want of all things secretly in the siege and straitness, wherewith thine enemy shall distress thee in thy gates. 
If thou wilt not observe to do all the words of this law that are written in this book, that thou mayest fear this glorious and fearful name, THE LORD THY GOD; 
Then the LORD will make thy plagues wonderful, and the plagues of thy seed, even great plagues, and of long continuance, and sore sicknesses, and of long continuance. 
Moreover he will bring upon thee
821,isteth. 
Even so the tongue is a little member, and boasteth great things. Behold, how great a matter a little fire kindleth! 
And the tongue is a fire, a world of iniquity: so is the tongue among our members, that it defileth the whole body, and setteth on fire the course of nature; and it is set on fire of hell. 
For every kind of beasts, and of birds, and of serpents, and of things in the sea, is tamed, and hath been tamed of mankind: 
But the tongue can no man tame; it is an unruly evil, full of deadly poison. 
Therewith bless we God, even the Father; and therewith curse we men, which are made after the similitude of God. 
Out of the same mouth proceedeth blessing and cursing. My brethren, these things ought not so to be. 
Doth a fountain send forth at the same place sweet water and bitter? 
Can the fig tr
569,gel said unto me, Wherefore didst thou marvel? I will tell thee the mystery of the woman, and of the beast that carrieth her, which hath the seven heads and ten horns. 
The beast that thou sawest was, and is not; and shall ascend out of the bottomless pit, and go into perdition: and they that dwell on the earth shall wonder, whose names were not written in the book of life from the foundation of the world, when they behold the beast that was, and is not, and yet is. 
And here is the mind which hath wisdom. The seven heads are seven mountains, on which the woman s
589,ual, and at Beersheba, and in the villages thereof, 
And at Ziklag, and at Mekonah, and in the villages thereof, 
And at Enrimmon, and at Zareah, and at Jarmuth, 
Zanoah, Adullam, and in their villages, at Lachish, and the fields thereof, at Azekah, and in the villages thereof. And they dwelt from Beersheba unto the valley of Hinnom. 
The children also of Benjamin from Geba dwelt at Michmash, and Aija, and Bethel, and in their villages. 
And at Anathoth, Nob, Ananiah, 
Hazor, Ramah, Gittaim, 
Hadid, Zeboim, Neballat, 
Lod, and Ono, the valley of craftsmen. 
And of the Levites were d
826,d Elijah, and Shemaiah, and Jehiel, and Uzziah. 
And of the sons of Pashur; Elioenai, Maaseiah, Ishmael, Nethaneel, Jozabad, and Elasah. 
Also of the Levites; Jozabad, and Shimei, and Kelaiah, (the same is Kelita,) Pethahiah, Judah, and Eliezer. 
Of the singers also; Eliashib: and of the porters; Shallum, and Telem, and Uri. 
Moreover of Israel: of the sons of Parosh; Ramiah, and Jeziah, and Malchiah, and Miamin, and Eleazar, and Malchijah, and Benaiah. 
And of the sons of Elam; Mattaniah, Zechariah, and Jehiel, and Abdi, and Jeremoth, and Eliah. 
And of the sons of Zattu; Elioenai, Eliashib, Mattaniah, and Jeremoth, and Zabad, and Aziza. 
Of the sons also of Bebai; Jehohanan, Hananiah, Zabbai, and Athlai. 
And of the sons of Bani; Meshullam, Malluch, and Adaiah, Jashub, and Sheal, and Ramoth. 
And of the sons of P
788,e. 
With clouds he covereth the light; and commandeth it not to shine by the cloud that cometh betwixt. 
The noise thereof sheweth concerning it, the cattle also concerning the vapour. 
At this also my heart trembleth, and is moved out of his place. 
Hear attentively the noise of his voice, and the sound that goeth out of his mouth. 
He directeth it under the whole heaven, and his lightning unto the ends of the earth. 
After it a voice roareth: he thundereth with the voice of his excellency; and he will not stay them when his voice is heard. 
God thundereth marvellously with his voice; great things doeth he, which we cannot comprehend. 
For he saith to the snow, Be thou on the earth; likewise to the small rain, and to the great rain of his strength. 
He sealeth up the hand of e
824, even the goings of my God, my King, in the sanctuary. 
The singers went before, the players on instruments followed after; among them were the damsels playing with timbrels. 
Bless ye God in the congregations, even the Lord, from the fountain of Israel. 
There is little Benjamin with their ruler, the princes of Judah and their council, the princes of Zebulun, and the princes of Naphtali. 
Thy God hath commanded thy strength: strengthen, O God, that which thou hast wrought for us. 
Because of thy temple at Jerusalem shall kings bring presents unto thee. 
Rebuke the company of spearmen, the multitude of the bulls, with the calves of the people, till every one submit himself with pieces of silver: scatter thou the people that delight in war. 
Princes shall come out of Egypt; Ethiopia shall soon stretch out her hand
759, Israel; for thou art my servant: I have formed thee; thou art my servant: O Israel, thou shalt not be forgotten of me. 
I have blotted out, as a thick cloud, thy transgressions, and, as a cloud, thy sins: return unto me; for I have redeemed thee. 
Sing, O ye heavens; for the LORD hath done it: shout, ye lower parts of the earth: break forth into singing, ye mountains, O forest, and every tree therein: for the LORD hath redeemed Jacob, and glorified himself in Israel. 
Thus saith the LORD, thy redeemer, and he that formed thee from the womb, I am the LORD that maketh all things; that stretcheth forth the heavens alone; that spreadeth abroad the earth by myself; 
That frustrateth the tokens of the liars, and maketh diviners mad; that turneth wise men
564,and anointed the tabernacle and all that was therein, and sanctified them. 
And he sprinkled thereof upon the altar seven times, and anointed the altar and all his vessels, both the laver and his foot, to sanctify them. 
And he poured of the anointing oil upon Aaron's head, and anointed him, to sanctify him. 
And Moses brought Aaron's sons, and put coats upon them, and girded them with girdles, and put bonnets upon them; as the LORD commanded Moses. 
And he brought the bullock for the sin offering: and Aaron and his sons laid their hands upon the head of the
579,ir folds; and they shall be fruitful and increase. 
And I will set up shepherds over them which shall feed them: and they shall fear no more, nor be dismayed, neither shall they be lacking, saith the LORD. 
Behold, the days come, saith the LORD, that I will raise unto David a righteous Branch, and a King shall reign and prosper, and shall execute judgment and justice in the earth. 
In his days Judah shall be saved, and Israel shall dwell safely: and this is his name whereby he shall be called, THE LORD OUR RIGHTEOUSNESS. 
Therefore, behold, the days come, saith the LORD, t
707, fetched him thence: and when he stood among the people, he was higher than any of the people from his shoulders and upward. 
And Samuel said to all the people, See ye him whom the LORD hath chosen, that there is none like him among all the people? And all the people shouted, and said, God save the king. 
Then Samuel told the people the manner of the kingdom, and wrote it in a book, and laid it up before the LORD. And Samuel sent all the people away, every man to his house. 
And Saul also went home to Gibeah; and there went with him a band of men, whose hearts God had touched. 
But the children of Belial said, How shall this man save us? And they despised him, and brought no presents. But he held h
720,orrow shall take hold on the inhabitants of Palestina. 
Then the dukes of Edom shall be amazed; the mighty men of Moab, trembling shall take hold upon them; all the inhabitants of Canaan shall melt away. 
Fear and dread shall fall upon them; by the greatness of thine arm they shall be as still as a stone; till thy people pass over, O LORD, till the people pass over, which thou hast purchased. 
Thou shalt bring them in, and plant them in the mountain of thine inheritance, in the place, O LORD, which thou hast made for thee to dwell in, in the Sanctuary, O LORD, which thy hands have established. 
The LORD shall reign for ever and ever. 
For the horse of Pharaoh went in with his chariots and with his horsemen into
746,
The precious sons of Zion, comparable to fine gold, how are they esteemed as earthen pitchers, the work of the hands of the potter! 
Even the sea monsters draw out the breast, they give suck to their young ones: the daughter of my people is become cruel, like the ostriches in the wilderness. 
The tongue of the sucking child cleaveth to the roof of his mouth for thirst: the young children ask bread, and no man breaketh it unto them. 
They that did feed delicately are desolate in the streets: they that were brought up in scarlet embrace dunghills. 
For the punishment of the iniquity of the daughter of my people is greater than the punishment of the sin of Sodom, that was overthrown as in a moment, and no hands stayed on her. 
Her Nazarit
566, is surety for a stranger shall smart for it: and he that hateth suretiship is sure. 
A gracious woman retaineth honour: and strong men retain riches. 
The merciful man doeth good to his own soul: but he that is cruel troubleth his own flesh. 
The wicked worketh a deceitful work: but to him that soweth righteousness shall be a sure reward. 
As righteousness tendeth to life: so he that pursueth evil pursueth it to his own death. 
They that are of a froward heart are abomination to the LORD: but such as are upright in their way are his delight. 
Though hand join
622,h an hundred and fifty days. 
And God remembered Noah, and every living thing, and all the cattle that was with him in the ark: and God made a wind to pass over the earth, and the waters asswaged; 
The fountains also of the deep and the windows of heaven were stopped, and the rain from heaven was restrained; 
And the waters returned from off the earth continually: and after the end of the hundred and fifty days the waters were abated. 
And the ark rested in the seventh month, on the seventeenth day of the month, upon the mountains of Ararat. 
And the waters decreased continually until the tenth month: in the tenth 
774,om of Ephraim, Israel is defiled. 
Also, O Judah, he hath set an harvest for thee, when I returned the captivity of my people. 
When I would have healed Israel, then the iniquity of Ephraim was discovered, and the wickedness of Samaria: for they commit falsehood; and the thief cometh in, and the troop of robbers spoileth without. 
And they consider not in their hearts that I remember all their wickedness: now their own doings have beset them about; they are before my face. 
They make the king glad with their wickedness, and the princes with their lies. 
They are all adulterers, as an oven heated by the baker, who ceaseth from raising after he hath kneaded the dough, until it be leavened. 
In the day of our king the princes have made him sick with bottles of wine; 
659, inheritance until the redemption of the purchased possession, unto the praise of his glory. 
Wherefore I also, after I heard of your faith in the Lord Jesus, and love unto all the saints, 
Cease not to give thanks for you, making mention of you in my prayers; 
That the God of our Lord Jesus Christ, the Father of glory, may give unto you the spirit of wisdom and revelation in the knowledge of him: 
The eyes of your understanding being enlightened; that ye may know what is the hope of his calling, and what the riches of the glory of his inheritance in the saints, 
And what is the exceeding greatness of his power to us-ward who believe, according to the
785,el by mine hand, as thou hast said, 
Behold, I will put a fleece of wool in the floor; and if the dew be on the fleece only, and it be dry upon all the earth beside, then shall I know that thou wilt save Israel by mine hand, as thou hast said. 
And it was so: for he rose up early on the morrow, and thrust the fleece together, and wringed the dew out of the fleece, a bowl full of water. 
And Gideon said unto God, Let not thine anger be hot against me, and I will speak but this once: let me prove, I pray thee, but this once with the fleece; let it now be dry only upon the fleece, and upon all the ground let there be dew. 
And God did so that night: for it was dry upon the fleece only, and there was dew on all the ground. 
Then Jerubbaal, who is Gideon, and all the people that 
816,reth these sayings of mine, and doeth them not, shall be likened unto a foolish man, which built his house upon the sand: 
And the rain descended, and the floods came, and the winds blew, and beat upon that house; and it fell: and great was the fall of it. 
And it came to pass, when Jesus had ended these sayings, the people were astonished at his doctrine: 
For he taught them as one having authority, and not as the scribes. 
When he was come down from the mountain, great multitudes followed him. 
And, behold, there came a leper and worshipped him, saying, Lord, if thou wilt, thou canst make me clean. 
And Jesus put forth his hand, and touched him, saying, I will; be thou clean. And immediately his leprosy was cleansed. 
And Jesus saith unto him, See thou tell no man; but go thy way, shew thyself to the pr
799,day. 
The yoke of my transgressions is bound by his hand: they are wreathed, and come up upon my neck: he hath made my strength to fall, the LORD hath delivered me into their hands, from whom I am not able to rise up. 
The LORD hath trodden under foot all my mighty men in the midst of me: he hath called an assembly against me to crush my young men: the LORD hath trodden the virgin, the daughter of Judah, as in a winepress. 
For these things I weep; mine eye, mine eye runneth down with water, because the comforter that should relieve my soul is far from me: my children are desolate, because the enemy prevailed. 
Zion spreadeth forth her hands, and there is none to comfort her: the LORD hath commanded concerning Jacob, that his adversaries should be round about him: Jerusalem is as a menstr
582, and utter his voice from his holy habitation; he shall mightily roar upon his habitation; he shall give a shout, as they that tread the grapes, against all the inhabitants of the earth. 
A noise shall come even to the ends of the earth; for the LORD hath a controversy with the nations, he will plead with all flesh; he will give them that are wicked to the sword, saith the LORD. 
Thus saith the LORD of hosts, Behold, evil shall go forth from nation to nation, and a great whirlwind shall be raised up from the coasts of the earth. 
And the slain of the LORD shall be at that day
785,all flee unto one of those cities, and live: 
Lest the avenger of the blood pursue the slayer, while his heart is hot, and overtake him, because the way is long, and slay him; whereas he was not worthy of death, inasmuch as he hated him not in time past. 
Wherefore I command thee, saying, Thou shalt separate three cities for thee. 
And if the LORD thy God enlarge thy coast, as he hath sworn unto thy fathers, and give thee all the land which he promised to give unto thy fathers; 
If thou shalt keep all these commandments to do them, which I command thee this day, to love the LORD thy God, and to walk ever in his ways; then shalt thou add three cities more for thee, beside these three: 
That innocent blood be not shed in thy land, which the LORD thy God giveth thee for an inhe
703,ouse of David: 
If this people go up to do sacrifice in the house of the LORD at Jerusalem, then shall the heart of this people turn again unto their lord, even unto Rehoboam king of Judah, and they shall kill me, and go again to Rehoboam king of Judah. 
Whereupon the king took counsel, and made two calves of gold, and said unto them, It is too much for you to go up to Jerusalem: behold thy gods, O Israel, which brought thee up out of the land of Egypt. 
And he set the one in Bethel, and the other put he in Dan. 
And this thing became a sin: for the people went to worship before the one, even unto Dan. 
And he made an house of high places, and made priests of the lowest of the people, which wer
581,t was according to the appearance of the vision which I saw, even according to the vision that I saw when I came to destroy the city: and the visions were like the vision that I saw by the river Chebar; and I fell upon my face. 
And the glory of the LORD came into the house by the way of the gate whose prospect is toward the east. 
So the spirit took me up, and brought me into the inner court; and, behold, the glory of the LORD filled the house. 
And I heard him speaking unto me out of the house; and the man stood by me. 
And he said unto me, Son of man, the place of my thro
756,nd he said, Thus saith the LORD, Even by the young men of the princes of the provinces. Then he said, Who shall order the battle? And he answered, Thou. 
Then he numbered the young men of the princes of the provinces, and they were two hundred and thirty two: and after them he numbered all the people, even all the children of Israel, being seven thousand. 
And they went out at noon. But Benhadad was drinking himself drunk in the pavilions, he and the kings, the thirty and two kings that helped him. 
And the young men of the princes of the provinces went out first; and Benhadad sent out, and they told him, saying, There are men come out of Samaria. 
And he said, Whether they be come out for peace, take them alive; or whether they be come out for w
595,ch out mine hand against thee, and I will make thee most desolate. 
I will lay thy cities waste, and thou shalt be desolate, and thou shalt know that I am the LORD. 
Because thou hast had a perpetual hatred, and hast shed the blood of the children of Israel by the force of the sword in the time of their calamity, in the time that their iniquity had an end: 
Therefore, as I live, saith the Lord GOD, I will prepare thee unto blood, and blood shall pursue thee: sith thou hast not hated blood, even blood shall pursue thee. 
Thus will I make mount Seir most desolate, and cut off from it him th
659,at ruleth well his own house, having his children in subjection with all gravity; 
(For if a man know not how to rule his own house, how shall he take care of the church of God?) 
Not a novice, lest being lifted up with pride he fall into the condemnation of the devil. 
Moreover he must have a good report of them which are without; lest he fall into reproach and the snare of the devil. 
Likewise must the deacons be grave, not doubletongued, not given to much wine, not greedy of filthy lucre; 
Holding the mystery of the faith in a pure conscience. 
And let these also first be proved; then let them use the office of a deacon, being found blameless. 
Eve
588, guiltless. 
For the Son of man is Lord even of the sabbath day. 
And when he was departed thence, he went into their synagogue: 
And, behold, there was a man which had his hand withered. And they asked him, saying, Is it lawful to heal on the sabbath days? that they might accuse him. 
And he said unto them, What man shall there be among you, that shall have one sheep, and if it fall into a pit on the sabbath day, will he not lay hold on it, and lift it out? 
How much then is a man better than a sheep? Wherefore it is lawful to do well on the sabbath days. 
Then saith he to the man
564,uld not destroy him altogether: and also in Judah things went well. 
So king Rehoboam strengthened himself in Jerusalem, and reigned: for Rehoboam was one and forty years old when he began to reign, and he reigned seventeen years in Jerusalem, the city which the LORD had chosen out of all the tribes of Israel, to put his name there. And his mother's name was Naamah an Ammonitess. 
And he did evil, because he prepared not his heart to seek the LORD. 
Now the acts of Rehoboam, first and last, are they not written in the book of Shemaiah the prophet, and of Idd
779,ou from the heavens, even from thy dwelling place, their prayer and their supplications, and maintain their cause, and forgive thy people which have sinned against thee. 
Now, my God, let, I beseech thee, thine eyes be open, and let thine ears be attent unto the prayer that is made in this place. 
Now therefore arise, O LORD God, into thy resting place, thou, and the ark of thy strength: let thy priests, O LORD God, be clothed with salvation, and let thy saints rejoice in goodness. 
O LORD God, turn not away the face of thine anointed: remember the mercies of David thy servant. 
Now when Solomon had made an end of praying, the fire came down from heaven, and consumed the burnt offering and the sacrifices; and the glory of the LORD filled the house. 
And the priests cou
585,faces apiece, and every one four wings; and the likeness of the hands of a man was under their wings. 
And the likeness of their faces was the same faces which I saw by the river of Chebar, their appearances and themselves: they went every one straight forward. 
Moreover the spirit lifted me up, and brought me unto the east gate of the LORD's house, which looketh eastward: and behold at the door of the gate five and twenty men; among whom I saw Jaazaniah the son of Azur, and Pelatiah the son of Benaiah, princes of the people. 
Then said he unto me, Son of man, these are the men 
623,ibe of the Danites sought them an inheritance to dwell in; for unto that day all their inheritance had not fallen unto them among the tribes of Israel. 
And the children of Dan sent of their family five men from their coasts, men of valour, from Zorah, and from Eshtaol, to spy out the land, and to search it; and they said unto them, Go, search the land: who when they came to mount Ephraim, to the house of Micah, they lodged there. 
When they were by the house of Micah, they knew the voice of the young man the Levite: and they turned in thither, and said unto him, Who brought thee hither? and what makest thou in this
748,thing upon his day: 
Beside the sabbaths of the LORD, and beside your gifts, and beside all your vows, and beside all your freewill offerings, which ye give unto the LORD. 
Also in the fifteenth day of the seventh month, when ye have gathered in the fruit of the land, ye shall keep a feast unto the LORD seven days: on the first day shall be a sabbath, and on the eighth day shall be a sabbath. 
And ye shall take you on the first day the boughs of goodly trees, branches of palm trees, and the boughs of thick trees, and willows of the brook; and ye shall rejoice before the LORD your God seven days. 
And ye shall keep it a feast unto the LORD seven days in the year. It shall be a statute for ever in your generations: ye shall celebrate it in 
635,said unto them, Let them live; but let them be hewers of wood and drawers of water unto all the congregation; as the princes had promised them. 
And Joshua called for them, and he spake unto them, saying, Wherefore have ye beguiled us, saying, We are very far from you; when ye dwell among us? 
Now therefore ye are cursed, and there shall none of you be freed from being bondmen, and hewers of wood and drawers of water for the house of my God. 
And they answered Joshua, and said, Because it was certainly told thy servants, how that the LORD thy God commanded his servant Moses to give you all the land, and to destroy all the inhab
788,cometh greater than all herbs, and shooteth out great branches; so that the fowls of the air may lodge under the shadow of it. 
And with many such parables spake he the word unto them, as they were able to hear it. 
But without a parable spake he not unto them: and when they were alone, he expounded all things to his disciples. 
And the same day, when the even was come, he saith unto them, Let us pass over unto the other side. 
And when they had sent away the multitude, they took him even as he was in the ship. And there were also with him other little ships. 
And there arose a great storm of wind, and the waves beat into the ship, so that it was now full. 
And he was in the hinder part of the ship, asleep on a pillow: and they awake him, and say unto him, Master, carest thou n
648,d Zeredathah. 
Thus Solomon made all these vessels in great abundance: for the weight of the brass could not be found out. 
And Solomon made all the vessels that were for the house of God, the golden altar also, and the tables whereon the shewbread was set; 
Moreover the candlesticks with their lamps, that they should burn after the manner before the oracle, of pure gold; 
And the flowers, and the lamps, and the tongs, made he of gold, and that perfect gold; 
And the snuffers, and the basons, and the spoons, and the censers, of pure gold: and the entry of the house, the inner doors thereof for the most holy place, and the doors of the house
744,se; and let there not fail from the house of Joab one that hath an issue, or that is a leper, or that leaneth on a staff, or that falleth on the sword, or that lacketh bread. 
So Joab, and Abishai his brother slew Abner, because he had slain their brother Asahel at Gibeon in the battle. 
And David said to Joab, and to all the people that were with him, Rend your clothes, and gird you with sackcloth, and mourn before Abner. And king David himself followed the bier. 
And they buried Abner in Hebron: and the king lifted up his voice, and wept at the grave of Abner; and all the people wept. 
And the king lamented over Abner, and said, Died Abner as a fool dieth? 
Thy hands were not bound, nor thy feet put into fetters: as a man falleth be
781, the same is true, and no unrighteousness is in him. 
Did not Moses give you the law, and yet none of you keepeth the law? Why go ye about to kill me? 
The people answered and said, Thou hast a devil: who goeth about to kill thee? 
Jesus answered and said unto them, I have done one work, and ye all marvel. 
Moses therefore gave unto you circumcision; (not because it is of Moses, but of the fathers;) and ye on the sabbath day circumcise a man. 
If a man on the sabbath day receive circumcision, that the law of Moses should not be broken; are ye angry at me, because I have made a man every whit whole on the sabbath day? 
Judge not according to the appearance, but judge righteous judgment. 
Then said some of them of Jerusalem, Is not this he, whom they seek to kill? 
But, lo
578, to meet the Philistine. 
And David put his hand in his bag, and took thence a stone, and slang it, and smote the Philistine in his forehead, that the stone sunk into his forehead; and he fell upon his face to the earth. 
So David prevailed over the Philistine with a sling and with a stone, and smote the Philistine, and slew him; but there was no sword in the hand of David. 
Therefore David ran, and stood upon the Philistine, and took his sword, and drew it out of the sheath thereof, and slew him, and cut off his head therewith. And when the Philistines saw their champion
597,, and for their lamps of gold, by weight for every candlestick, and for the lamps thereof: and for the candlesticks of silver by weight, both for the candlestick, and also for the lamps thereof, according to the use of every candlestick. 
And by weight he gave gold for the tables of shewbread, for every table; and likewise silver for the tables of silver: 
Also pure gold for the fleshhooks, and the bowls, and the cups: and for the golden basons he gave gold by weight for every bason; and likewise silver by weight for every bason of silver: 
And for the altar of incense refined gold by weigh
807, out for the families of the Kohathites: and the children of Aaron the priest, which were of the Levites, had by lot out of the tribe of Judah, and out of the tribe of Simeon, and out of the tribe of Benjamin, thirteen cities. 
And the rest of the children of Kohath had by lot out of the families of the tribe of Ephraim, and out of the tribe of Dan, and out of the half tribe of Manasseh, ten cities. 
And the children of Gershon had by lot out of the families of the tribe of Issachar, and out of the tribe of Asher, and out of the tribe of Naphtali, and out of the half tribe of Manasseh in Bashan, thirteen cities. 
The children of Merari by their families had out of the tribe of Reuben, and out of the tribe of Gad, and out of the tribe of Zebulun, twelve cities. 
And the children of Israel gave by 
803,ook away my veil from me. 
I charge you, O daughters of Jerusalem, if ye find my beloved, that ye tell him, that I am sick of love. 
What is thy beloved more than another beloved, O thou fairest among women? what is thy beloved more than another beloved, that thou dost so charge us? 
My beloved is white and ruddy, the chiefest among ten thousand. 
His head is as the most fine gold, his locks are bushy, and black as a raven. 
His eyes are as the eyes of doves by the rivers of waters, washed with milk, and fitly set. 
His cheeks are as a bed of spices, as sweet flowers: his lips like lilies, dropping sweet smelling myrrh. 
His hands are as gold rings set with the beryl: his belly is as bright ivory overlaid with sapphires. 
His legs are as pillars of marble, set upon sockets of fine gold: his c
793,f Argob, the kingdom of Og in Bashan. 
All these cities were fenced with high walls, gates, and bars; beside unwalled towns a great many. 
And we utterly destroyed them, as we did unto Sihon king of Heshbon, utterly destroying the men, women, and children, of every city. 
But all the cattle, and the spoil of the cities, we took for a prey to ourselves. 
And we took at that time out of the hand of the two kings of the Amorites the land that was on this side Jordan, from the river of Arnon unto mount Hermon; 
(Which Hermon the Sidonians call Sirion; and the Amorites call it Shenir;) 
All the cities of the plain, and all Gilead, and all Bashan, unto Salchah and Edrei, cities of the kingdom of Og in Bashan. 
For only Og king of Bashan remained of the remnant of giants; behold his bedste
753, of the river shall dry up: and the pride of Assyria shall be brought down, and the sceptre of Egypt shall depart away. 
And I will strengthen them in the LORD; and they shall walk up and down in his name, saith the LORD. 
Open thy doors, O Lebanon, that the fire may devour thy cedars. 
Howl, fir tree; for the cedar is fallen; because the mighty are spoiled: howl, O ye oaks of Bashan; for the forest of the vintage is come down. 
There is a voice of the howling of the shepherds; for their glory is spoiled: a voice of the roaring of young lions; for the pride of Jordan is spoiled. 
Thus saith the LORD my God; Feed the flock of the slaughter; 
Whose possessors slay them, and hold themselves not guilty: and they that sell them say, Blessed be the 
672,and the apparel, and returned, and came to Achish. 
And Achish said, Whither have ye made a road to day? And David said, Against the south of Judah, and against the south of the Jerahmeelites, and against the south of the Kenites. 
And David saved neither man nor woman alive, to bring tidings to Gath, saying, Lest they should tell on us, saying, So did David, and so will be his manner all the while he dwelleth in the country of the Philistines. 
And Achish believed David, saying, He hath made his people Israel utterly to abhor him; therefore he shall be my servant for ever. 
And it came to pass in those days, that the Philistines gathered their armies together for
828,us saith the LORD, Behold, I will make thee a terror to thyself, and to all thy friends: and they shall fall by the sword of their enemies, and thine eyes shall behold it: and I will give all Judah into the hand of the king of Babylon, and he shall carry them captive into Babylon, and shall slay them with the sword. 
Moreover I will deliver all the strength of this city, and all the labours thereof, and all the precious things thereof, and all the treasures of the kings of Judah will I give into the hand of their enemies, which shall spoil them, and take them, and carry them to Babylon. 
And thou, Pashur, and all that dwell in thine house shall go into captivity: and thou shalt come to Babylon, and there thou shalt die, and shalt be buried there, thou, and all thy friends, to whom thou hast prophesied lies. 
O LORD, 
685,umpets also on every side of all the camp, and say, The sword of the LORD, and of Gideon. 
So Gideon, and the hundred men that were with him, came unto the outside of the camp in the beginning of the middle watch; and they had but newly set the watch: and they blew the trumpets, and brake the pitchers that were in their hands. 
And the three companies blew the trumpets, and brake the pitchers, and held the lamps in their left hands, and the trumpets in their right hands to blow withal: and they cried, The sword of the LORD, and of Gideon. 
And they stood every man in his place round about the camp; and all the host ran, and cried, and fled. 
And the three hundred blew the trum
822,own the altar of Baal, and because he hath cut down the grove that was by it. 
And Joash said unto all that stood against him, Will ye plead for Baal? will ye save him? he that will plead for him, let him be put to death whilst it is yet morning: if he be a god, let him plead for himself, because one hath cast down his altar. 
Therefore on that day he called him Jerubbaal, saying, Let Baal plead against him, because he hath thrown down his altar. 
Then all the Midianites and the Amalekites and the children of the east were gathered together, and went over, and pitched in the valley of Jezreel. 
But the Spirit of the LORD came upon Gideon, and he blew a trumpet; and Abiezer was gathered after him. 
And he sent messengers throughout all Manasseh; who also was gathered after him: and he sent messengers unto Asher,
742, are of the truth, and shall assure our hearts before him. 
For if our heart condemn us, God is greater than our heart, and knoweth all things. 
Beloved, if our heart condemn us not, then have we confidence toward God. 
And whatsoever we ask, we receive of him, because we keep his commandments, and do those things that are pleasing in his sight. 
And this is his commandment, That we should believe on the name of his Son Jesus Christ, and love one another, as he gave us commandment. 
And he that keepeth his commandments dwelleth in him, and he in him. And hereby we know that he abideth in us, by the Spirit which he hath given us. 
Beloved, believe not every spirit, but try the spirits whether they are of God: because many false proph
597,evildoers, children that are corrupters: they have forsaken the LORD, they have provoked the Holy One of Israel unto anger, they are gone away backward. 
Why should ye be stricken any more? ye will revolt more and more: the whole head is sick, and the whole heart faint. 
From the sole of the foot even unto the head there is no soundness in it; but wounds, and bruises, and putrifying sores: they have not been closed, neither bound up, neither mollified with ointment. 
Your country is desolate, your cities are burned with fire: your land, strangers devour it in your presence, and it is desola
615,nters, and masons: and they built David an house. 
And David perceived that the LORD had established him king over Israel, and that he had exalted his kingdom for his people Israel's sake. 
And David took him more concubines and wives out of Jerusalem, after he was come from Hebron: and there were yet sons and daughters born to David. 
And these be the names of those that were born unto him in Jerusalem; Shammuah, and Shobab, and Nathan, and Solomon, 
Ibhar also, and Elishua, and Nepheg, and Japhia, 
And Elishama, and Eliada, and Eliphalet. 
But when the Philistines heard that they had anointed David king ov
623,of his countenance was altered, and his raiment was white and glistering. 
And, behold, there talked with him two men, which were Moses and Elias: 
Who appeared in glory, and spake of his decease which he should accomplish at Jerusalem. 
But Peter and they that were with him were heavy with sleep: and when they were awake, they saw his glory, and the two men that stood with him. 
And it came to pass, as they departed from him, Peter said unto Jesus, Master, it is good for us to be here: and let us make three tabernacles; one for thee, and one for Moses, and one for Elias: not knowing what he said. 
While he thus spa
561,ffering, and the other for a burnt offering, unto the LORD, to make an atonement for the Levites. 
And thou shalt set the Levites before Aaron, and before his sons, and offer them for an offering unto the LORD. 
Thus shalt thou separate the Levites from among the children of Israel: and the Levites shall be mine. 
And after that shall the Levites go in to do the service of the tabernacle of the congregation: and thou shalt cleanse them, and offer them for an offering. 
For they are wholly given unto me from among the children of Israel; instead of such as
689,ideth his eyes shall have many a curse. 
When the wicked rise, men hide themselves: but when they perish, the righteous increase. 
He, that being often reproved hardeneth his neck, shall suddenly be destroyed, and that without remedy. 
When the righteous are in authority, the people rejoice: but when the wicked beareth rule, the people mourn. 
Whoso loveth wisdom rejoiceth his father: but he that keepeth company with harlots spendeth his substance. 
The king by judgment establisheth the land: but he that receiveth gifts overthroweth it. 
A man that flattereth his neighbour spreadeth a net for his feet. 
In the transgression of an evil man there is a snare: but the righteous doth s
770,e: for all men glorified God for that which was done. 
For the man was above forty years old, on whom this miracle of healing was shewed. 
And being let go, they went to their own company, and reported all that the chief priests and elders had said unto them. 
And when they heard that, they lifted up their voice to God with one accord, and said, Lord, thou art God, which hast made heaven, and earth, and the sea, and all that in them is: 
Who by the mouth of thy servant David hast said, Why did the heathen rage, and the people imagine vain things? 
The kings of the earth stood up, and the rulers were gathered together against the Lord, and against his Christ. 
For of a truth against thy holy child Jesus, whom thou hast anointed, both Herod, and Pontius Pilate, 
601,ay, as soon as he had left communing with Abraham: and Abraham returned unto his place. 
And there came two angels to Sodom at even; and Lot sat in the gate of Sodom: and Lot seeing them rose up to meet them; and he bowed himself with his face toward the ground; 
And he said, Behold now, my lords, turn in, I pray you, into your servant's house, and tarry all night, and wash your feet, and ye shall rise up early, and go on your ways. And they said, Nay; but we will abide in the street all night. 
And he pressed upon them greatly; and they turned in unto him, and entered into his house; and he ma
605,lone, and let him curse; for the LORD hath bidden him. 
It may be that the LORD will look on mine affliction, and that the LORD will requite me good for his cursing this day. 
And as David and his men went by the way, Shimei went along on the hill's side over against him, and cursed as he went, and threw stones at him, and cast dust. 
And the king, and all the people that were with him, came weary, and refreshed themselves there. 
And Absalom, and all the people the men of Israel, came to Jerusalem, and Ahithophel with him. 
And it came to pass, when Hushai the Archite, David's friend, was come unt
644,dle, and bound his own hands and feet, and said, Thus saith the Holy Ghost, So shall the Jews at Jerusalem bind the man that owneth this girdle, and shall deliver him into the hands of the Gentiles. 
And when we heard these things, both we, and they of that place, besought him not to go up to Jerusalem. 
Then Paul answered, What mean ye to weep and to break mine heart? for I am ready not to be bound only, but also to die at Jerusalem for the name of the Lord Jesus. 
And when he would not be persuaded, we ceased, saying, The will of the Lord be done. 
And after those days we took up our carriages, and went up to Jerusalem. 
There went wi
799,iveth gifts overthroweth it. 
A man that flattereth his neighbour spreadeth a net for his feet. 
In the transgression of an evil man there is a snare: but the righteous doth sing and rejoice. 
The righteous considereth the cause of the poor: but the wicked regardeth not to know it. 
Scornful men bring a city into a snare: but wise men turn away wrath. 
If a wise man contendeth with a foolish man, whether he rage or laugh, there is no rest. 
The bloodthirsty hate the upright: but the just seek his soul. 
A fool uttereth all his mind: but a wise man keepeth it in till afterwards. 
If a ruler hearken to lies, all his servants are wicked. 
The poor and the deceitful man meet together: the LORD lighteneth both their eyes. 
The king that faithfully judgeth the poor, his throne shall be establis
759,it, saith the Lord GOD. 
Moreover the word of the LORD came unto me, saying, 
Son of man, take up a lamentation upon the king of Tyrus, and say unto him, Thus saith the Lord GOD; Thou sealest up the sum, full of wisdom, and perfect in beauty. 
Thou hast been in Eden the garden of God; every precious stone was thy covering, the sardius, topaz, and the diamond, the beryl, the onyx, and the jasper, the sapphire, the emerald, and the carbuncle, and gold: the workmanship of thy tabrets and of thy pipes was prepared in thee in the day that thou wast created. 
Thou art the anointed cherub that covereth; and I have set thee so: thou wast upon the holy mountain of God; thou hast walked up and down in the midst of the stones of fire. 
Thou wast perfect in thy
811,ive hundred and fifty. 
But the Levites after the tribe of their fathers were not numbered among them. 
For the LORD had spoken unto Moses, saying, 
Only thou shalt not number the tribe of Levi, neither take the sum of them among the children of Israel: 
But thou shalt appoint the Levites over the tabernacle of testimony, and over all the vessels thereof, and over all things that belong to it: they shall bear the tabernacle, and all the vessels thereof; and they shall minister unto it, and shall encamp round about the tabernacle. 
And when the tabernacle setteth forward, the Levites shall take it down: and when the tabernacle is to be pitched, the Levites shall set it up: and the stranger that cometh nigh shall be put to death. 
And the children of Israel shall pitch their tents, every man by his own
610,; for other men have our lands and vineyards. 
And I was very angry when I heard their cry and these words. 
Then I consulted with myself, and I rebuked the nobles, and the rulers, and said unto them, Ye exact usury, every one of his brother. And I set a great assembly against them. 
And I said unto them, We after our ability have redeemed our brethren the Jews, which were sold unto the heathen; and will ye even sell your brethren? or shall they be sold unto us? Then held they their peace, and found nothing to answer. 
Also I said, It is not good that ye do: ought ye not to walk in the fear of our God b
640, said: nevertheless I say unto you, Hereafter shall ye see the Son of man sitting on the right hand of power, and coming in the clouds of heaven. 
Then the high priest rent his clothes, saying, He hath spoken blasphemy; what further need have we of witnesses? behold, now ye have heard his blasphemy. 
What think ye? They answered and said, He is guilty of death. 
Then did they spit in his face, and buffeted him; and others smote him with the palms of their hands, 
Saying, Prophesy unto us, thou Christ, Who is he that smote thee? 
Now Peter sat without in the palace: and a damsel came unto him, saying, Thou also wast with Jesus of Gal
688,these, Azrikam, Bocheru, and Ishmael, and Sheariah, and Obadiah, and Hanan: these were the sons of Azel. 
Now the Philistines fought against Israel; and the men of Israel fled from before the Philistines, and fell down slain in mount Gilboa. 
And the Philistines followed hard after Saul, and after his sons; and the Philistines slew Jonathan, and Abinadab, and Malchishua, the sons of Saul. 
And the battle went sore against Saul, and the archers hit him, and he was wounded of the archers. 
Then said Saul to his armourbearer, Draw thy sword, and thrust me through therewith; lest these uncircumcised come and abuse me. But his armourbearer would not; for he was sore afraid. So Saul to
613,, and brought that which they had spun, both of blue, and of purple, and of scarlet, and of fine linen. 
And all the women whose heart stirred them up in wisdom spun goats' hair. 
And the rulers brought onyx stones, and stones to be set, for the ephod, and for the breastplate; 
And spice, and oil for the light, and for the anointing oil, and for the sweet incense. 
The children of Israel brought a willing offering unto the LORD, every man and woman, whose heart made them willing to bring for all manner of work, which the LORD had commanded to be made by the hand of Moses. 
And Moses said unto the children 
635,nd as I said unto the Jews, Whither I go, ye cannot come; so now I say to you. 
A new commandment I give unto you, That ye love one another; as I have loved you, that ye also love one another. 
By this shall all men know that ye are my disciples, if ye have love one to another. 
Simon Peter said unto him, Lord, whither goest thou? Jesus answered him, Whither I go, thou canst not follow me now; but thou shalt follow me afterwards. 
Peter said unto him, Lord, why cannot I follow thee now? I will lay down my life for thy sake. 
Jesus answered him, Wilt thou lay down thy life for my sake? Verily, verily, I say unto thee, The cock s
693,e, Let it suffice thee; speak no more unto me of this matter. 
Get thee up into the top of Pisgah, and lift up thine eyes westward, and northward, and southward, and eastward, and behold it with thine eyes: for thou shalt not go over this Jordan. 
But charge Joshua, and encourage him, and strengthen him: for he shall go over before this people, and he shall cause them to inherit the land which thou shalt see. 
So we abode in the valley over against Bethpeor. 
Now therefore hearken, O Israel, unto the statutes and unto the judgments, which I teach you, for to do them, that ye may live, and go in and possess the land which the LORD God of your fathers giveth you. 
Ye shall not add unto 
628,es are open upon all the ways of the sons of men: to give every one according to his ways, and according to the fruit of his doings: 
Which hast set signs and wonders in the land of Egypt, even unto this day, and in Israel, and among other men; and hast made thee a name, as at this day; 
And hast brought forth thy people Israel out of the land of Egypt with signs, and with wonders, and with a strong hand, and with a stretched out arm, and with great terror; 
And hast given them this land, which thou didst swear to their fathers to give them, a land flowing with milk and honey; 
And they came in, and possessed it; but the
667,t in the spirit of the LORD, and set me down in the midst of the valley which was full of bones, 
And caused me to pass by them round about: and, behold, there were very many in the open valley; and, lo, they were very dry. 
And he said unto me, Son of man, can these bones live? And I answered, O Lord GOD, thou knowest. 
Again he said unto me, Prophesy upon these bones, and say unto them, O ye dry bones, hear the word of the LORD. 
Thus saith the Lord GOD unto these bones; Behold, I will cause breath to enter into you, and ye shall live: 
And I will lay sinews upon you, and will bring up flesh upon you, and cover you with skin, and put breath in you, and ye s
802,e found faulty: he shall break down their altars, he shall spoil their images. 
For now they shall say, We have no king, because we feared not the LORD; what then should a king do to us? 
They have spoken words, swearing falsely in making a covenant: thus judgment springeth up as hemlock in the furrows of the field. 
The inhabitants of Samaria shall fear because of the calves of Bethaven: for the people thereof shall mourn over it, and the priests thereof that rejoiced on it, for the glory thereof, because it is departed from it. 
It shall be also carried unto Assyria for a present to king Jareb: Ephraim shall receive shame, and Israel shall be ashamed of his own counsel. 
As for Samaria, her king is cut off as the foam upon the water. 
The high places also of Aven, the sin of Israel, shall 
765,of the stall; 
That chant to the sound of the viol, and invent to themselves instruments of musick, like David; 
That drink wine in bowls, and anoint themselves with the chief ointments: but they are not grieved for the affliction of Joseph. 
Therefore now shall they go captive with the first that go captive, and the banquet of them that stretched themselves shall be removed. 
The Lord GOD hath sworn by himself, saith the LORD the God of hosts, I abhor the excellency of Jacob, and hate his palaces: therefore will I deliver up the city with all that is therein. 
And it shall come to pass, if there remain ten men in one house, that they shall die. 
And a man's uncle shall take him up, and he that burneth him, to bring out the bones out of the house, and sha
615,words. 
Know ye that our brother Timothy is set at liberty; with whom, if he come shortly, I will see you. 
Salute all them that have the rule over you, and all the saints. They of Italy salute you. 
Grace be with you all. Amen. 
James, a servant of God and of the Lord Jesus Christ, to the twelve tribes which are scattered abroad, greeting. 
My brethren, count it all joy when ye fall into divers temptations; 
Knowing this, that the trying of your faith worketh patience. 
But let patience have her perfect work, that ye may be perfect and entire, wanting nothing. 
If any of you lack wisdom, let him ask of God,
689,d, and hast enquired of God for him, that he should rise against me, to lie in wait, as at this day? 
Then Ahimelech answered the king, and said, And who is so faithful among all thy servants as David, which is the king's son in law, and goeth at thy bidding, and is honourable in thine house? 
Did I then begin to enquire of God for him? be it far from me: let not the king impute any thing unto his servant, nor to all the house of my father: for thy servant knew nothing of all this, less or more. 
And the king said, Thou shalt surely die, Ahimelech, thou, and all thy father's house. 
And the king said unto the footmen that stood about him, Turn, and slay the priests of the LORD: be
650,sau, which dwelt in Seir, through the way of the plain from Elath, and from Eziongaber, we turned and passed by the way of the wilderness of Moab. 
And the LORD said unto me, Distress not the Moabites, neither contend with them in battle: for I will not give thee of their land for a possession; because I have given Ar unto the children of Lot for a possession. 
The Emims dwelt therein in times past, a people great, and many, and tall, as the Anakims; 
Which also were accounted giants, as the Anakims; but the Moabites called them Emims. 
The Horims also dwelt in Seir beforetime; but the children of Esau succeeded them, when they had destroyed 
818,icho. 
And the priests that bare the ark of the covenant of the LORD stood firm on dry ground in the midst of Jordan, and all the Israelites passed over on dry ground, until all the people were passed clean over Jordan. 
And it came to pass, when all the people were clean passed over Jordan, that the LORD spake unto Joshua, saying, 
Take you twelve men out of the people, out of every tribe a man, 
And command ye them, saying, Take you hence out of the midst of Jordan, out of the place where the priests' feet stood firm, twelve stones, and ye shall carry them over with you, and leave them in the lodging place, where ye shall lodge this night. 
Then Joshua called the twelve men, whom he had prepared of the children of Israel, out of every tribe a man: 
And Joshua said unto them, Pass over before the ark of th
560,hat he raised up Christ: whom he raised not up, if so be that the dead rise not. 
For if the dead rise not, then is not Christ raised: 
And if Christ be not raised, your faith is vain; ye are yet in your sins. 
Then they also which are fallen asleep in Christ are perished. 
If in this life only we have hope in Christ, we are of all men most miserable. 
But now is Christ risen from the dead, and become the firstfruits of them that slept. 
For since by man came death, by man came also the resurrection of the dead. 
For as in Adam all die, even so in Christ
597,am meek and lowly in heart: and ye shall find rest unto your souls. 
For my yoke is easy, and my burden is light. 
At that time Jesus went on the sabbath day through the corn; and his disciples were an hungred, and began to pluck the ears of corn and to eat. 
But when the Pharisees saw it, they said unto him, Behold, thy disciples do that which is not lawful to do upon the sabbath day. 
But he said unto them, Have ye not read what David did, when he was an hungred, and they that were with him; 
How he entered into the house of God, and did eat the shewbread, which was not lawful for him to 
726,t heard that Adonijah the son of Haggith doth reign, and David our lord knoweth it not? 
Now therefore come, let me, I pray thee, give thee counsel, that thou mayest save thine own life, and the life of thy son Solomon. 
Go and get thee in unto king David, and say unto him, Didst not thou, my lord, O king, swear unto thine handmaid, saying, Assuredly Solomon thy son shall reign after me, and he shall sit upon my throne? why then doth Adonijah reign? 
Behold, while thou yet talkest there with the king, I also will come in after thee, and confirm thy words. 
And Bathsheba went in unto the king into the chamber: and the king was very old; and Abishag the Shunammite ministered unto the king. 
And Bathsheba bowed, and did
606,s throughout it: Ahab went one way by himself, and Obadiah went another way by himself. 
And as Obadiah was in the way, behold, Elijah met him: and he knew him, and fell on his face, and said, Art thou that my lord Elijah? 
And he answered him, I am: go, tell thy lord, Behold, Elijah is here. 
And he said, What have I sinned, that thou wouldest deliver thy servant into the hand of Ahab, to slay me? 
As the LORD thy God liveth, there is no nation or kingdom, whither my lord hath not sent to seek thee: and when they said, He is not there; he took an oath of the kingdom and nation, that they found thee
781,, in bruising thy teats by the Egyptians for the paps of thy youth. 
Therefore, O Aholibah, thus saith the Lord GOD; Behold, I will raise up thy lovers against thee, from whom thy mind is alienated, and I will bring them against thee on every side; 
The Babylonians, and all the Chaldeans, Pekod, and Shoa, and Koa, and all the Assyrians with them: all of them desirable young men, captains and rulers, great lords and renowned, all of them riding upon horses. 
And they shall come against thee with chariots, wagons, and wheels, and with an assembly of people, which shall set against thee buckler and shield and helmet round about: and I will set judgment before them, and they shall judge thee according to their judgments. 
And I will set my jealousy against thee, and they sha
580,h in thee. 
Trust ye in the LORD for ever: for in the LORD JEHOVAH is everlasting strength: 
For he bringeth down them that dwell on high; the lofty city, he layeth it low; he layeth it low, even to the ground; he bringeth it even to the dust. 
The foot shall tread it down, even the feet of the poor, and the steps of the needy. 
The way of the just is uprightness: thou, most upright, dost weigh the path of the just. 
Yea, in the way of thy judgments, O LORD, have we waited for thee; the desire of our soul is to thy name, and to the remembrance of thee. 
With my soul have I 
769,tures are clothed with flocks; the valleys also are covered over with corn; they shout for joy, they also sing. 
Make a joyful noise unto God, all ye lands: 
Sing forth the honour of his name: make his praise glorious. 
Say unto God, How terrible art thou in thy works! through the greatness of thy power shall thine enemies submit themselves unto thee. 
All the earth shall worship thee, and shall sing unto thee; they shall sing to thy name. Selah. 
Come and see the works of God: he is terrible in his doing toward the children of men. 
He turned the sea into dry land: they went through the flood on foot: there did we rejoice in him. 
He ruleth by his power for ever; his eyes behold the nations: let not the rebellious exalt themselves. Selah. 
O bless our God, y
679, him that fled. 
For they fled from the swords, from the drawn sword, and from the bent bow, and from the grievousness of war. 
For thus hath the LORD said unto me, Within a year, according to the years of an hireling, and all the glory of Kedar shall fail: 
And the residue of the number of archers, the mighty men of the children of Kedar, shall be diminished: for the LORD God of Israel hath spoken it. 
The burden of the valley of vision. What aileth thee now, that thou art wholly gone up to the housetops? 
Thou that art full of stirs, a tumultuous city, joyous city: thy slain men are not slain with the sword, nor dead in battle. 
All thy rulers are fled together, they a
813,ent against Joash. 
And when they were departed from him, (for they left him in great diseases,) his own servants conspired against him for the blood of the sons of Jehoiada the priest, and slew him on his bed, and he died: and they buried him in the city of David, but they buried him not in the sepulchres of the kings. 
And these are they that conspired against him; Zabad the son of Shimeath an Ammonitess, and Jehozabad the son of Shimrith a Moabitess. 
Now concerning his sons, and the greatness of the burdens laid upon him, and the repairing of the house of God, behold, they are written in the story of the book of the kings. And Amaziah his son reigned in his stead. 
Amaziah was twenty and five years old when he began to reign, and he reigned twenty and nine years in Jerusalem. And his mother's name 
595,d an apostle, because I persecuted the church of God. 
But by the grace of God I am what I am: and his grace which was bestowed upon me was not in vain; but I laboured more abundantly than they all: yet not I, but the grace of God which was with me. 
Therefore whether it were I or they, so we preach, and so ye believed. 
Now if Christ be preached that he rose from the dead, how say some among you that there is no resurrection of the dead? 
But if there be no resurrection of the dead, then is Christ not risen: 
And if Christ be not risen, then is our preaching vain, and your faith is also 
664, family of the Ahiramites: 
Of Shupham, the family of the Shuphamites: of Hupham, the family of the Huphamites. 
And the sons of Bela were ard and Naaman: of Ard, the family of the Ardites: and of Naaman, the family of the Naamites. 
These are the sons of Benjamin after their families: and they that were numbered of them were forty and five thousand and six hundred. 
These are the sons of Dan after their families: of Shuham, the family of the Shuhamites. These are the families of Dan after their families. 
All the families of the Shuhamites, according to those that were numbered of them, were threescore and four thousand and four hundred. 
Of the children 
777,of him, O generation of vipers, who hath warned you to flee from the wrath to come? 
Bring forth therefore fruits worthy of repentance, and begin not to say within yourselves, We have Abraham to our father: for I say unto you, That God is able of these stones to raise up children unto Abraham. 
And now also the axe is laid unto the root of the trees: every tree therefore which bringeth not forth good fruit is hewn down, and cast into the fire. 
And the people asked him, saying, What shall we do then? 
He answereth and saith unto them, He that hath two coats, let him impart to him that hath none; and he that hath meat, let him do likewise. 
Then came also publicans to be baptized, and said unto him, Master, what shall we do? 
And he said unto them, Exact no more than 
734,srael's left hand, and Manasseh in his left hand toward Israel's right hand, and brought them near unto him. 
And Israel stretched out his right hand, and laid it upon Ephraim's head, who was the younger, and his left hand upon Manasseh's head, guiding his hands wittingly; for Manasseh was the firstborn. 
And he blessed Joseph, and said, God, before whom my fathers Abraham and Isaac did walk, the God which fed me all my life long unto this day, 
The Angel which redeemed me from all evil, bless the lads; and let my name be named on them, and the name of my fathers Abraham and Isaac; and let them grow into a multitude in the midst of the earth. 
And when Joseph saw that his father laid his right hand upon the head of Ephraim, 
823, unto the woman, Yea, hath God said, Ye shall not eat of every tree of the garden? 
And the woman said unto the serpent, We may eat of the fruit of the trees of the garden: 
But of the fruit of the tree which is in the midst of the garden, God hath said, Ye shall not eat of it, neither shall ye touch it, lest ye die. 
And the serpent said unto the woman, Ye shall not surely die: 
For God doth know that in the day ye eat thereof, then your eyes shall be opened, and ye shall be as gods, knowing good and evil. 
And when the woman saw that the tree was good for food, and that it was pleasant to the eyes, and a tree to be desired to make one wise, she took of the fruit thereof, and did eat, and gave also unto her husband with her; and he did eat. 
And the eyes of them both were opened, and they knew that they were na
835,nite, which was of the children of Hobab the father in law of Moses, had severed himself from the Kenites, and pitched his tent unto the plain of Zaanaim, which is by Kedesh. 
And they shewed Sisera that Barak the son of Abinoam was gone up to mount Tabor. 
And Sisera gathered together all his chariots, even nine hundred chariots of iron, and all the people that were with him, from Harosheth of the Gentiles unto the river of Kishon. 
And Deborah said unto Barak, Up; for this is the day in which the LORD hath delivered Sisera into thine hand: is not the LORD gone out before thee? So Barak went down from mount Tabor, and ten thousand men after him. 
And the LORD discomfited Sisera, and all his chariots, and all his host, with the edge of the sword before Barak; so that Sisera lighted down off his chariot, and fled away on his
798,the interpretation thereof: The three baskets are three days: 
Yet within three days shall Pharaoh lift up thy head from off thee, and shall hang thee on a tree; and the birds shall eat thy flesh from off thee. 
And it came to pass the third day, which was Pharaoh's birthday, that he made a feast unto all his servants: and he lifted up the head of the chief butler and of the chief baker among his servants. 
And he restored the chief butler unto his butlership again; and he gave the cup into Pharaoh's hand: 
But he hanged the chief baker: as Joseph had interpreted to them. 
Yet did not the chief butler remember Joseph, but forgat him. 
And it came to pass at the end of two full years, that Pharaoh dreamed: and, behold, he stood by the river. 
And, behold, there came up out of the river se
713, take every man his censer, and put incense in them, and bring ye before the LORD every man his censer, two hundred and fifty censers; thou also, and Aaron, each of you his censer. 
And they took every man his censer, and put fire in them, and laid incense thereon, and stood in the door of the tabernacle of the congregation with Moses and Aaron. 
And Korah gathered all the congregation against them unto the door of the tabernacle of the congregation: and the glory of the LORD appeared unto all the congregation. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses and unto Aaron, saying, 
Separate yourselves from among this congregation, that I may consume them in a moment. 
And they fell upon their faces, and said, O God, the
727,Israel, that it may go well with thee. 
Thou shalt not remove thy neighbour's landmark, which they of old time have set in thine inheritance, which thou shalt inherit in the land that the LORD thy God giveth thee to possess it. 
One witness shall not rise up against a man for any iniquity, or for any sin, in any sin that he sinneth: at the mouth of two witnesses, or at the mouth of three witnesses, shall the matter be established. 
If a false witness rise up against any man to testify against him that which is wrong; 
Then both the men, between whom the controversy is, shall stand before the LORD, before the priests and the judges, which shall be in those days; 
And the judges shall make diligent inquisition: and, beh
795,at end is it for you? the day of the LORD is darkness, and not light. 
As if a man did flee from a lion, and a bear met him; or went into the house, and leaned his hand on the wall, and a serpent bit him. 
Shall not the day of the LORD be darkness, and not light? even very dark, and no brightness in it? 
I hate, I despise your feast days, and I will not smell in your solemn assemblies. 
Though ye offer me burnt offerings and your meat offerings, I will not accept them: neither will I regard the peace offerings of your fat beasts. 
Take thou away from me the noise of thy songs; for I will not hear the melody of thy viols. 
But let judgment run down as waters, and righteousness as a mighty stream. 
Have ye offered unto me sacrifices and offerings in the wilderness forty years, O house o
611,the habitation of thy righteousness prosperous. 
Though thy beginning was small, yet thy latter end should greatly increase. 
For enquire, I pray thee, of the former age, and prepare thyself to the search of their fathers: 
(For we are but of yesterday, and know nothing, because our days upon earth are a shadow:) 
Shall not they teach thee, and tell thee, and utter words out of their heart? 
Can the rush grow up without mire? can the flag grow without water? 
Whilst it is yet in his greenness, and not cut down, it withereth before any other herb. 
So are the paths of all that forget God; and the hypocrit
716,, that is, Thou shalt not see my face, except thou first bring Michal Saul's daughter, when thou comest to see my face. 
And David sent messengers to Ishbosheth Saul's son, saying, Deliver me my wife Michal, which I espoused to me for an hundred foreskins of the Philistines. 
And Ishbosheth sent, and took her from her husband, even from Phaltiel the son of Laish. 
And her husband went with her along weeping behind her to Bahurim. Then said Abner unto him, Go, return. And he returned. 
And Abner had communication with the elders of Israel, saying, Ye sought for David in times past to be king over you: 
Now then do it: for the LORD hath spoken of David, saying, By the hand of my servant David I will save my p
593,hat were full have hired out themselves for bread; and they that were hungry ceased: so that the barren hath born seven; and she that hath many children is waxed feeble. 
The LORD killeth, and maketh alive: he bringeth down to the grave, and bringeth up. 
The LORD maketh poor, and maketh rich: he bringeth low, and lifteth up. 
He raiseth up the poor out of the dust, and lifteth up the beggar from the dunghill, to set them among princes, and to make them inherit the throne of glory: for the pillars of the earth are the LORD's, and he hath set the world upon them. 
He will keep the feet o
628,left therein; (though at that time I had not set up the doors upon the gates;) 
That Sanballat and Geshem sent unto me, saying, Come, let us meet together in some one of the villages in the plain of Ono. But they thought to do me mischief. 
And I sent messengers unto them, saying, I am doing a great work, so that I cannot come down: why should the work cease, whilst I leave it, and come down to you? 
Yet they sent unto me four times after this sort; and I answered them after the same manner. 
Then sent Sanballat his servant unto me in like manner the fifth time with an open letter in his hand; 
Wherein was written, It is
605,cretion. 
A wise man will hear, and will increase learning; and a man of understanding shall attain unto wise counsels: 
To understand a proverb, and the interpretation; the words of the wise, and their dark sayings. 
The fear of the LORD is the beginning of knowledge: but fools despise wisdom and instruction. 
My son, hear the instruction of thy father, and forsake not the law of thy mother: 
For they shall be an ornament of grace unto thy head, and chains about thy neck. 
My son, if sinners entice thee, consent thou not. 
If they say, Come with us, let us lay wait for blood, let us lurk privily f
780,u, even with a sore destruction. 
If a man walking in the spirit and falsehood do lie, saying, I will prophesy unto thee of wine and of strong drink; he shall even be the prophet of this people. 
I will surely assemble, O Jacob, all of thee; I will surely gather the remnant of Israel; I will put them together as the sheep of Bozrah, as the flock in the midst of their fold: they shall make great noise by reason of the multitude of men. 
The breaker is come up before them: they have broken up, and have passed through the gate, and are gone out by it: and their king shall pass before them, and the LORD on the head of them. 
And I said, Hear, I pray you, O heads of Jacob, and ye princes of the house of Israel; Is it not for you to know judgment? 
Who hate the good, and love
657,ess and sorrow, and the light is darkened in the heavens thereof. 
In the year that king Uzziah died I saw also the LORD sitting upon a throne, high and lifted up, and his train filled the temple. 
Above it stood the seraphims: each one had six wings; with twain he covered his face, and with twain he covered his feet, and with twain he did fly. 
And one cried unto another, and said, Holy, holy, holy, is the LORD of hosts: the whole earth is full of his glory. 
And the posts of the door moved at the voice of him that cried, and the house was filled with smoke. 
Then said I, Woe is me! for I am undone; because I am a man of unclean lips, and I dwell i
564,nd follow me. 
For whosoever will save his life shall lose it: and whosoever will lose his life for my sake shall find it. 
For what is a man profited, if he shall gain the whole world, and lose his own soul? or what shall a man give in exchange for his soul? 
For the Son of man shall come in the glory of his Father with his angels; and then he shall reward every man according to his works. 
Verily I say unto you, There be some standing here, which shall not taste of death, till they see the Son of man coming in his kingdom. 
And after six days Jesus taketh 
728,the uncircumcised. 
They shall fall in the midst of them that are slain by the sword: she is delivered to the sword: draw her and all her multitudes. 
The strong among the mighty shall speak to him out of the midst of hell with them that help him: they are gone down, they lie uncircumcised, slain by the sword. 
Asshur is there and all her company: his graves are about him: all of them slain, fallen by the sword: 
Whose graves are set in the sides of the pit, and her company is round about her grave: all of them slain, fallen by the sword, which caused terror in the land of the living. 
There is Elam and all her multitude round about her grave, all of them slain, fallen by the sword, which are gone down uncircumcised in
781, dwelling among the tombs; and no man could bind him, no, not with chains: 
Because that he had been often bound with fetters and chains, and the chains had been plucked asunder by him, and the fetters broken in pieces: neither could any man tame him. 
And always, night and day, he was in the mountains, and in the tombs, crying, and cutting himself with stones. 
But when he saw Jesus afar off, he ran and worshipped him, 
And cried with a loud voice, and said, What have I to do with thee, Jesus, thou Son of the most high God? I adjure thee by God, that thou torment me not. 
For he said unto him, Come out of the man, thou unclean spirit. 
And he asked him, What is thy name? And he answered, saying, My name is Legion: for we are many. 
And he besought him much that he would
687,at they may behold thee. 
Thou hast defiled thy sanctuaries by the multitude of thine iniquities, by the iniquity of thy traffick; therefore will I bring forth a fire from the midst of thee, it shall devour thee, and I will bring thee to ashes upon the earth in the sight of all them that behold thee. 
All they that know thee among the people shall be astonished at thee: thou shalt be a terror, and never shalt thou be any more. 
Again the word of the LORD came unto me, saying, 
Son of man, set thy face against Zidon, and prophesy against it, 
And say, Thus saith the Lord GOD; Behold, I am against thee, O Zidon; and I will be glorified in the midst of thee: and they shall know tha
793,hath blessed thy children within thee. 
He maketh peace in thy borders, and filleth thee with the finest of the wheat. 
He sendeth forth his commandment upon earth: his word runneth very swiftly. 
He giveth snow like wool: he scattereth the hoarfrost like ashes. 
He casteth forth his ice like morsels: who can stand before his cold? 
He sendeth out his word, and melteth them: he causeth his wind to blow, and the waters flow. 
He sheweth his word unto Jacob, his statutes and his judgments unto Israel. 
He hath not dealt so with any nation: and as for his judgments, they have not known them. Praise ye the LORD. 
Praise ye the LORD. Praise ye the LORD from the heavens: praise him in the heights. 
Praise ye him, all his angels: praise ye him, all his hosts. 
Praise ye him, sun and moon: 
735,f. 
Wisdom crieth without; she uttereth her voice in the streets: 
She crieth in the chief place of concourse, in the openings of the gates: in the city she uttereth her words, saying, 
How long, ye simple ones, will ye love simplicity? and the scorners delight in their scorning, and fools hate knowledge? 
Turn you at my reproof: behold, I will pour out my spirit unto you, I will make known my words unto you. 
Because I have called, and ye refused; I have stretched out my hand, and no man regarded; 
But ye have set at nought all my counsel, and would none of my reproof: 
I also will laugh at your calamity; I will mock when your fear cometh; 
When your fear cometh as desolation, and your destruction cometh as a whirlwind; when
603,hat I came out from God. 
I came forth from the Father, and am come into the world: again, I leave the world, and go to the Father. 
His disciples said unto him, Lo, now speakest thou plainly, and speakest no proverb. 
Now are we sure that thou knowest all things, and needest not that any man should ask thee: by this we believe that thou camest forth from God. 
Jesus answered them, Do ye now believe? 
Behold, the hour cometh, yea, is now come, that ye shall be scattered, every man to his own, and shall leave me alone: and yet I am not alone, because the Father is with me. 
These things I have spo
827,l mourn, every family apart; the family of the house of David apart, and their wives apart; the family of the house of Nathan apart, and their wives apart; 
The family of the house of Levi apart, and their wives apart; the family of Shimei apart, and their wives apart; 
All the families that remain, every family apart, and their wives apart. 
In that day there shall be a fountain opened to the house of David and to the inhabitants of Jerusalem for sin and for uncleanness. 
And it shall come to pass in that day, saith the LORD of hosts, that I will cut off the names of the idols out of the land, and they shall no more be remembered: and also I will cause the prophets and the unclean spirit to pass out of the land. 
And it shall come to pass, that when any shall yet prophesy, then his father and his mother that begat 
800, day of trouble, and of treading down, and of perplexity by the Lord GOD of hosts in the valley of vision, breaking down the walls, and of crying to the mountains. 
And Elam bare the quiver with chariots of men and horsemen, and Kir uncovered the shield. 
And it shall come to pass, that thy choicest valleys shall be full of chariots, and the horsemen shall set themselves in array at the gate. 
And he discovered the covering of Judah, and thou didst look in that day to the armour of the house of the forest. 
Ye have seen also the breaches of the city of David, that they are many: and ye gathered together the waters of the lower pool. 
And ye have numbered the houses of Jerusalem, and the houses have ye broken down to fortify the wall. 
Ye made also a ditch between the two walls for the wate
733,ings over Moab. 
Kerioth is taken, and the strong holds are surprised, and the mighty men's hearts in Moab at that day shall be as the heart of a woman in her pangs. 
And Moab shall be destroyed from being a people, because he hath magnified himself against the LORD. 
Fear, and the pit, and the snare, shall be upon thee, O inhabitant of Moab, saith the LORD. 
He that fleeth from the fear shall fall into the pit; and he that getteth up out of the pit shall be taken in the snare: for I will bring upon it, even upon Moab, the year of their visitation, saith the LORD. 
They that fled stood under the shadow of Heshbon because of the force: but a fire shall come forth out of Heshbon, and a flame from the midst of Sihon, and shall
793,ong: for I have heard from the Lord GOD of hosts a consumption, even determined upon the whole earth. 
Give ye ear, and hear my voice; hearken, and hear my speech. 
Doth the plowman plow all day to sow? doth he open and break the clods of his ground? 
When he hath made plain the face thereof, doth he not cast abroad the fitches, and scatter the cummin, and cast in the principal wheat and the appointed barley and the rie in their place? 
For his God doth instruct him to discretion, and doth teach him. 
For the fitches are not threshed with a threshing instrument, neither is a cart wheel turned about upon the cummin; but the fitches are beaten out with a staff, and the cummin with a rod. 
Bread corn is bruised; because he will not ever be threshing it, nor break it with the wheel of h
601,h, and called thee from the chief men thereof, and said unto thee, Thou art my servant; I have chosen thee, and not cast thee away. 
Fear thou not; for I am with thee: be not dismayed; for I am thy God: I will strengthen thee; yea, I will help thee; yea, I will uphold thee with the right hand of my righteousness. 
Behold, all they that were incensed against thee shall be ashamed and confounded: they shall be as nothing; and they that strive with thee shall perish. 
Thou shalt seek them, and shalt not find them, even them that contended with thee: they that war against thee shall be as nothing, 
760,prophet, the son of Amoz, write. 
So Uzziah slept with his fathers, and they buried him with his fathers in the field of the burial which belonged to the kings; for they said, He is a leper: and Jotham his son reigned in his stead. 
Jotham was twenty and five years old when he began to reign, and he reigned sixteen years in Jerusalem. His mother's name also was Jerushah, the daughter of Zadok. 
And he did that which was right in the sight of the LORD, according to all that his father Uzziah did: howbeit he entered not into the temple of the LORD. And the people did yet corruptly. 
He built the high gate of the house of the LORD, and on the wall of Ophel he built much. 
Moreover he built cities in the mountains of Judah, and in the forests he built ca
743,, 
How long will it be ere ye make an end of words? mark, and afterwards we will speak. 
Wherefore are we counted as beasts, and reputed vile in your sight? 
He teareth himself in his anger: shall the earth be forsaken for thee? and shall the rock be removed out of his place? 
Yea, the light of the wicked shall be put out, and the spark of his fire shall not shine. 
The light shall be dark in his tabernacle, and his candle shall be put out with him. 
The steps of his strength shall be straitened, and his own counsel shall cast him down. 
For he is cast into a net by his own feet, and he walketh upon a snare. 
The gin shall take him by the heel, and the robber shall prevail against him. 
The snare is laid for him in the ground, and a 
568,nd these are the countries which the children of Israel inherited in the land of Canaan, which Eleazar the priest, and Joshua the son of Nun, and the heads of the fathers of the tribes of the children of Israel, distributed for inheritance to them. 
By lot was their inheritance, as the LORD commanded by the hand of Moses, for the nine tribes, and for the half tribe. 
For Moses had given the inheritance of two tribes and an half tribe on the other side Jordan: but unto the Levites he gave none inheritance among them. 
For the children of Joseph were two tribes, M
584,n the hold, and the Philistines' garrison was then at Bethlehem. 
And David longed, and said, Oh that one would give me drink of the water of the well of Bethlehem, that is at the gate! 
And the three brake through the host of the Philistines, and drew water out of the well of Bethlehem, that was by the gate, and took it, and brought it to David: but David would not drink of it, but poured it out to the LORD. 
And said, My God forbid it me, that I should do this thing: shall I drink the blood of these men that have put their lives in jeopardy? for with the jeopardy of their liv
838,ree days shall Pharaoh lift up thy head from off thee, and shall hang thee on a tree; and the birds shall eat thy flesh from off thee. 
And it came to pass the third day, which was Pharaoh's birthday, that he made a feast unto all his servants: and he lifted up the head of the chief butler and of the chief baker among his servants. 
And he restored the chief butler unto his butlership again; and he gave the cup into Pharaoh's hand: 
But he hanged the chief baker: as Joseph had interpreted to them. 
Yet did not the chief butler remember Joseph, but forgat him. 
And it came to pass at the end of two full years, that Pharaoh dreamed: and, behold, he stood by the river. 
And, behold, there came up out of the river seven well favoured kine and fatfleshed; and they fed in a meadow. 
And, behold, seven other kine came up after them o
716,he people abode in Kadesh; and Miriam died there, and was buried there. 
And there was no water for the congregation: and they gathered themselves together against Moses and against Aaron. 
And the people chode with Moses, and spake, saying, Would God that we had died when our brethren died before the LORD! 
And why have ye brought up the congregation of the LORD into this wilderness, that we and our cattle should die there? 
And wherefore have ye made us to come up out of Egypt, to bring us in unto this evil place? it is no place of seed, or of figs, or of vines, or of pomegranates; neither is there any water to drink. 
And Moses and Aaron went from the presence of the assembly unto the door of the taberna
745,ievous, such as there was none like it in all the land of Egypt since it became a nation. 
And the hail smote throughout all the land of Egypt all that was in the field, both man and beast; and the hail smote every herb of the field, and brake every tree of the field. 
Only in the land of Goshen, where the children of Israel were, was there no hail. 
And Pharaoh sent, and called for Moses and Aaron, and said unto them, I have sinned this time: the LORD is righteous, and I and my people are wicked. 
Intreat the LORD (for it is enough) that there be no more mighty thunderings and hail; and I will let you go, and ye shall stay no longer. 
And Moses said unto him, As soon as I am gone out of the city, I will spread abroad my hands unto the
678,ore the children of Israel, until we have brought them unto their place: and our little ones shall dwell in the fenced cities because of the inhabitants of the land. 
We will not return unto our houses, until the children of Israel have inherited every man his inheritance. 
For we will not inherit with them on yonder side Jordan, or forward; because our inheritance is fallen to us on this side Jordan eastward. 
And Moses said unto them, If ye will do this thing, if ye will go armed before the LORD to war, 
And will go all of you armed over Jordan before the LORD, until he hath driven out his enemies from before him, 
And the land be subdued before the LORD: then afterwa
734,ht in the midst of the noonday; hide the outcasts; bewray not him that wandereth. 
Let mine outcasts dwell with thee, Moab; be thou a covert to them from the face of the spoiler: for the extortioner is at an end, the spoiler ceaseth, the oppressors are consumed out of the land. 
And in mercy shall the throne be established: and he shall sit upon it in truth in the tabernacle of David, judging, and seeking judgment, and hasting righteousness. 
We have heard of the pride of Moab; he is very proud: even of his haughtiness, and his pride, and his wrath: but his lies shall not be so. 
Therefore shall Moab howl for Moab, every one shall howl: for the foundations of Kirhareseth shall ye mourn; surely they are stricken. 
For the fie
645,ry the wife of Cleophas, and Mary Magdalene. 
When Jesus therefore saw his mother, and the disciple standing by, whom he loved, he saith unto his mother, Woman, behold thy son! 
Then saith he to the disciple, Behold thy mother! And from that hour that disciple took her unto his own home. 
After this, Jesus knowing that all things were now accomplished, that the scripture might be fulfilled, saith, I thirst. 
Now there was set a vessel full of vinegar: and they filled a spunge with vinegar, and put it upon hyssop, and put it to his mouth. 
When Jesus therefore had received the vinegar, he said, It is finished: and he bowed his head, and g
598,the Reubenites. 
And his brethren by their families, when the genealogy of their generations was reckoned, were the chief, Jeiel, and Zechariah, 
And Bela the son of Azaz, the son of Shema, the son of Joel, who dwelt in Aroer, even unto Nebo and Baalmeon: 
And eastward he inhabited unto the entering in of the wilderness from the river Euphrates: because their cattle were multiplied in the land of Gilead. 
And in the days of Saul they made war with the Hagarites, who fell by their hand: and they dwelt in their tents throughout all the east land of Gilead. 
And the children of Gad dwelt over a
775, sister is Samaria, she and her daughters that dwell at thy left hand: and thy younger sister, that dwelleth at thy right hand, is Sodom and her daughters. 
Yet hast thou not walked after their ways, nor done after their abominations: but, as if that were a very little thing, thou wast corrupted more than they in all thy ways. 
As I live, saith the Lord GOD, Sodom thy sister hath not done, she nor her daughters, as thou hast done, thou and thy daughters. 
Behold, this was the iniquity of thy sister Sodom, pride, fulness of bread, and abundance of idleness was in her and in her daughters, neither did she strengthen the hand of the poor and needy. 
And they were haughty, and committed abomination before me: therefore I took them away as I saw good. 
Neither hath Sama
793, he that doth serve. 
For whether is greater, he that sitteth at meat, or he that serveth? is not he that sitteth at meat? but I am among you as he that serveth. 
Ye are they which have continued with me in my temptations. 
And I appoint unto you a kingdom, as my Father hath appointed unto me; 
That ye may eat and drink at my table in my kingdom, and sit on thrones judging the twelve tribes of Israel. 
And the Lord said, Simon, Simon, behold, Satan hath desired to have you, that he may sift you as wheat: 
But I have prayed for thee, that thy faith fail not: and when thou art converted, strengthen thy brethren. 
And he said unto him, Lord, I am ready to go with thee, both into prison, and to death. 
And he said, I tell thee, Peter, the cock shall not crow this day, before that thou s
673,s people came to take away the spoil of them, they found among them in abundance both riches with the dead bodies, and precious jewels, which they stripped off for themselves, more than they could carry away: and they were three days in gathering of the spoil, it was so much. 
And on the fourth day they assembled themselves in the valley of Berachah; for there they blessed the LORD: therefore the name of the same place was called, The valley of Berachah, unto this day. 
Then they returned, every man of Judah and Jerusalem, and Jehoshaphat in the forefront of them, to go again to Jerusalem with joy; for the LORD had made them to rejoice over their enemies. 
And they
715,t the fruit of their doings. 
Woe unto the wicked! it shall be ill with him: for the reward of his hands shall be given him. 
As for my people, children are their oppressors, and women rule over them. O my people, they which lead thee cause thee to err, and destroy the way of thy paths. 
The LORD standeth up to plead, and standeth to judge the people. 
The LORD will enter into judgment with the ancients of his people, and the princes thereof: for ye have eaten up the vineyard; the spoil of the poor is in your houses. 
What mean ye that ye beat my people to pieces, and grind the faces of the poor? saith the Lord GOD of hosts. 
Moreover the LORD saith, Because the daughters of Zion are haughty, and walk with
730, 
And he said, I seek my brethren: tell me, I pray thee, where they feed their flocks. 
And the man said, They are departed hence; for I heard them say, Let us go to Dothan. And Joseph went after his brethren, and found them in Dothan. 
And when they saw him afar off, even before he came near unto them, they conspired against him to slay him. 
And they said one to another, Behold, this dreamer cometh. 
Come now therefore, and let us slay him, and cast him into some pit, and we will say, Some evil beast hath devoured him: and we shall see what will become of his dreams. 
And Reuben heard it, and he delivered him out of their hands; and said, Let us not kill him. 
And Reuben said unto them, Shed no blood, but cast him into
643,t offerings, and the burnt offerings for the sabbaths, and for the new moons, and for the set feasts, as it is written in the law of the LORD. 
Moreover he commanded the people that dwelt in Jerusalem to give the portion of the priests and the Levites, that they might be encouraged in the law of the LORD. 
And as soon as the commandment came abroad, the children of Israel brought in abundance the firstfruits of corn, wine, and oil, and honey, and of all the increase of the field; and the tithe of all things brought they in abundantly. 
And concerning the children of Israel and Judah, that dwelt in the cities of Judah, they also brought
615,ibe and the high priest's officer came and emptied the chest, and took it, and carried it to his place again. Thus they did day by day, and gathered money in abundance. 
And the king and Jehoiada gave it to such as did the work of the service of the house of the LORD, and hired masons and carpenters to repair the house of the LORD, and also such as wrought iron and brass to mend the house of the LORD. 
So the workmen wrought, and the work was perfected by them, and they set the house of God in his state, and strengthened it. 
And when they had finished it, they brought the rest of the money before the king a
597,ou in the sixth year, and it shall bring forth fruit for three years. 
And ye shall sow the eighth year, and eat yet of old fruit until the ninth year; until her fruits come in ye shall eat of the old store. 
The land shall not be sold for ever: for the land is mine, for ye are strangers and sojourners with me. 
And in all the land of your possession ye shall grant a redemption for the land. 
If thy brother be waxen poor, and hath sold away some of his possession, and if any of his kin come to redeem it, then shall he redeem that which his brother sold. 
And if the man have none to redeem i
629,u break the bottle in the sight of the men that go with thee, 
And shalt say unto them, Thus saith the LORD of hosts; Even so will I break this people and this city, as one breaketh a potter's vessel, that cannot be made whole again: and they shall bury them in Tophet, till there be no place to bury. 
Thus will I do unto this place, saith the LORD, and to the inhabitants thereof, and even make this city as Tophet: 
And the houses of Jerusalem, and the houses of the kings of Judah, shall be defiled as the place of Tophet, because of all the houses upon whose roofs they have burned incense unto all the host of heaven, and h
674,all offer his sin offering, and his burnt offering: 
And he shall offer the ram for a sacrifice of peace offerings unto the LORD, with the basket of unleavened bread: the priest shall offer also his meat offering, and his drink offering. 
And the Nazarite shall shave the head of his separation at the door of the tabernacle of the congregation, and shall take the hair of the head of his separation, and put it in the fire which is under the sacrifice of the peace offerings. 
And the priest shall take the sodden shoulder of the ram, and one unleavened cake out of the basket, and one unleavened wafer, and shall put them upon the hands of the Nazarite, after the hair of 
778,ner thereof. 
And out of them shall proceed thanksgiving and the voice of them that make merry: and I will multiply them, and they shall not be few; I will also glorify them, and they shall not be small. 
Their children also shall be as aforetime, and their congregation shall be established before me, and I will punish all that oppress them. 
And their nobles shall be of themselves, and their governor shall proceed from the midst of them; and I will cause him to draw near, and he shall approach unto me: for who is this that engaged his heart to approach unto me? saith the LORD. 
And ye shall be my people, and I will be your God. 
Behold, the whirlwind of the LORD goeth forth with fury, a continuing whirlwind: it shall fall with pain upon the head of the wicked. 
The f
752,ist constraineth us; because we thus judge, that if one died for all, then were all dead: 
And that he died for all, that they which live should not henceforth live unto themselves, but unto him which died for them, and rose again. 
Wherefore henceforth know we no man after the flesh: yea, though we have known Christ after the flesh, yet now henceforth know we him no more. 
Therefore if any man be in Christ, he is a new creature: old things are passed away; behold, all things are become new. 
And all things are of God, who hath reconciled us to himself by Jesus Christ, and hath given to us the ministry of reconciliation; 
To wit, that God was in Christ, reconciling the world unto himself, not imputing their trespasses unto them; and hath comm
838, temple unto the LORD God of Israel; 
Then they came to Zerubbabel, and to the chief of the fathers, and said unto them, Let us build with you: for we seek your God, as ye do; and we do sacrifice unto him since the days of Esarhaddon king of Assur, which brought us up hither. 
But Zerubbabel, and Jeshua, and the rest of the chief of the fathers of Israel, said unto them, Ye have nothing to do with us to build an house unto our God; but we ourselves together will build unto the LORD God of Israel, as king Cyrus the king of Persia hath commanded us. 
Then the people of the land weakened the hands of the people of Judah, and troubled them in building, 
And hired counsellors against them, to frustrate their purpose, all the days of Cyrus king of Persia, even until the reign of Darius king of Persia. 
And in the reign of Ahasuerus,
750, and hasted to bring Haman unto the banquet that Esther had prepared. 
So the king and Haman came to banquet with Esther the queen. 
And the king said again unto Esther on the second day at the banquet of wine, What is thy petition, queen Esther? and it shall be granted thee: and what is thy request? and it shall be performed, even to the half of the kingdom. 
Then Esther the queen answered and said, If I have found favour in thy sight, O king, and if it please the king, let my life be given me at my petition, and my people at my request: 
For we are sold, I and my people, to be destroyed, to be slain, and to perish. But if we had been sold for bondmen and bondwomen, I had held my tongue, although the enemy could not countervail the king's 
582,ll his channels, and go over all his banks: 
And he shall pass through Judah; he shall overflow and go over, he shall reach even to the neck; and the stretching out of his wings shall fill the breadth of thy land, O Immanuel. 
Associate yourselves, O ye people, and ye shall be broken in pieces; and give ear, all ye of far countries: gird yourselves, and ye shall be broken in pieces; gird yourselves, and ye shall be broken in pieces. 
Take counsel together, and it shall come to nought; speak the word, and it shall not stand: for God is with us. 
For the LORD spake thus to me w
680, clemency a few words. 
For we have found this man a pestilent fellow, and a mover of sedition among all the Jews throughout the world, and a ringleader of the sect of the Nazarenes: 
Who also hath gone about to profane the temple: whom we took, and would have judged according to our law. 
But the chief captain Lysias came upon us, and with great violence took him away out of our hands, 
Commanding his accusers to come unto thee: by examining of whom thyself mayest take knowledge of all these things, whereof we accuse him. 
And the Jews also assented, saying that these things were so. 
Then Paul, after that the governor had beckoned unto him to speak, answered, Forasmuch 
786, so wickedly. 
Behold now, I have two daughters which have not known man; let me, I pray you, bring them out unto you, and do ye to them as is good in your eyes: only unto these men do nothing; for therefore came they under the shadow of my roof. 
And they said, Stand back. And they said again, This one fellow came in to sojourn, and he will needs be a judge: now will we deal worse with thee, than with them. And they pressed sore upon the man, even Lot, and came near to break the door. 
But the men put forth their hand, and pulled Lot into the house to them, and shut to the door. 
And they smote the men that were at the door of the house with blindness, both small and great: so that they wearied themselves to find the door. 
And the men said unto Lot, Hast thou here any besid
746,e declared unto them thy name, and will declare it: that the love wherewith thou hast loved me may be in them, and I in them. 
When Jesus had spoken these words, he went forth with his disciples over the brook Cedron, where was a garden, into the which he entered, and his disciples. 
And Judas also, which betrayed him, knew the place: for Jesus ofttimes resorted thither with his disciples. 
Judas then, having received a band of men and officers from the chief priests and Pharisees, cometh thither with lanterns and torches and weapons. 
Jesus therefore, knowing all things that should come upon him, went forth, and said unto them, Whom seek ye? 
They answered him, Jesus of Nazareth. Jesus saith unto them, I am he. And Judas also, which be
782,degroom tarried, they all slumbered and slept. 
And at midnight there was a cry made, Behold, the bridegroom cometh; go ye out to meet him. 
Then all those virgins arose, and trimmed their lamps. 
And the foolish said unto the wise, Give us of your oil; for our lamps are gone out. 
But the wise answered, saying, Not so; lest there be not enough for us and you: but go ye rather to them that sell, and buy for yourselves. 
And while they went to buy, the bridegroom came; and they that were ready went in with him to the marriage: and the door was shut. 
Afterward came also the other virgins, saying, Lord, Lord, open to us. 
But he answered and said, Verily I say unto you, I know you not. 
Watch therefore, for ye know neither the day nor the hour wherein the Son of man cometh.
739,And there were made on them, on the doors of the temple, cherubims and palm trees, like as were made upon the walls; and there were thick planks upon the face of the porch without. 
And there were narrow windows and palm trees on the one side and on the other side, on the sides of the porch, and upon the side chambers of the house, and thick planks. 
Then he brought me forth into the utter court, the way toward the north: and he brought me into the chamber that was over against the separate place, and which was before the building toward the north. 
Before the length of an hundred cubits was the north door, and the breadth was fifty cubits. 
Over against the twenty cubits which were for the inner court, and over against the pavem
817, and dwelled between Kadesh and Shur, and sojourned in Gerar. 
And Abraham said of Sarah his wife, She is my sister: and Abimelech king of Gerar sent, and took Sarah. 
But God came to Abimelech in a dream by night, and said to him, Behold, thou art but a dead man, for the woman which thou hast taken; for she is a man's wife. 
But Abimelech had not come near her: and he said, LORD, wilt thou slay also a righteous nation? 
Said he not unto me, She is my sister? and she, even she herself said, He is my brother: in the integrity of my heart and innocency of my hands have I done this. 
And God said unto him in a dream, Yea, I know that thou didst this in the integrity of thy heart; for I also withheld thee from sinning against me: therefore suffered I thee not to touch her. 
Now therefore restore the man his wi
708,even cut off which trouble you. 
For, brethren, ye have been called unto liberty; only use not liberty for an occasion to the flesh, but by love serve one another. 
For all the law is fulfilled in one word, even in this; Thou shalt love thy neighbour as thyself. 
But if ye bite and devour one another, take heed that ye be not consumed one of another. 
This I say then, Walk in the Spirit, and ye shall not fulfil the lust of the flesh. 
For the flesh lusteth against the Spirit, and the Spirit against the flesh: and these are contrary the one to the other: so that ye cannot do the things that ye would. 
But if ye be led of the Spirit, ye are not under the law. 
Now the works of the flesh are manifest, 
756,d. 
And the LORD said unto Moses, Pharaoh's heart is hardened, he refuseth to let the people go. 
Get thee unto Pharaoh in the morning; lo, he goeth out unto the water; and thou shalt stand by the river's brink against he come; and the rod which was turned to a serpent shalt thou take in thine hand. 
And thou shalt say unto him, The LORD God of the Hebrews hath sent me unto thee, saying, Let my people go, that they may serve me in the wilderness: and, behold, hitherto thou wouldest not hear. 
Thus saith the LORD, In this thou shalt know that I am the LORD: behold, I will smite with the rod that is in mine hand upon the waters which are in the river, and they shall be turned to blood. 
And the fish that is in the river shall die, and the river sha
793,is evil: for of the abundance of the heart his mouth speaketh. 
And why call ye me, Lord, Lord, and do not the things which I say? 
Whosoever cometh to me, and heareth my sayings, and doeth them, I will shew you to whom he is like: 
He is like a man which built an house, and digged deep, and laid the foundation on a rock: and when the flood arose, the stream beat vehemently upon that house, and could not shake it: for it was founded upon a rock. 
But he that heareth, and doeth not, is like a man that without a foundation built an house upon the earth; against which the stream did beat vehemently, and immediately it fell; and the ruin of that house was great. 
Now when he had ended all his sayings in the audience of the people, he entered into Capernaum. 
And a certain centurion's se
745, lifted up his voice, and said unto them, Ye men of Judaea, and all ye that dwell at Jerusalem, be this known unto you, and hearken to my words: 
For these are not drunken, as ye suppose, seeing it is but the third hour of the day. 
But this is that which was spoken by the prophet Joel; 
And it shall come to pass in the last days, saith God, I will pour out of my Spirit upon all flesh: and your sons and your daughters shall prophesy, and your young men shall see visions, and your old men shall dream dreams: 
And on my servants and on my handmaidens I will pour out in those days of my Spirit; and they shall prophesy: 
And I will shew wonders in heaven above, and signs in the earth beneath; blood, and fire, and vapour of smoke: 
The sun 
612,hall do against any of them: 
If the priest that is anointed do sin according to the sin of the people; then let him bring for his sin, which he hath sinned, a young bullock without blemish unto the LORD for a sin offering. 
And he shall bring the bullock unto the door of the tabernacle of the congregation before the LORD; and shall lay his hand upon the bullock's head, and kill the bullock before the LORD. 
And the priest that is anointed shall take of the bullock's blood, and bring it to the tabernacle of the congregation: 
And the priest shall dip his finger in the blood, and sprinkle of the blood seve
644,es unto Jesus, saying, Who is the greatest in the kingdom of heaven? 
And Jesus called a little child unto him, and set him in the midst of them, 
And said, Verily I say unto you, Except ye be converted, and become as little children, ye shall not enter into the kingdom of heaven. 
Whosoever therefore shall humble himself as this little child, the same is greatest in the kingdom of heaven. 
And whoso shall receive one such little child in my name receiveth me. 
But whoso shall offend one of these little ones which believe in me, it were better for him that a millstone were hanged about his neck, and that he were drowned in the depth of 
737,nd become the firstfruits of them that slept. 
For since by man came death, by man came also the resurrection of the dead. 
For as in Adam all die, even so in Christ shall all be made alive. 
But every man in his own order: Christ the firstfruits; afterward they that are Christ's at his coming. 
Then cometh the end, when he shall have delivered up the kingdom to God, even the Father; when he shall have put down all rule and all authority and power. 
For he must reign, till he hath put all enemies under his feet. 
The last enemy that shall be destroyed is death. 
For he hath put all things under his feet. But when he saith all things are put under him, it is manifest that he is excepted, which did put all things under him. 
And 
732,t, which cry day and night unto him, though he bear long with them? 
I tell you that he will avenge them speedily. Nevertheless when the Son of man cometh, shall he find faith on the earth? 
And he spake this parable unto certain which trusted in themselves that they were righteous, and despised others: 
Two men went up into the temple to pray; the one a Pharisee, and the other a publican. 
The Pharisee stood and prayed thus with himself, God, I thank thee, that I am not as other men are, extortioners, unjust, adulterers, or even as this publican. 
I fast twice in the week, I give tithes of all that I possess. 
And the publican, standing afar off, would not lift up so much as his eyes unto heaven, but smote upon his breast
690,hall receive one such little child in my name receiveth me. 
But whoso shall offend one of these little ones which believe in me, it were better for him that a millstone were hanged about his neck, and that he were drowned in the depth of the sea. 
Woe unto the world because of offences! for it must needs be that offences come; but woe to that man by whom the offence cometh! 
Wherefore if thy hand or thy foot offend thee, cut them off, and cast them from thee: it is better for thee to enter into life halt or maimed, rather than having two hands or two feet to be cast into everlasting fire. 
And if thine eye offend thee, pluck it out, and cast it from thee: it is better for thee to 
716,o me: come therefore, I pray thee, curse me this people. 
And Balaam answered and said unto the servants of Balak, If Balak would give me his house full of silver and gold, I cannot go beyond the word of the LORD my God, to do less or more. 
Now therefore, I pray you, tarry ye also here this night, that I may know what the LORD will say unto me more. 
And God came unto Balaam at night, and said unto him, If the men come to call thee, rise up, and go with them; but yet the word which I shall say unto thee, that shalt thou do. 
And Balaam rose up in the morning, and saddled his ass, and went with the princes of Moab. 
And God's anger was kindled because he went: and the angel of the LORD stood in the way for 
833,de like unto his brethren, that he might be a merciful and faithful high priest in things pertaining to God, to make reconciliation for the sins of the people. 
For in that he himself hath suffered being tempted, he is able to succour them that are tempted. 
Wherefore, holy brethren, partakers of the heavenly calling, consider the Apostle and High Priest of our profession, Christ Jesus; 
Who was faithful to him that appointed him, as also Moses was faithful in all his house. 
For this man was counted worthy of more glory than Moses, inasmuch as he who hath builded the house hath more honour than the house. 
For every house is builded by some man; but he that built all things is God. 
And Moses verily was faithful in all his house, as a servant, for a testimony of those things which were to be spoken after; 
But Christ as 
724,he elders of Israel; and worship ye afar off. 
And Moses alone shall come near the LORD: but they shall not come nigh; neither shall the people go up with him. 
And Moses came and told the people all the words of the LORD, and all the judgments: and all the people answered with one voice, and said, All the words which the LORD hath said will we do. 
And Moses wrote all the words of the LORD, and rose up early in the morning, and builded an altar under the hill, and twelve pillars, according to the twelve tribes of Israel. 
And he sent young men of the children of Israel, which offered burnt offerings, and sacrificed peace offerings of oxen unto the LORD. 
And Moses took half of the blood, and put it in basons; and 
686,ch shew unto us the way of salvation. 
And this did she many days. But Paul, being grieved, turned and said to the spirit, I command thee in the name of Jesus Christ to come out of her. And he came out the same hour. 
And when her masters saw that the hope of their gains was gone, they caught Paul and Silas, and drew them into the marketplace unto the rulers, 
And brought them to the magistrates, saying, These men, being Jews, do exceedingly trouble our city, 
And teach customs, which are not lawful for us to receive, neither to observe, being Romans. 
And the multitude rose up together against them: and the magistrates rent off their clothes, and commanded to beat them. 
And w
640,s were done by the apostles. 
And all that believed were together, and had all things common; 
And sold their possessions and goods, and parted them to all men, as every man had need. 
And they, continuing daily with one accord in the temple, and breaking bread from house to house, did eat their meat with gladness and singleness of heart, 
Praising God, and having favour with all the people. And the Lord added to the church daily such as should be saved. 
Now Peter and John went up together into the temple at the hour of prayer, being the ninth hour. 
And a certain man lame from his mother's womb was carried, whom they laid daily at
741, and thus he answered me. 
And the king said unto him, Do as he hath said, and fall upon him, and bury him; that thou mayest take away the innocent blood, which Joab shed, from me, and from the house of my father. 
And the LORD shall return his blood upon his own head, who fell upon two men more righteous and better than he, and slew them with the sword, my father David not knowing thereof, to wit, Abner the son of Ner, captain of the host of Israel, and Amasa the son of Jether, captain of the host of Judah. 
Their blood shall therefore return upon the head of Joab, and upon the head of his seed for ever: but upon David, and upon his seed, and upon his house, and upon his throne, shall there be peace for ever from the LORD. 
So Ben
565, drink; and she shall say, Drink, and I will give thy camels drink also: let the same be she that thou hast appointed for thy servant Isaac; and thereby shall I know that thou hast shewed kindness unto my master. 
And it came to pass, before he had done speaking, that, behold, Rebekah came out, who was born to Bethuel, son of Milcah, the wife of Nahor, Abraham's brother, with her pitcher upon her shoulder. 
And the damsel was very fair to look upon, a virgin, neither had any man known her: and she went down to the well, and filled her pitcher, and came up. 
A
647,cessities, in persecutions, in distresses for Christ's sake: for when I am weak, then am I strong. 
I am become a fool in glorying; ye have compelled me: for I ought to have been commended of you: for in nothing am I behind the very chiefest apostles, though I be nothing. 
Truly the signs of an apostle were wrought among you in all patience, in signs, and wonders, and mighty deeds. 
For what is it wherein ye were inferior to other churches, except it be that I myself was not burdensome to you? forgive me this wrong. 
Behold, the third time I am ready to come to you; and I will not be burdensome to you: for I seek not your's but you: for th
759,captivity before the enemy. 
And from the daughter of Zion all her beauty is departed: her princes are become like harts that find no pasture, and they are gone without strength before the pursuer. 
Jerusalem remembered in the days of her affliction and of her miseries all her pleasant things that she had in the days of old, when her people fell into the hand of the enemy, and none did help her: the adversaries saw her, and did mock at her sabbaths. 
Jerusalem hath grievously sinned; therefore she is removed: all that honoured her despise her, because they have seen her nakedness: yea, she sigheth, and turneth backward. 
Her filthiness is in her skirts; she remembereth not her last end; therefore she came down wonderfully: she had no comforter. O LO
589,e prophetess, the sister of Aaron, took a timbrel in her hand; and all the women went out after her with timbrels and with dances. 
And Miriam answered them, Sing ye to the LORD, for he hath triumphed gloriously; the horse and his rider hath he thrown into the sea. 
So Moses brought Israel from the Red sea, and they went out into the wilderness of Shur; and they went three days in the wilderness, and found no water. 
And when they came to Marah, they could not drink of the waters of Marah, for they were bitter: therefore the name of it was called Marah. 
And the people murmured agai
789,grave. 
For thy servant became surety for the lad unto my father, saying, If I bring him not unto thee, then I shall bear the blame to my father for ever. 
Now therefore, I pray thee, let thy servant abide instead of the lad a bondman to my lord; and let the lad go up with his brethren. 
For how shall I go up to my father, and the lad be not with me? lest peradventure I see the evil that shall come on my father. 
Then Joseph could not refrain himself before all them that stood by him; and he cried, Cause every man to go out from me. And there stood no man with him, while Joseph made himself known unto his brethren. 
And he wept aloud: and the Egyptians and the house of Pharaoh heard. 
And Joseph said unto his brethren, I am Joseph; doth my father yet live? And his brethren could
785,ng, he shall die in his sin, and his righteousness which he hath done shall not be remembered; but his blood will I require at thine hand. 
Nevertheless if thou warn the righteous man, that the righteous sin not, and he doth not sin, he shall surely live, because he is warned; also thou hast delivered thy soul. 
And the hand of the LORD was there upon me; and he said unto me, Arise, go forth into the plain, and I will there talk with thee. 
Then I arose, and went forth into the plain: and, behold, the glory of the LORD stood there, as the glory which I saw by the river of Chebar: and I fell on my face. 
Then the spirit entered into me, and set me upon my feet, and spake with me, and said unto me, Go, shut thyself within thine house. 
But thou, O son of man, behold, they shal
728,oners: 
The LORD openeth the eyes of the blind: the LORD raiseth them that are bowed down: the LORD loveth the righteous: 
The LORD preserveth the strangers; he relieveth the fatherless and widow: but the way of the wicked he turneth upside down. 
The LORD shall reign for ever, even thy God, O Zion, unto all generations. Praise ye the LORD. 
Praise ye the LORD: for it is good to sing praises unto our God; for it is pleasant; and praise is comely. 
The LORD doth build up Jerusalem: he gathereth together the outcasts of Israel. 
He healeth the broken in heart, and bindeth up their wounds. 
He telleth the number of the stars; he calleth them all by their names. 
Great is our Lord, and of great power: his understanding is 
640, perish, and the plain shall be destroyed, as the LORD hath spoken. 
Give wings unto Moab, that it may flee and get away: for the cities thereof shall be desolate, without any to dwell therein. 
Cursed be he that doeth the work of the LORD deceitfully, and cursed be he that keepeth back his sword from blood. 
Moab hath been at ease from his youth, and he hath settled on his lees, and hath not been emptied from vessel to vessel, neither hath he gone into captivity: therefore his taste remained in him, and his scent is not changed. 
Therefore, behold, the days come, saith the LORD, that I will send unto him wanderers, that shall cause
732, trust with the gospel, even so we speak; not as pleasing men, but God, which trieth our hearts. 
For neither at any time used we flattering words, as ye know, nor a cloke of covetousness; God is witness: 
Nor of men sought we glory, neither of you, nor yet of others, when we might have been burdensome, as the apostles of Christ. 
But we were gentle among you, even as a nurse cherisheth her children: 
So being affectionately desirous of you, we were willing to have imparted unto you, not the gospel of God only, but also our own souls, because ye were dear unto us. 
For ye remember, brethren, our labour and travail: for labouring night and day, because we would not be chargeable unto any of you, we preached unto you the gos
656, host of heaven standing on his right hand and on his left. 
And the LORD said, Who shall entice Ahab king of Israel, that he may go up and fall at Ramothgilead? And one spake saying after this manner, and another saying after that manner. 
Then there came out a spirit, and stood before the LORD, and said, I will entice him. And the LORD said unto him, Wherewith? 
And he said, I will go out, and be a lying spirit in the mouth of all his prophets. And the Lord said, Thou shalt entice him, and thou shalt also prevail: go out, and do even so. 
Now therefore, behold, the LORD hath put a lying spirit in the mouth of these thy prophets, and the LORD hath
581,firstling of an ass thou shalt redeem with a lamb: and if thou redeem him not, then shalt thou break his neck. All the firstborn of thy sons thou shalt redeem. And none shall appear before me empty. 
Six days thou shalt work, but on the seventh day thou shalt rest: in earing time and in harvest thou shalt rest. 
And thou shalt observe the feast of weeks, of the firstfruits of wheat harvest, and the feast of ingathering at the year's end. 
Thrice in the year shall all your menchildren appear before the LORD God, the God of Israel. 
For I will cast out the nations before thee,
832, Javan, to the isles afar off, that have not heard my fame, neither have seen my glory; and they shall declare my glory among the Gentiles. 
And they shall bring all your brethren for an offering unto the LORD out of all nations upon horses, and in chariots, and in litters, and upon mules, and upon swift beasts, to my holy mountain Jerusalem, saith the LORD, as the children of Israel bring an offering in a clean vessel into the house of the LORD. 
And I will also take of them for priests and for Levites, saith the LORD. 
For as the new heavens and the new earth, which I will make, shall remain before me, saith the LORD, so shall your seed and your name remain. 
And it shall come to pass, that from one new moon to another, and from one sabbath to another, shall all flesh come to worship before me, saith the LORD. 
And the
792,hall go in, say ye to the goodman of the house, The Master saith, Where is the guestchamber, where I shall eat the passover with my disciples? 
And he will shew you a large upper room furnished and prepared: there make ready for us. 
And his disciples went forth, and came into the city, and found as he had said unto them: and they made ready the passover. 
And in the evening he cometh with the twelve. 
And as they sat and did eat, Jesus said, Verily I say unto you, One of you which eateth with me shall betray me. 
And they began to be sorrowful, and to say unto him one by one, Is it I? and another said, Is it I? 
And he answered and said unto them, It is one of the twelve, that dippeth with me in the dish. 
The Son of man indeed goeth, as it is written of him: but woe to that man b
692,wallowed up all the habitations of Jacob, and hath not pitied: he hath thrown down in his wrath the strong holds of the daughter of Judah; he hath brought them down to the ground: he hath polluted the kingdom and the princes thereof. 
He hath cut off in his fierce anger all the horn of Israel: he hath drawn back his right hand from before the enemy, and he burned against Jacob like a flaming fire, which devoureth round about. 
He hath bent his bow like an enemy: he stood with his right hand as an adversary, and slew all that were pleasant to the eye in the tabernacle of the daughter of Zion: he poured out his fury like fire. 
The LORD was as an enemy: he hath swallowed up Israel, he 
824,n sent to the cedar that was in Lebanon, saying, Give thy daughter to my son to wife: and there passed by a wild beast that was in Lebanon, and trode down the thistle. 
Thou sayest, Lo, thou hast smitten the Edomites; and thine heart lifteth thee up to boast: abide now at home; why shouldest thou meddle to thine hurt, that thou shouldest fall, even thou, and Judah with thee? 
But Amaziah would not hear; for it came of God, that he might deliver them into the hand of their enemies, because they sought after the gods of Edom. 
So Joash the king of Israel went up; and they saw one another in the face, both he and Amaziah king of Judah, at Bethshemesh, which belongeth to Judah. 
And Judah was put to the worse before Israel, and they fled every man to his tent. 
And Joash the king of Israel took Amaziah king of Judah,
771, that were with him, went up, and drew nigh, and came before the city, and pitched on the north side of Ai: now there was a valley between them and Ai. 
And he took about five thousand men, and set them to lie in ambush between Bethel and Ai, on the west side of the city. 
And when they had set the people, even all the host that was on the north of the city, and their liers in wait on the west of the city, Joshua went that night into the midst of the valley. 
And it came to pass, when the king of Ai saw it, that they hasted and rose up early, and the men of the city went out against Israel to battle, he and all his people, at a time appointed, before the plain; but he wist not that there were liers in ambush against him behind the city. 
And Joshua and all Isra
605,veth wisdom rejoiceth his father: but he that keepeth company with harlots spendeth his substance. 
The king by judgment establisheth the land: but he that receiveth gifts overthroweth it. 
A man that flattereth his neighbour spreadeth a net for his feet. 
In the transgression of an evil man there is a snare: but the righteous doth sing and rejoice. 
The righteous considereth the cause of the poor: but the wicked regardeth not to know it. 
Scornful men bring a city into a snare: but wise men turn away wrath. 
If a wise man contendeth with a foolish man, whether he rage or laugh, there is no rest. 

716,all carry nothing away: his glory shall not descend after him. 
Though while he lived he blessed his soul: and men will praise thee, when thou doest well to thyself. 
He shall go to the generation of his fathers; they shall never see light. 
Man that is in honour, and understandeth not, is like the beasts that perish. 
The mighty God, even the LORD, hath spoken, and called the earth from the rising of the sun unto the going down thereof. 
Out of Zion, the perfection of beauty, God hath shined. 
Our God shall come, and shall not keep silence: a fire shall devour before him, and it shall be very tempestuous round about him. 
He shall call to the heavens from above, and to the earth, that he may judge his peop
741,Aphik, nor of Rehob: 
But the Asherites dwelt among the Canaanites, the inhabitants of the land: for they did not drive them out. 
Neither did Naphtali drive out the inhabitants of Bethshemesh, nor the inhabitants of Bethanath; but he dwelt among the Canaanites, the inhabitants of the land: nevertheless the inhabitants of Bethshemesh and of Bethanath became tributaries unto them. 
And the Amorites forced the children of Dan into the mountain: for they would not suffer them to come down to the valley: 
But the Amorites would dwell in mount Heres in Aijalon, and in Shaalbim: yet the hand of the house of Joseph prevailed, so that they became tributaries. 
And the coast of the Amorites was from the going up to Akrabbim, from the rock, 
749,siah the second. 
The sons of Merari; Mahli, and Mushi. The sons of Mahli; Eleazar, and Kish. 
And Eleazar died, and had no sons, but daughters: and their brethren the sons of Kish took them. 
The sons of Mushi; Mahli, and Eder, and Jeremoth, three. 
These were the sons of Levi after the house of their fathers; even the chief of the fathers, as they were counted by number of names by their polls, that did the work for the service of the house of the LORD, from the age of twenty years and upward. 
For David said, The LORD God of Israel hath given rest unto his people, that they may dwell in Jerusalem for ever: 
And also unto the Levites; they shall no more carry the tabernacle, nor any vessels of it for the service thereof. 
For by the last
791,r ever, to burn incense before the LORD, to minister unto him, and to bless in his name for ever. 
Now concerning Moses the man of God, his sons were named of the tribe of Levi. 
The sons of Moses were, Gershom, and Eliezer. 
Of the sons of Gershom, Shebuel was the chief. 
And the sons of Eliezer were, Rehabiah the chief. And Eliezer had none other sons; but the sons of Rehabiah were very many. 
Of the sons of Izhar; Shelomith the chief. 
Of the sons of Hebron; Jeriah the first, Amariah the second, Jahaziel the third, and Jekameam the fourth. 
Of the sons of Uzziel; Micah the first and Jesiah the second. 
The sons of Merari; Mahli, and Mushi. The sons of Mahli; Eleazar, and Kish. 
And Eleazar died, and had no sons, but daughters: and their brethren the sons of Kish took them. 
The
564,ot perish with the rest of the wise men of Babylon. 
Then was the secret revealed unto Daniel in a night vision. Then Daniel blessed the God of heaven. 
Daniel answered and said, Blessed be the name of God for ever and ever: for wisdom and might are his: 
And he changeth the times and the seasons: he removeth kings, and setteth up kings: he giveth wisdom unto the wise, and knowledge to them that know understanding: 
He revealeth the deep and secret things: he knoweth what is in the darkness, and the light dwelleth with him. 
I thank thee, and praise thee, O 
779,will dwell in them, and walk in them; and I will be their God, and they shall be my people. 
Wherefore come out from among them, and be ye separate, saith the Lord, and touch not the unclean thing; and I will receive you. 
And will be a Father unto you, and ye shall be my sons and daughters, saith the Lord Almighty. 
Having therefore these promises, dearly beloved, let us cleanse ourselves from all filthiness of the flesh and spirit, perfecting holiness in the fear of God. 
Receive us; we have wronged no man, we have corrupted no man, we have defrauded no man. 
I speak not this to condemn you: for I have said before, that ye are in our hearts to die and live with you. 
Great is my boldness of speech toward you, great is my glorying of you: I am filled with comfort, I a
581, of the prophets, O ye house of Israel, have ye offered to me slain beasts and sacrifices by the space of forty years in the wilderness? 
Yea, ye took up the tabernacle of Moloch, and the star of your god Remphan, figures which ye made to worship them: and I will carry you away beyond Babylon. 
Our fathers had the tabernacle of witness in the wilderness, as he had appointed, speaking unto Moses, that he should make it according to the fashion that he had seen. 
Which also our fathers that came after brought in with Jesus into the possession of the Gentiles, whom God drave ou
696, four thousand men, beside women and children. 
And he sent away the multitude, and took ship, and came into the coasts of Magdala. 
The Pharisees also with the Sadducees came, and tempting desired him that he would shew them a sign from heaven. 
He answered and said unto them, When it is evening, ye say, It will be fair weather: for the sky is red. 
And in the morning, It will be foul weather to day: for the sky is red and lowering. O ye hypocrites, ye can discern the face of the sky; but can ye not discern the signs of the times? 
A wicked and adulterous generation seeketh after a sign; and there shall no sign be given unto it, but the sign of the prophet Jonas. And he left them, and d
560,bring them against this land, and against the inhabitants thereof, and against all these nations round about, and will utterly destroy them, and make them an astonishment, and an hissing, and perpetual desolations. 
Moreover I will take from them the voice of mirth, and the voice of gladness, the voice of the bridegroom, and the voice of the bride, the sound of the millstones, and the light of the candle. 
And this whole land shall be a desolation, and an astonishment; and these nations shall serve the king of Babylon seventy years. 
And it shall come to
731, turned aside after lucre, and took bribes, and perverted judgment. 
Then all the elders of Israel gathered themselves together, and came to Samuel unto Ramah, 
And said unto him, Behold, thou art old, and thy sons walk not in thy ways: now make us a king to judge us like all the nations. 
But the thing displeased Samuel, when they said, Give us a king to judge us. And Samuel prayed unto the LORD. 
And the LORD said unto Samuel, Hearken unto the voice of the people in all that they say unto thee: for they have not rejected thee, but they have rejected me, that I should not reign over them. 
According to all the works which they have done since the day that I brought them up out of Egypt even unto this day, wherewith they 
744,f Charashim; for they were craftsmen. 
And the sons of Caleb the son of Jephunneh; Iru, Elah, and Naam: and the sons of Elah, even Kenaz. 
And the sons of Jehaleleel; Ziph, and Ziphah, Tiria, and Asareel. 
And the sons of Ezra were, Jether, and Mered, and Epher, and Jalon: and she bare Miriam, and Shammai, and Ishbah the father of Eshtemoa. 
And his wife Jehudijah bare Jered the father of Gedor, and Heber the father of Socho, and Jekuthiel the father of Zanoah. And these are the sons of Bithiah the daughter of Pharaoh, which Mered took. 
And the sons of his wife Hodiah the sister of Naham, the father of Keilah the Garmite, and Eshtemoa the Maachathite. 
And the sons of Shimon were, Amnon, and Rinnah, Benhanan, and Tilon. And the sons 
634,old a white horse; and he that sat upon him was called Faithful and True, and in righteousness he doth judge and make war. 
His eyes were as a flame of fire, and on his head were many crowns; and he had a name written, that no man knew, but he himself. 
And he was clothed with a vesture dipped in blood: and his name is called The Word of God. 
And the armies which were in heaven followed him upon white horses, clothed in fine linen, white and clean. 
And out of his mouth goeth a sharp sword, that with it he should smite the nations: and he shall rule them with a rod of iron: and he treadeth the winepress of the fierceness and 
838,ousand. 
And other ten thousand left alive did the children of Judah carry away captive, and brought them unto the top of the rock, and cast them down from the top of the rock, that they all were broken in pieces. 
But the soldiers of the army which Amaziah sent back, that they should not go with him to battle, fell upon the cities of Judah, from Samaria even unto Bethhoron, and smote three thousand of them, and took much spoil. 
Now it came to pass, after that Amaziah was come from the slaughter of the Edomites, that he brought the gods of the children of Seir, and set them up to be his gods, and bowed down himself before them, and burned incense unto them. 
Wherefore the anger of the LORD was kindled against Amaziah, and he sent unto him a prophet, which said unto him, Why hast thou sought after the gods of the people, which
715,and his people. 
But if ye will not hear these words, I swear by myself, saith the LORD, that this house shall become a desolation. 
For thus saith the LORD unto the king's house of Judah; Thou art Gilead unto me, and the head of Lebanon: yet surely I will make thee a wilderness, and cities which are not inhabited. 
And I will prepare destroyers against thee, every one with his weapons: and they shall cut down thy choice cedars, and cast them into the fire. 
And many nations shall pass by this city, and they shall say every man to his neighbour, Wherefore hath the LORD done thus unto this great city? 
Then they shall answer, Because they have forsaken the covenant of the LORD their God, and worshipped othe
729,heir burdens. 
This is the service of the families of the sons of Gershon in the tabernacle of the congregation: and their charge shall be under the hand of Ithamar the son of Aaron the priest. 
As for the sons of Merari, thou shalt number them after their families, by the house of their fathers; 
From thirty years old and upward even unto fifty years old shalt thou number them, every one that entereth into the service, to do the work of the tabernacle of the congregation. 
And this is the charge of their burden, according to all their service in the tabernacle of the congregation; the boards of the tabernacle, and the bars thereof, and the pillars thereof, and sockets thereof, 
And the pillars of the court round about,
628, the children of Judah, because they have shed innocent blood in their land. 
But Judah shall dwell for ever, and Jerusalem from generation to generation. 
For I will cleanse their blood that I have not cleansed: for the LORD dwelleth in Zion. 
The words of Amos, who was among the herdmen of Tekoa, which he saw concerning Israel in the days of Uzziah king of Judah, and in the days of Jeroboam the son of Joash king of Israel, two years before the earthquake. 
And he said, The LORD will roar from Zion, and utter his voice from Jerusalem; and the habitations of the shepherds shall mourn, and the top of Carmel shall wither. 
566,east, until the words of God shall be fulfilled. 
And the woman which thou sawest is that great city, which reigneth over the kings of the earth. 
And after these things I saw another angel come down from heaven, having great power; and the earth was lightened with his glory. 
And he cried mightily with a strong voice, saying, Babylon the great is fallen, is fallen, and is become the habitation of devils, and the hold of every foul spirit, and a cage of every unclean and hateful bird. 
For all nations have drunk of the wine of the wrath of her fornication, and
754,ed a vineyard, and set an hedge about it, and digged a place for the winefat, and built a tower, and let it out to husbandmen, and went into a far country. 
And at the season he sent to the husbandmen a servant, that he might receive from the husbandmen of the fruit of the vineyard. 
And they caught him, and beat him, and sent him away empty. 
And again he sent unto them another servant; and at him they cast stones, and wounded him in the head, and sent him away shamefully handled. 
And again he sent another; and him they killed, and many others; beating some, and killing some. 
Having yet therefore one son, his wellbeloved, he sent him also last unto them, saying, They will reverence my son. 
But those husbandmen said among themselves, This is
781,pake unto Philip, saying, Arise, and go toward the south unto the way that goeth down from Jerusalem unto Gaza, which is desert. 
And he arose and went: and, behold, a man of Ethiopia, an eunuch of great authority under Candace queen of the Ethiopians, who had the charge of all her treasure, and had come to Jerusalem for to worship, 
Was returning, and sitting in his chariot read Esaias the prophet. 
Then the Spirit said unto Philip, Go near, and join thyself to this chariot. 
And Philip ran thither to him, and heard him read the prophet Esaias, and said, Understandest thou what thou readest? 
And he said, How can I, except some man should guide me? And he desired Philip that he would come up and sit with him. 
The place of the scripture which he read was this, He was le
731, unto thy word shall all my people be ruled: only in the throne will I be greater than thou. 
And Pharaoh said unto Joseph, See, I have set thee over all the land of Egypt. 
And Pharaoh took off his ring from his hand, and put it upon Joseph's hand, and arrayed him in vestures of fine linen, and put a gold chain about his neck; 
And he made him to ride in the second chariot which he had; and they cried before him, Bow the knee: and he made him ruler over all the land of Egypt. 
And Pharaoh said unto Joseph, I am Pharaoh, and without thee shall no man lift up his hand or foot in all the land of Egypt. 
And Pharaoh called Joseph's name Zaphnathpaaneah; and he gave him to wife Asenath the daughter of Potipherah priest of On.
666,y thousand and three thousand and six hundred. 
And he set threescore and ten thousand of them to be bearers of burdens, and fourscore thousand to be hewers in the mountain, and three thousand and six hundred overseers to set the people a work. 
Then Solomon began to build the house of the LORD at Jerusalem in mount Moriah, where the Lord appeared unto David his father, in the place that David had prepared in the threshingfloor of Ornan the Jebusite. 
And he began to build in the second day of the second month, in the fourth year of his reign. 
Now these are the things wherein Solomon was instructed for the building of the house of God. The length by cubits 
835,, that ye have put me in prison? 
Where are now your prophets which prophesied unto you, saying, The king of Babylon shall not come against you, nor against this land? 
Therefore hear now, I pray thee, O my lord the king: let my supplication, I pray thee, be accepted before thee; that thou cause me not to return to the house of Jonathan the scribe, lest I die there. 
Then Zedekiah the king commanded that they should commit Jeremiah into the court of the prison, and that they should give him daily a piece of bread out of the bakers' street, until all the bread in the city were spent. Thus Jeremiah remained in the court of the prison. 
Then Shephatiah the son of Mattan, and Gedaliah the son of Pashur, and Jucal the son of Shelemiah, and Pashur the son of Malchiah, heard the words that Jeremiah had spoken unto all the people, 
745, ye came near unto me, even all the heads of your tribes, and your elders; 
And ye said, Behold, the LORD our God hath shewed us his glory and his greatness, and we have heard his voice out of the midst of the fire: we have seen this day that God doth talk with man, and he liveth. 
Now therefore why should we die? for this great fire will consume us: if we hear the voice of the LORD our God any more, then we shall die. 
For who is there of all flesh, that hath heard the voice of the living God speaking out of the midst of the fire, as we have, and lived? 
Go thou near, and hear all that the LORD our God shall say: and speak thou unto us all that the LORD our God shall speak unto thee; and we will hear it, and do it. 
And the LORD heard
646,f. 
Therefore said the disciples one to another, Hath any man brought him ought to eat? 
Jesus saith unto them, My meat is to do the will of him that sent me, and to finish his work. 
Say not ye, There are yet four months, and then cometh harvest? behold, I say unto you, Lift up your eyes, and look on the fields; for they are white already to harvest. 
And he that reapeth receiveth wages, and gathereth fruit unto life eternal: that both he that soweth and he that reapeth may rejoice together. 
And herein is that saying true, One soweth, and another reapeth. 
I sent you to reap that whereon ye bestowed no labour: other men laboured, and ye
813,ye shall be comforted in Jerusalem. 
And when ye see this, your heart shall rejoice, and your bones shall flourish like an herb: and the hand of the LORD shall be known toward his servants, and his indignation toward his enemies. 
For, behold, the LORD will come with fire, and with his chariots like a whirlwind, to render his anger with fury, and his rebuke with flames of fire. 
For by fire and by his sword will the LORD plead with all flesh: and the slain of the LORD shall be many. 
They that sanctify themselves, and purify themselves in the gardens behind one tree in the midst, eating swine's flesh, and the abomination, and the mouse, shall be consumed together, saith the LORD. 
For I know their works and their thoughts: it shall come, that I will gather all nations and tongues; and they shall come, 
702,st two pillars of brass, of eighteen cubits high apiece: and a line of twelve cubits did compass either of them about. 
And he made two chapiters of molten brass, to set upon the tops of the pillars: the height of the one chapiter was five cubits, and the height of the other chapiter was five cubits: 
And nets of checker work, and wreaths of chain work, for the chapiters which were upon the top of the pillars; seven for the one chapiter, and seven for the other chapiter. 
And he made the pillars, and two rows round about upon the one network, to cover the chapiters that were upon the top, with pomegranates: and so did he for the other chapiter. 
And the chapiters that were upon the top of the 
783,wilt not thou, O God, go forth with our hosts? 
Give us help from trouble: for vain is the help of man. 
Through God we shall do valiantly: for he it is that shall tread down our enemies. 
Hold not thy peace, O God of my praise; 
For the mouth of the wicked and the mouth of the deceitful are opened against me: they have spoken against me with a lying tongue. 
They compassed me about also with words of hatred; and fought against me without a cause. 
For my love they are my adversaries: but I give myself unto prayer. 
And they have rewarded me evil for good, and hatred for my love. 
Set thou a wicked man over him: and let Satan stand at his right hand. 
When he shall be judged, let him be condemned: and let his prayer become sin. 
Let his days be few; and let another take hi
840, of Keilah deliver me and my men into the hand of Saul? And the LORD said, They will deliver thee up. 
Then David and his men, which were about six hundred, arose and departed out of Keilah, and went whithersoever they could go. And it was told Saul that David was escaped from Keilah; and he forbare to go forth. 
And David abode in the wilderness in strong holds, and remained in a mountain in the wilderness of Ziph. And Saul sought him every day, but God delivered him not into his hand. 
And David saw that Saul was come out to seek his life: and David was in the wilderness of Ziph in a wood. 
And Jonathan Saul's son arose, and went to David into the wood, and strengthened his hand in God. 
And he said unto him, Fear not: for the hand of Saul my father shall not find thee; and thou shalt be king over Israel, and I shall be next u
675,em; but they shall dwell safely, and none shall make them afraid. 
And I will raise up for them a plant of renown, and they shall be no more consumed with hunger in the land, neither bear the shame of the heathen any more. 
Thus shall they know that I the LORD their God am with them, and that they, even the house of Israel, are my people, saith the Lord GOD. 
And ye my flock, the flock of my pasture, are men, and I am your God, saith the Lord GOD. 
Moreover the word of the LORD came unto me, saying, 
Son of man, set thy face against mount Seir, and prophesy against it, 
And say unto it, Thus saith the Lord GOD; Behold, O mount Seir, I am against thee, and I will stre
830,gh hath visited us, 
To give light to them that sit in darkness and in the shadow of death, to guide our feet into the way of peace. 
And the child grew, and waxed strong in spirit, and was in the deserts till the day of his shewing unto Israel. 
And it came to pass in those days, that there went out a decree from Caesar Augustus that all the world should be taxed. 
(And this taxing was first made when Cyrenius was governor of Syria.) 
And all went to be taxed, every one into his own city. 
And Joseph also went up from Galilee, out of the city of Nazareth, into Judaea, unto the city of David, which is called Bethlehem; (because he was of the house and lineage of David:) 
To be taxed with Mary his espoused wife, being great with child. 
And so it was, that, while they were there, the days were accomplished that she shou
757,persed through the countries: according to their way and according to their doings I judged them. 
And when they entered unto the heathen, whither they went, they profaned my holy name, when they said to them, These are the people of the LORD, and are gone forth out of his land. 
But I had pity for mine holy name, which the house of Israel had profaned among the heathen, whither they went. 
Therefore say unto the house of Israel, thus saith the Lord GOD; I do not this for your sakes, O house of Israel, but for mine holy name's sake, which ye have profaned among the heathen, whither ye went. 
And I will sanctify my great name, which was profaned among the heathen, which ye have profaned in the midst of them; and the heathen shall know that I am the
731,er of thy days I will fulfil. 
I will send my fear before thee, and will destroy all the people to whom thou shalt come, and I will make all thine enemies turn their backs unto thee. 
And I will send hornets before thee, which shall drive out the Hivite, the Canaanite, and the Hittite, from before thee. 
I will not drive them out from before thee in one year; lest the land become desolate, and the beast of the field multiply against thee. 
By little and little I will drive them out from before thee, until thou be increased, and inherit the land. 
And I will set thy bounds from the Red sea even unto the sea of the Philistines, and from the desert unto the river: for I will deliver the inhabitants of the land into your hand
586,but thou broughtest us out into a wealthy place. 
I will go into thy house with burnt offerings: I will pay thee my vows, 
Which my lips have uttered, and my mouth hath spoken, when I was in trouble. 
I will offer unto thee burnt sacrifices of fatlings, with the incense of rams; I will offer bullocks with goats. Selah. 
Come and hear, all ye that fear God, and I will declare what he hath done for my soul. 
I cried unto him with my mouth, and he was extolled with my tongue. 
If I regard iniquity in my heart, the Lord will not hear me: 
But verily God hath heard me; he hath attende
802,hy people shall exalt themselves to establish the vision; but they shall fall. 
So the king of the north shall come, and cast up a mount, and take the most fenced cities: and the arms of the south shall not withstand, neither his chosen people, neither shall there be any strength to withstand. 
But he that cometh against him shall do according to his own will, and none shall stand before him: and he shall stand in the glorious land, which by his hand shall be consumed. 
He shall also set his face to enter with the strength of his whole kingdom, and upright ones with him; thus shall he do: and he shall give him the daughter of women, corrupting her: but she shall not stand on his side, neither be for him. 
After this shall he turn his face unto the isles, and shall take many: but a prince for
632,
And as David came to Ornan, Ornan looked and saw David, and went out of the threshingfloor, and bowed himself to David with his face to the ground. 
Then David said to Ornan, Grant me the place of this threshingfloor, that I may build an altar therein unto the LORD: thou shalt grant it me for the full price: that the plague may be stayed from the people. 
And Ornan said unto David, Take it to thee, and let my lord the king do that which is good in his eyes: lo, I give thee the oxen also for burnt offerings, and the threshing instruments for wood, and the wheat for the meat offering; I give it all. 
And king David said to Or
717,s day unto the house of Saul thy father, to his brethren, and to his friends, and have not delivered thee into the hand of David, that thou chargest me to day with a fault concerning this woman? 
So do God to Abner, and more also, except, as the LORD hath sworn to David, even so I do to him; 
To translate the kingdom from the house of Saul, and to set up the throne of David over Israel and over Judah, from Dan even to Beersheba. 
And he could not answer Abner a word again, because he feared him. 
And Abner sent messengers to David on his behalf, saying, Whose is the land? saying also, Make thy league with me, and, behold, my hand shall be with thee, to bring about all Israel unto thee. 
And he said, Well; I 
767,d into his bosom again; and plucked it out of his bosom, and, behold, it was turned again as his other flesh. 
And it shall come to pass, if they will not believe thee, neither hearken to the voice of the first sign, that they will believe the voice of the latter sign. 
And it shall come to pass, if they will not believe also these two signs, neither hearken unto thy voice, that thou shalt take of the water of the river, and pour it upon the dry land: and the water which thou takest out of the river shall become blood upon the dry land. 
And Moses said unto the LORD, O my LORD, I am not eloquent, neither heretofore, nor since thou hast spoken unto thy servant: but I am slow of speech, and of a slow tongue. 
And the LORD said unto him, Who hath made man's mo
707, created he them. 
And God blessed them, and God said unto them, Be fruitful, and multiply, and replenish the earth, and subdue it: and have dominion over the fish of the sea, and over the fowl of the air, and over every living thing that moveth upon the earth. 
And God said, Behold, I have given you every herb bearing seed, which is upon the face of all the earth, and every tree, in the which is the fruit of a tree yielding seed; to you it shall be for meat. 
And to every beast of the earth, and to every fowl of the air, and to every thing that creepeth upon the earth, wherein there is life, I have given every green herb for meat: and it was so. 
And God saw every thing that he had made, and, beho
648,ts, the God of Israel; Jonadab the son of Rechab shall not want a man to stand before me for ever. 
And it came to pass in the fourth year of Jehoiakim the son of Josiah king of Judah, that this word came unto Jeremiah from the LORD, saying, 
Take thee a roll of a book, and write therein all the words that I have spoken unto thee against Israel, and against Judah, and against all the nations, from the day I spake unto thee, from the days of Josiah, even unto this day. 
It may be that the house of Judah will hear all the evil which I purpose to do unto them; that they may return every man from his evil way; that I may forgive their iniquity 
699,uaries of the LORD's house. 
Wherefore, behold, the days come, saith the LORD, that I will do judgment upon her graven images: and through all her land the wounded shall groan. 
Though Babylon should mount up to heaven, and though she should fortify the height of her strength, yet from me shall spoilers come unto her, saith the LORD. 
A sound of a cry cometh from Babylon, and great destruction from the land of the Chaldeans: 
Because the LORD hath spoiled Babylon, and destroyed out of her the great voice; when her waves do roar like great waters, a noise of their voice is uttered: 
Because the spoiler is come upon her, even upon Babylon, and her mighty men are taken, every one of their bows
735,one troop, and stood on the top of an hill. 
Then Abner called to Joab, and said, Shall the sword devour for ever? knowest thou not that it will be bitterness in the latter end? how long shall it be then, ere thou bid the people return from following their brethren? 
And Joab said, As God liveth, unless thou hadst spoken, surely then in the morning the people had gone up every one from following his brother. 
So Joab blew a trumpet, and all the people stood still, and pursued after Israel no more, neither fought they any more. 
And Abner and his men walked all that night through the plain, and passed over Jordan, and went through all Bithron, and they came to Mahanaim. 
And Joab returned from following Abner: and when he had 
584,Juda, 
Which was the son of Joanna, which was the son of Rhesa, which was the son of Zorobabel, which was the son of Salathiel, which was the son of Neri, 
Which was the son of Melchi, which was the son of Addi, which was the son of Cosam, which was the son of Elmodam, which was the son of Er, 
Which was the son of Jose, which was the son of Eliezer, which was the son of Jorim, which was the son of Matthat, which was the son of Levi, 
Which was the son of Simeon, which was the son of Juda, which was the son of Joseph, which was the son of Jonan, which was the son of Eliakim, 
W
741,when the Philistines saw their champion was dead, they fled. 
And the men of Israel and of Judah arose, and shouted, and pursued the Philistines, until thou come to the valley, and to the gates of Ekron. And the wounded of the Philistines fell down by the way to Shaaraim, even unto Gath, and unto Ekron. 
And the children of Israel returned from chasing after the Philistines, and they spoiled their tents. 
And David took the head of the Philistine, and brought it to Jerusalem; but he put his armour in his tent. 
And when Saul saw David go forth against the Philistine, he said unto Abner, the captain of the host, Abner, whose son is this youth? And Abner said, As thy soul liveth, O king, I cannot tell. 
And the king said, Enquire tho
739,gdom also; for he is mine elder brother; even for him, and for Abiathar the priest, and for Joab the son of Zeruiah. 
Then king Solomon sware by the LORD, saying, God do so to me, and more also, if Adonijah have not spoken this word against his own life. 
Now therefore, as the LORD liveth, which hath established me, and set me on the throne of David my father, and who hath made me an house, as he promised, Adonijah shall be put to death this day. 
And king Solomon sent by the hand of Benaiah the son of Jehoiada; and he fell upon him that he died. 
And unto Abiathar the priest said the king, Get thee to Anathoth, unto thine own fields; for thou art worthy of death: but I will not at this time put thee to death, because thou barest
702,of the valley, and they that were on the other side Jordan, saw that the men of Israel fled, and that Saul and his sons were dead, they forsook the cities, and fled; and the Philistines came and dwelt in them. 
And it came to pass on the morrow, when the Philistines came to strip the slain, that they found Saul and his three sons fallen in mount Gilboa. 
And they cut off his head, and stripped off his armour, and sent into the land of the Philistines round about, to publish it in the house of their idols, and among the people. 
And they put his armour in the house of Ashtaroth: and they fastened his body to the wall of Bethshan. 
And when the inhabitants of Jabeshgilead heard of that which the
703,what saddle soever he rideth upon that hath the issue shall be unclean. 
And whosoever toucheth any thing that was under him shall be unclean until the even: and he that beareth any of those things shall wash his clothes, and bathe himself in water, and be unclean until the even. 
And whomsoever he toucheth that hath the issue, and hath not rinsed his hands in water, he shall wash his clothes, and bathe himself in water, and be unclean until the even. 
And the vessel of earth, that he toucheth which hath the issue, shall be broken: and every vessel of wood shall be rinsed in water. 
And when he that hath an issue is cleansed of his issue; then he shall number to himself seven days for his clean
787, the anger and the fury that the LORD hath pronounced against this people. 
And Baruch the son of Neriah did according to all that Jeremiah the prophet commanded him, reading in the book the words of the LORD in the LORD's house. 
And it came to pass in the fifth year of Jehoiakim the son of Josiah king of Judah, in the ninth month, that they proclaimed a fast before the LORD to all the people in Jerusalem, and to all the people that came from the cities of Judah unto Jerusalem. 
Then read Baruch in the book the words of Jeremiah in the house of the LORD, in the chamber of Gemariah the son of Shaphan the scribe, in the higher court, at the entry of the new gate of the LORD's house, in the ears of all the people. 
When Michaiah the son of Gemariah, the son of Shaphan, had heard
788,s hastened Lot, saying, Arise, take thy wife, and thy two daughters, which are here; lest thou be consumed in the iniquity of the city. 
And while he lingered, the men laid hold upon his hand, and upon the hand of his wife, and upon the hand of his two daughters; the LORD being merciful unto him: and they brought him forth, and set him without the city. 
And it came to pass, when they had brought them forth abroad, that he said, Escape for thy life; look not behind thee, neither stay thou in all the plain; escape to the mountain, lest thou be consumed. 
And Lot said unto them, Oh, not so, my LORD: 
Behold now, thy servant hath found grace in thy sight, and thou hast magnified thy mercy, which thou hast shewed unto me in saving my life; and I cannot escape to the mountain, lest 
643,b: 
The blessings of thy father have prevailed above the blessings of my progenitors unto the utmost bound of the everlasting hills: they shall be on the head of Joseph, and on the crown of the head of him that was separate from his brethren. 
Benjamin shall ravin as a wolf: in the morning he shall devour the prey, and at night he shall divide the spoil. 
All these are the twelve tribes of Israel: and this is it that their father spake unto them, and blessed them; every one according to his blessing he blessed them. 
And he charged them, and said unto them, I am to be gathered unto my people: bury me with my fathers in the cave that is
587,endeavours: give them after the work of their hands; render to them their desert. 
Because they regard not the works of the LORD, nor the operation of his hands, he shall destroy them, and not build them up. 
Blessed be the LORD, because he hath heard the voice of my supplications. 
The LORD is my strength and my shield; my heart trusted in him, and I am helped: therefore my heart greatly rejoiceth; and with my song will I praise him. 
The LORD is their strength, and he is the saving strength of his anointed. 
Save thy people, and bless thine inheritance: feed them also, and lift 
565, matters of the law, judgment, mercy, and faith: these ought ye to have done, and not to leave the other undone. 
Ye blind guides, which strain at a gnat, and swallow a camel. 
Woe unto you, scribes and Pharisees, hypocrites! for ye make clean the outside of the cup and of the platter, but within they are full of extortion and excess. 
Thou blind Pharisee, cleanse first that which is within the cup and platter, that the outside of them may be clean also. 
Woe unto you, scribes and Pharisees, hypocrites! for ye are like unto whited sepulchres, which indeed app
735,like a flock. 
And he led them on safely, so that they feared not: but the sea overwhelmed their enemies. 
And he brought them to the border of his sanctuary, even to this mountain, which his right hand had purchased. 
He cast out the heathen also before them, and divided them an inheritance by line, and made the tribes of Israel to dwell in their tents. 
Yet they tempted and provoked the most high God, and kept not his testimonies: 
But turned back, and dealt unfaithfully like their fathers: they were turned aside like a deceitful bow. 
For they provoked him to anger with their high places, and moved him to jealousy with their graven images. 
When God heard this, he was wroth, and greatly abhorred Israel: 
So that he forsook
579, surely rend the kingdom from thee, and will give it to thy servant. 
Notwithstanding in thy days I will not do it for David thy father's sake: but I will rend it out of the hand of thy son. 
Howbeit I will not rend away all the kingdom; but will give one tribe to thy son for David my servant's sake, and for Jerusalem's sake which I have chosen. 
And the LORD stirred up an adversary unto Solomon, Hadad the Edomite: he was of the king's seed in Edom. 
For it came to pass, when David was in Edom, and Joab the captain of the host was gone up to bury the slain, after he had sm
727,: but his father called him Benjamin. 
And Rachel died, and was buried in the way to Ephrath, which is Bethlehem. 
And Jacob set a pillar upon her grave: that is the pillar of Rachel's grave unto this day. 
And Israel journeyed, and spread his tent beyond the tower of Edar. 
And it came to pass, when Israel dwelt in that land, that Reuben went and lay with Bilhah his father's concubine: and Israel heard it. Now the sons of Jacob were twelve: 
The sons of Leah; Reuben, Jacob's firstborn, and Simeon, and Levi, and Judah, and Issachar, and Zebulun: 
The sons of Rachel; Joseph, and Benjamin: 
And the sons of Bilhah, Rachel's handmaid; Dan, and Naphtali: 
And the sons of Zilpah, Leah's handmaid: Gad, and Asher: these are t
677,: behold, the Lion of the tribe of Juda, the Root of David, hath prevailed to open the book, and to loose the seven seals thereof. 
And I beheld, and, lo, in the midst of the throne and of the four beasts, and in the midst of the elders, stood a Lamb as it had been slain, having seven horns and seven eyes, which are the seven Spirits of God sent forth into all the earth. 
And he came and took the book out of the right hand of him that sat upon the throne. 
And when he had taken the book, the four beasts and four and twenty elders fell down before the Lamb, having every one of them harps, and golden vials full of odours, which are the prayers of saints. 
And they sung a
693, give him shall never thirst; but the water that I shall give him shall be in him a well of water springing up into everlasting life. 
The woman saith unto him, Sir, give me this water, that I thirst not, neither come hither to draw. 
Jesus saith unto her, Go, call thy husband, and come hither. 
The woman answered and said, I have no husband. Jesus said unto her, Thou hast well said, I have no husband: 
For thou hast had five husbands; and he whom thou now hast is not thy husband: in that saidst thou truly. 
The woman saith unto him, Sir, I perceive that thou art a prophet. 
Our fathers worshipped in this mountain; and ye say, that in Jerusalem is the place where men ought to worship.
832,ribe: and Zadok and Abiathar were the priests: 
And Ira also the Jairite was a chief ruler about David. 
Then there was a famine in the days of David three years, year after year; and David enquired of the LORD. And the LORD answered, It is for Saul, and for his bloody house, because he slew the Gibeonites. 
And the king called the Gibeonites, and said unto them; (now the Gibeonites were not of the children of Israel, but of the remnant of the Amorites; and the children of Israel had sworn unto them: and Saul sought to slay them in his zeal to the children of Israel and Judah.) 
Wherefore David said unto the Gibeonites, What shall I do for you? and wherewith shall I make the atonement, that ye may bless the inheritance of the LORD? 
And the Gibeonites said unto him, We will have no silver nor gold of Saul, nor of his hou
812,e four thousand and five hundred, and the south side four thousand and five hundred, and on the east side four thousand and five hundred, and the west side four thousand and five hundred. 
And the suburbs of the city shall be toward the north two hundred and fifty, and toward the south two hundred and fifty, and toward the east two hundred and fifty, and toward the west two hundred and fifty. 
And the residue in length over against the oblation of the holy portion shall be ten thousand eastward, and ten thousand westward: and it shall be over against the oblation of the holy portion; and the increase thereof shall be for food unto them that serve the city. 
And they that serve the city shall serve it out of all the tribes of Israel. 
All the oblation shall be five and twenty thousand by five and twent
705,ther, and his sons with him; and shalt anoint them, and consecrate them, and sanctify them, that they may minister unto me in the priest's office. 
And thou shalt make them linen breeches to cover their nakedness; from the loins even unto the thighs they shall reach: 
And they shall be upon Aaron, and upon his sons, when they come in unto the tabernacle of the congregation, or when they come near unto the altar to minister in the holy place; that they bear not iniquity, and die: it shall be a statute for ever unto him and his seed after him. 
And this is the thing that thou shalt do unto them to hallow them, to minister unto me in the priest's office: Take one young bullock, and two rams without 
590, righteous in judgment. 
A fool's lips enter into contention, and his mouth calleth for strokes. 
A fool's mouth is his destruction, and his lips are the snare of his soul. 
The words of a talebearer are as wounds, and they go down into the innermost parts of the belly. 
He also that is slothful in his work is brother to him that is a great waster. 
The name of the LORD is a strong tower: the righteous runneth into it, and is safe. 
The rich man's wealth is his strong city, and as an high wall in his own conceit. 
Before destruction the heart of man is haughty, and before honour is h
563, 
For the kingdom of heaven is like unto a man that is an householder, which went out early in the morning to hire labourers into his vineyard. 
And when he had agreed with the labourers for a penny a day, he sent them into his vineyard. 
And he went out about the third hour, and saw others standing idle in the marketplace, 
And said unto them; Go ye also into the vineyard, and whatsoever is right I will give you. And they went their way. 
Again he went out about the sixth and ninth hour, and did likewise. 
And about the eleventh hour he went out, and found
748,o death; and his deadly wound was healed: and all the world wondered after the beast. 
And they worshipped the dragon which gave power unto the beast: and they worshipped the beast, saying, Who is like unto the beast? who is able to make war with him? 
And there was given unto him a mouth speaking great things and blasphemies; and power was given unto him to continue forty and two months. 
And he opened his mouth in blasphemy against God, to blaspheme his name, and his tabernacle, and them that dwell in heaven. 
And it was given unto him to make war with the saints, and to overcome them: and power was given him over all kindreds, and tongues, and nations. 
And all that dwell upon the earth shall worship him, whose names are not written in
732,ed upon the housetops. 
And I say unto you my friends, Be not afraid of them that kill the body, and after that have no more that they can do. 
But I will forewarn you whom ye shall fear: Fear him, which after he hath killed hath power to cast into hell; yea, I say unto you, Fear him. 
Are not five sparrows sold for two farthings, and not one of them is forgotten before God? 
But even the very hairs of your head are all numbered. Fear not therefore: ye are of more value than many sparrows. 
Also I say unto you, Whosoever shall confess me before men, him shall the Son of man also confess before the angels of God: 
But he that denieth me before men shall be denied before the angels of God. 
And whosoever shall speak a word a
728,aded, and a soft tongue breaketh the bone. 
Hast thou found honey? eat so much as is sufficient for thee, lest thou be filled therewith, and vomit it. 
Withdraw thy foot from thy neighbour's house; lest he be weary of thee, and so hate thee. 
A man that beareth false witness against his neighbour is a maul, and a sword, and a sharp arrow. 
Confidence in an unfaithful man in time of trouble is like a broken tooth, and a foot out of joint. 
As he that taketh away a garment in cold weather, and as vinegar upon nitre, so is he that singeth songs to an heavy heart. 
If thine enemy be hungry, give him bread to eat; and if he be thirsty, give him water to drink: 
For thou shalt heap coals of fire upon his head, and the LORD s
726, there went a man of the house of Levi, and took to wife a daughter of Levi. 
And the woman conceived, and bare a son: and when she saw him that he was a goodly child, she hid him three months. 
And when she could not longer hide him, she took for him an ark of bulrushes, and daubed it with slime and with pitch, and put the child therein; and she laid it in the flags by the river's brink. 
And his sister stood afar off, to wit what would be done to him. 
And the daughter of Pharaoh came down to wash herself at the river; and her maidens walked along by the river's side; and when she saw the ark among the flags, she sent her maid to fetch it. 
And when she had opened it, she saw the child: and, behold, the babe wept. 
813,kingdom. 
Thou hast loved righteousness, and hated iniquity; therefore God, even thy God, hath anointed thee with the oil of gladness above thy fellows. 
And, Thou, Lord, in the beginning hast laid the foundation of the earth; and the heavens are the works of thine hands: 
They shall perish; but thou remainest; and they all shall wax old as doth a garment; 
And as a vesture shalt thou fold them up, and they shall be changed: but thou art the same, and thy years shall not fail. 
But to which of the angels said he at any time, Sit on my right hand, until I make thine enemies thy footstool? 
Are they not all ministering spirits, sent forth to minister for them who shall be heirs of salvation? 
Therefore we ought to give the more earnest heed to the things which we have heard, lest at any time we should le
781,e obtained kindness of him; and he speedily gave her her things for purification, with such things as belonged to her, and seven maidens, which were meet to be given her, out of the king's house: and he preferred her and her maids unto the best place of the house of the women. 
Esther had not shewed her people nor her kindred: for Mordecai had charged her that she should not shew it. 
And Mordecai walked every day before the court of the women's house, to know how Esther did, and what should become of her. 
Now when every maid's turn was come to go in to king Ahasuerus, after that she had been twelve months, according to the manner of the women, (for so were the days of their purifications accomplished, to wit, six months with oil of myrrh, and six months with sweet odou
787,y statutes, and hath kept my judgments, to deal truly; he is just, he shall surely live, saith the Lord GOD. 
If he beget a son that is a robber, a shedder of blood, and that doeth the like to any one of these things, 
And that doeth not any of those duties, but even hath eaten upon the mountains, and defiled his neighbour's wife, 
Hath oppressed the poor and needy, hath spoiled by violence, hath not restored the pledge, and hath lifted up his eyes to the idols, hath committed abomination, 
Hath given forth upon usury, and hath taken increase: shall he then live? he shall not live: he hath done all these abominations; he shall surely die; his blood shall be upon him. 
Now, lo, if he beget a son, that seeth all his father's sins which he hath done, and considereth, and doeth no
749,ver unto thee, and they shall be thine: they shall come after thee; in chains they shall come over, and they shall fall down unto thee, they shall make supplication unto thee, saying, Surely God is in thee; and there is none else, there is no God. 
Verily thou art a God that hidest thyself, O God of Israel, the Saviour. 
They shall be ashamed, and also confounded, all of them: they shall go to confusion together that are makers of idols. 
But Israel shall be saved in the LORD with an everlasting salvation: ye shall not be ashamed nor confounded world without end. 
For thus saith the LORD that created the heavens; God himself that formed the earth and made it; he hath established it, he created it not in vain, he formed it to be inhabited: 
591,w therefore, and I will send thee unto Pharaoh, that thou mayest bring forth my people the children of Israel out of Egypt. 
And Moses said unto God, Who am I, that I should go unto Pharaoh, and that I should bring forth the children of Israel out of Egypt? 
And he said, Certainly I will be with thee; and this shall be a token unto thee, that I have sent thee: When thou hast brought forth the people out of Egypt, ye shall serve God upon this mountain. 
And Moses said unto God, Behold, when I come unto the children of Israel, and shall say unto them, The God of your fathers hath sent m
663,offer my bread, the fat and the blood, and they have broken my covenant because of all your abominations. 
And ye have not kept the charge of mine holy things: but ye have set keepers of my charge in my sanctuary for yourselves. 
Thus saith the Lord GOD; No stranger, uncircumcised in heart, nor uncircumcised in flesh, shall enter into my sanctuary, of any stranger that is among the children of Israel. 
And the Levites that are gone away far from me, when Israel went astray, which went astray away from me after their idols; they shall even bear their iniquity. 
Yet they shall be ministers in my sanctuary, having charge at the gates of the house, and minist
596,o escape: incline thine ear unto me, and save me. 
Be thou my strong habitation, whereunto I may continually resort: thou hast given commandment to save me; for thou art my rock and my fortress. 
Deliver me, O my God, out of the hand of the wicked, out of the hand of the unrighteous and cruel man. 
For thou art my hope, O Lord GOD: thou art my trust from my youth. 
By thee have I been holden up from the womb: thou art he that took me out of my mother's bowels: my praise shall be continually of thee. 
I am as a wonder unto many; but thou art my strong refuge. 
Let my mouth be filled with th
565,d kingdom against kingdom. 
And the spirit of Egypt shall fail in the midst thereof; and I will destroy the counsel thereof: and they shall seek to the idols, and to the charmers, and to them that have familiar spirits, and to the wizards. 
And the Egyptians will I give over into the hand of a cruel lord; and a fierce king shall rule over them, saith the Lord, the LORD of hosts. 
And the waters shall fail from the sea, and the river shall be wasted and dried up. 
And they shall turn the rivers far away; and the brooks of defence shall be emptied and dried up:
792,ly kiss. The churches of Christ salute you. 
Now I beseech you, brethren, mark them which cause divisions and offences contrary to the doctrine which ye have learned; and avoid them. 
For they that are such serve not our Lord Jesus Christ, but their own belly; and by good words and fair speeches deceive the hearts of the simple. 
For your obedience is come abroad unto all men. I am glad therefore on your behalf: but yet I would have you wise unto that which is good, and simple concerning evil. 
And the God of peace shall bruise Satan under your feet shortly. The grace of our Lord Jesus Christ be with you. Amen. 
Timotheus my workfellow, and Lucius, and Jason, and Sosipater, my kinsmen, salute you. 
I Tertius, who wrote this epistle, salute you in the Lord. 
Gaius mine host, and of 
683, the day that Moses sent me: as my strength was then, even so is my strength now, for war, both to go out, and to come in. 
Now therefore give me this mountain, whereof the LORD spake in that day; for thou heardest in that day how the Anakims were there, and that the cities were great and fenced: if so be the LORD will be with me, then I shall be able to drive them out, as the LORD said. 
And Joshua blessed him, and gave unto Caleb the son of Jephunneh Hebron for an inheritance. 
Hebron therefore became the inheritance of Caleb the son of Jephunneh the Kenezite unto this day, because that he wholly followed the LORD God of Israel. 
And the name of Hebron before was Kirjathar
682,the cherubims lifted up their wings, and mounted up from the earth in my sight: when they went out, the wheels also were beside them, and every one stood at the door of the east gate of the LORD's house; and the glory of the God of Israel was over them above. 
This is the living creature that I saw under the God of Israel by the river of Chebar; and I knew that they were the cherubims. 
Every one had four faces apiece, and every one four wings; and the likeness of the hands of a man was under their wings. 
And the likeness of their faces was the same faces which I saw by the river of Chebar, their appearances and themselves: they went every one straight forward. 
Moreover t
838,s are desolate; I made their streets waste, that none passeth by: their cities are destroyed, so that there is no man, that there is none inhabitant. 
I said, Surely thou wilt fear me, thou wilt receive instruction; so their dwelling should not be cut off, howsoever I punished them: but they rose early, and corrupted all their doings. 
Therefore wait ye upon me, saith the LORD, until the day that I rise up to the prey: for my determination is to gather the nations, that I may assemble the kingdoms, to pour upon them mine indignation, even all my fierce anger: for all the earth shall be devoured with the fire of my jealousy. 
For then will I turn to the people a pure language, that they may all call upon the name of the LORD, to serve him with one consent. 
From beyond the rivers of Ethiopia my suppliants, even the daughter of 
759,phets thereof divine for money: yet will they lean upon the LORD, and say, Is not the LORD among us? none evil can come upon us. 
Therefore shall Zion for your sake be plowed as a field, and Jerusalem shall become heaps, and the mountain of the house as the high places of the forest. 
But in the last days it shall come to pass, that the mountain of the house of the LORD shall be established in the top of the mountains, and it shall be exalted above the hills; and people shall flow unto it. 
And many nations shall come, and say, Come, and let us go up to the mountain of the LORD, and to the house of the God of Jacob; and he will teach us of his ways, and we will walk in his paths: for the law shall go forth of Zion, and the word of the LORD from Jeru
690,you, that ye sin not. And if any man sin, we have an advocate with the Father, Jesus Christ the righteous: 
And he is the propitiation for our sins: and not for our's only, but also for the sins of the whole world. 
And hereby we do know that we know him, if we keep his commandments. 
He that saith, I know him, and keepeth not his commandments, is a liar, and the truth is not in him. 
But whoso keepeth his word, in him verily is the love of God perfected: hereby know we that we are in him. 
He that saith he abideth in him ought himself also so to walk, even as he walked. 
Brethren, I write no new commandment unto you, but an old commandment which ye had from the beginning. The old 
826,e first day shall be an holy convocation: ye shall do no servile work therein. 
Seven days ye shall offer an offering made by fire unto the LORD: on the eighth day shall be an holy convocation unto you; and ye shall offer an offering made by fire unto the LORD: it is a solemn assembly; and ye shall do no servile work therein. 
These are the feasts of the LORD, which ye shall proclaim to be holy convocations, to offer an offering made by fire unto the LORD, a burnt offering, and a meat offering, a sacrifice, and drink offerings, every thing upon his day: 
Beside the sabbaths of the LORD, and beside your gifts, and beside all your vows, and beside all your freewill offerings, which ye give unto the LORD. 
Also in the fifteenth day of the seventh month, when ye have gathered in the fruit of the land, ye shall keep a f
806,I should be exalted above measure through the abundance of the revelations, there was given to me a thorn in the flesh, the messenger of Satan to buffet me, lest I should be exalted above measure. 
For this thing I besought the Lord thrice, that it might depart from me. 
And he said unto me, My grace is sufficient for thee: for my strength is made perfect in weakness. Most gladly therefore will I rather glory in my infirmities, that the power of Christ may rest upon me. 
Therefore I take pleasure in infirmities, in reproaches, in necessities, in persecutions, in distresses for Christ's sake: for when I am weak, then am I strong. 
I am become a fool in glorying; ye have compelled me: for I ought to have been commended of you: for in nothing am I behind the very chiefest apostles, though I be noth
589,r in vain that build it: except the LORD keep the city, the watchman waketh but in vain. 
It is vain for you to rise up early, to sit up late, to eat the bread of sorrows: for so he giveth his beloved sleep. 
Lo, children are an heritage of the LORD: and the fruit of the womb is his reward. 
As arrows are in the hand of a mighty man; so are children of the youth. 
Happy is the man that hath his quiver full of them: they shall not be ashamed, but they shall speak with the enemies in the gate. 
Blessed is every one that feareth the LORD; that walketh in his ways. 
For thou shalt eat t
788,o more oppress. 
In the LORD put I my trust: how say ye to my soul, Flee as a bird to your mountain? 
For, lo, the wicked bend their bow, they make ready their arrow upon the string, that they may privily shoot at the upright in heart. 
If the foundations be destroyed, what can the righteous do? 
The LORD is in his holy temple, the LORD's throne is in heaven: his eyes behold, his eyelids try, the children of men. 
The LORD trieth the righteous: but the wicked and him that loveth violence his soul hateth. 
Upon the wicked he shall rain snares, fire and brimstone, and an horrible tempest: this shall be the portion of their cup. 
For the righteous LORD loveth righteousness; his countenance doth behold the upright. 
Help, LORD; for the godly man ceaseth; for the faithful fail from 
670,welve men: each one was for the house of his fathers. 
So were all those that were numbered of the children of Israel, by the house of their fathers, from twenty years old and upward, all that were able to go forth to war in Israel; 
Even all they that were numbered were six hundred thousand and three thousand and five hundred and fifty. 
But the Levites after the tribe of their fathers were not numbered among them. 
For the LORD had spoken unto Moses, saying, 
Only thou shalt not number the tribe of Levi, neither take the sum of them among the children of Israel: 
But thou shalt appoint the Levites over the tabernacle of testimony, and over all the vessels ther
771,servants and maidens, and had servants born in my house; also I had great possessions of great and small cattle above all that were in Jerusalem before me: 
I gathered me also silver and gold, and the peculiar treasure of kings and of the provinces: I gat me men singers and women singers, and the delights of the sons of men, as musical instruments, and that of all sorts. 
So I was great, and increased more than all that were before me in Jerusalem: also my wisdom remained with me. 
And whatsoever mine eyes desired I kept not from them, I withheld not my heart from any joy; for my heart rejoiced in all my labour: and this was my portion of all my labour. 
Then I looked on all the works that my hands had wrought, and on the labour that I had laboured to do: and, 
563,ar: and the liers in wait of Israel came forth out of their places, even out of the meadows of Gibeah. 
And there came against Gibeah ten thousand chosen men out of all Israel, and the battle was sore: but they knew not that evil was near them. 
And the LORD smote Benjamin before Israel: and the children of Israel destroyed of the Benjamites that day twenty and five thousand and an hundred men: all these drew the sword. 
So the children of Benjamin saw that they were smitten: for the men of Israel gave place to the Benjamites, because they trusted unto the 
831,rds of the law. 
And they found written in the law which the LORD had commanded by Moses, that the children of Israel should dwell in booths in the feast of the seventh month: 
And that they should publish and proclaim in all their cities, and in Jerusalem, saying, Go forth unto the mount, and fetch olive branches, and pine branches, and myrtle branches, and palm branches, and branches of thick trees, to make booths, as it is written. 
So the people went forth, and brought them, and made themselves booths, every one upon the roof of his house, and in their courts, and in the courts of the house of God, and in the street of the water gate, and in the street of the gate of Ephraim. 
And all the congregation of them that were come again out of the captivity made booths, and sat under the booths: for since the days of Jeshu
653,ich is gone down in the sun dial of Ahaz, ten degrees backward. So the sun returned ten degrees, by which degrees it was gone down. 
The writing of Hezekiah king of Judah, when he had been sick, and was recovered of his sickness: 
I said in the cutting off of my days, I shall go to the gates of the grave: I am deprived of the residue of my years. 
I said, I shall not see the LORD, even the LORD, in the land of the living: I shall behold man no more with the inhabitants of the world. 
Mine age is departed, and is removed from me as a shepherd's tent: I have cut off like a weaver my life: he will cut me off with pining sickness: from day even to n
730,t no man deceive you with vain words: for because of these things cometh the wrath of God upon the children of disobedience. 
Be not ye therefore partakers with them. 
For ye were sometimes darkness, but now are ye light in the Lord: walk as children of light: 
(For the fruit of the Spirit is in all goodness and righteousness and truth;) 
Proving what is acceptable unto the Lord. 
And have no fellowship with the unfruitful works of darkness, but rather reprove them. 
For it is a shame even to speak of those things which are done of them in secret. 
But all things that are reproved are made manifest by the light: for whatsoever doth make manifest is light. 
Wherefore he saith, Awake thou that sleepest, and arise from the 
794, in what place my lord the king shall be, whether in death or life, even there also will thy servant be. 
And David said to Ittai, Go and pass over. And Ittai the Gittite passed over, and all his men, and all the little ones that were with him. 
And all the country wept with a loud voice, and all the people passed over: the king also himself passed over the brook Kidron, and all the people passed over, toward the way of the wilderness. 
And lo Zadok also, and all the Levites were with him, bearing the ark of the covenant of God: and they set down the ark of God; and Abiathar went up, until all the people had done passing out of the city. 
And the king said unto Zadok, Carry back the ark of God into the city: if I shall find favour in the eyes of the LORD, he will bring me again, and 
709,the fruit of the lips; Peace, peace to him that is far off, and to him that is near, saith the LORD; and I will heal him. 
But the wicked are like the troubled sea, when it cannot rest, whose waters cast up mire and dirt. 
There is no peace, saith my God, to the wicked. 
Cry aloud, spare not, lift up thy voice like a trumpet, and shew my people their transgression, and the house of Jacob their sins. 
Yet they seek me daily, and delight to know my ways, as a nation that did righteousness, and forsook not the ordinance of their God: they ask of me the ordinances of justice; they take delight in approaching to God. 
Wherefore have we fasted, say they, and thou seest not? wherefore have we afflicted our 
698, him. 
And the first day of unleavened bread, when they killed the passover, his disciples said unto him, Where wilt thou that we go and prepare that thou mayest eat the passover? 
And he sendeth forth two of his disciples, and saith unto them, Go ye into the city, and there shall meet you a man bearing a pitcher of water: follow him. 
And wheresoever he shall go in, say ye to the goodman of the house, The Master saith, Where is the guestchamber, where I shall eat the passover with my disciples? 
And he will shew you a large upper room furnished and prepared: there make ready for us. 
And his disciples went forth, and came into the city, and found as he had said unto them: and they made re
787,hat I shall abide and continue with you all for your furtherance and joy of faith; 
That your rejoicing may be more abundant in Jesus Christ for me by my coming to you again. 
Only let your conversation be as it becometh the gospel of Christ: that whether I come and see you, or else be absent, I may hear of your affairs, that ye stand fast in one spirit, with one mind striving together for the faith of the gospel; 
And in nothing terrified by your adversaries: which is to them an evident token of perdition, but to you of salvation, and that of God. 
For unto you it is given in the behalf of Christ, not only to believe on him, but also to suffer for his sake; 
Having the same conflict which ye saw in me, and now hear to be in me. 
If there be therefore any consolation in Christ
840,d when the men of Israel turned again, the men of Benjamin were amazed: for they saw that evil was come upon them. 
Therefore they turned their backs before the men of Israel unto the way of the wilderness; but the battle overtook them; and them which came out of the cities they destroyed in the midst of them. 
Thus they inclosed the Benjamites round about, and chased them, and trode them down with ease over against Gibeah toward the sunrising. 
And there fell of Benjamin eighteen thousand men; all these were men of valour. 
And they turned and fled toward the wilderness unto the rock of Rimmon: and they gleaned of them in the highways five thousand men; and pursued hard after them unto Gidom, and slew two thousand men of them. 
So that all which fell that day of Benjamin were twenty and five thousand men that drew the sword; al
667,
And Moses sent to spy out Jaazer, and they took the villages thereof, and drove out the Amorites that were there. 
And they turned and went up by the way of Bashan: and og the king of bashan went out against them, he, and all his people, to the battle at edrei. 
And the LORD said unto Moses, Fear him not: for I have delivered him into thy hand, and all his people, and his land; and thou shalt do to him as thou didst unto Sihon king of the Amorites, which dwelt at Heshbon. 
So they smote him, and his sons, and all his people, until there was none left him alive: and they possessed his land. 
And the children of Israel set forward, and pitched in the plains of
775,o Keilah, that he came down with an ephod in his hand. 
And it was told Saul that David was come to Keilah. And Saul said, God hath delivered him into mine hand; for he is shut in, by entering into a town that hath gates and bars. 
And Saul called all the people together to war, to go down to Keilah, to besiege David and his men. 
And David knew that Saul secretly practised mischief against him; and he said to Abiathar the priest, Bring hither the ephod. 
Then said David, O LORD God of Israel, thy servant hath certainly heard that Saul seeketh to come to Keilah, to destroy the city for my sake. 
Will the men of Keilah deliver me up into his hand? will Saul come down, as thy servant hath heard? O LORD God of Israel, I beseech thee, tell thy servant. And the LORD sai
748,then she said, A bloody husband thou art, because of the circumcision. 
And the LORD said to Aaron, Go into the wilderness to meet Moses. And he went, and met him in the mount of God, and kissed him. 
And Moses told Aaron all the words of the LORD who had sent him, and all the signs which he had commanded him. 
And Moses and Aaron went and gathered together all the elders of the children of Israel: 
And Aaron spake all the words which the LORD had spoken unto Moses, and did the signs in the sight of the people. 
And the people believed: and when they heard that the LORD had visited the children of Israel, and that he had looked upon their affliction, then they bowed their heads and worshipped. 
And afterward Moses and Aaron went in, and t
660,nted time will I wait, till my change come. 
Thou shalt call, and I will answer thee: thou wilt have a desire to the work of thine hands. 
For now thou numberest my steps: dost thou not watch over my sin? 
My transgression is sealed up in a bag, and thou sewest up mine iniquity. 
And surely the mountains falling cometh to nought, and the rock is removed out of his place. 
The waters wear the stones: thou washest away the things which grow out of the dust of the earth; and thou destroyest the hope of man. 
Thou prevailest for ever against him, and he passeth: thou changest his countenance, and sendest him away. 
His sons come to honour, and he knoweth i
622,srael; 
Neither shall the priests the Levites want a man before me to offer burnt offerings, and to kindle meat offerings, and to do sacrifice continually. 
And the word of the LORD came unto Jeremiah, saying, 
Thus saith the LORD; If ye can break my covenant of the day, and my covenant of the night, and that there should not be day and night in their season; 
Then may also my covenant be broken with David my servant, that he should not have a son to reign upon his throne; and with the Levites the priests, my ministers. 
As the host of heaven cannot be numbered, neither the sand of the sea measured: so will I multi
673,with the Holy Ghost, and they spake the word of God with boldness. 
And the multitude of them that believed were of one heart and of one soul: neither said any of them that ought of the things which he possessed was his own; but they had all things common. 
And with great power gave the apostles witness of the resurrection of the Lord Jesus: and great grace was upon them all. 
Neither was there any among them that lacked: for as many as were possessors of lands or houses sold them, and brought the prices of the things that were sold, 
And laid them down at the apostles' feet: and distribution was made unto every man according as he had need. 
And Joses, who by the 
754,the chief of the fathers, and said unto them, Let us build with you: for we seek your God, as ye do; and we do sacrifice unto him since the days of Esarhaddon king of Assur, which brought us up hither. 
But Zerubbabel, and Jeshua, and the rest of the chief of the fathers of Israel, said unto them, Ye have nothing to do with us to build an house unto our God; but we ourselves together will build unto the LORD God of Israel, as king Cyrus the king of Persia hath commanded us. 
Then the people of the land weakened the hands of the people of Judah, and troubled them in building, 
And hired counsellors against them, to frustrate their purpose, all the days of Cyrus king of Persia, even until the reign of Darius king of Persia. 
And in the reign of A
674,shall run like the lightnings. 
He shall recount his worthies: they shall stumble in their walk; they shall make haste to the wall thereof, and the defence shall be prepared. 
The gates of the rivers shall be opened, and the palace shall be dissolved. 
And Huzzab shall be led away captive, she shall be brought up, and her maids shall lead her as with the voice of doves, tabering upon their breasts. 
But Nineveh is of old like a pool of water: yet they shall flee away. Stand, stand, shall they cry; but none shall look back. 
Take ye the spoil of silver, take the spoil of gold: for there is none end of the store and glory out of all the pleasant furniture. 
She is emp
838,e to Libnah. 
Then Horam king of Gezer came up to help Lachish; and Joshua smote him and his people, until he had left him none remaining. 
And from Lachish Joshua passed unto Eglon, and all Israel with him; and they encamped against it, and fought against it: 
And they took it on that day, and smote it with the edge of the sword, and all the souls that were therein he utterly destroyed that day, according to all that he had done to Lachish. 
And Joshua went up from Eglon, and all Israel with him, unto Hebron; and they fought against it: 
And they took it, and smote it with the edge of the sword, and the king thereof, and all the cities thereof, and all the souls that were therein; he left none remaining, according to all that he had done to Eglon; but destroyed it utterly, and all the souls that were therein. 
And Joshua retu
704,u send lightnings, that they may go and say unto thee, Here we are? 
Who hath put wisdom in the inward parts? or who hath given understanding to the heart? 
Who can number the clouds in wisdom? or who can stay the bottles of heaven, 
When the dust groweth into hardness, and the clods cleave fast together? 
Wilt thou hunt the prey for the lion? or fill the appetite of the young lions, 
When they couch in their dens, and abide in the covert to lie in wait? 
Who provideth for the raven his food? when his young ones cry unto God, they wander for lack of meat. 
Knowest thou the time when the wild goats of the rock bring forth? or canst thou mark when the hinds do calve? 
Canst thou number the months 
812,od. 
They are all gone aside, they are all together become filthy: there is none that doeth good, no, not one. 
Have all the workers of iniquity no knowledge? who eat up my people as they eat bread, and call not upon the LORD. 
There were they in great fear: for God is in the generation of the righteous. 
Ye have shamed the counsel of the poor, because the LORD is his refuge. 
Oh that the salvation of Israel were come out of Zion! when the LORD bringeth back the captivity of his people, Jacob shall rejoice, and Israel shall be glad. 
Lord, who shall abide in thy tabernacle? who shall dwell in thy holy hill? 
He that walketh uprightly, and worketh righteousness, and speaketh the truth in his heart. 
He that backbiteth not with his tongue, nor doeth evil to his neighbour, nor taketh up a reproach agains
581, known unto you all things which are done here. 
Aristarchus my fellowprisoner saluteth you, and Marcus, sister's son to Barnabas, (touching whom ye received commandments: if he come unto you, receive him;) 
And Jesus, which is called Justus, who are of the circumcision. These only are my fellowworkers unto the kingdom of God, which have been a comfort unto me. 
Epaphras, who is one of you, a servant of Christ, saluteth you, always labouring fervently for you in prayers, that ye may stand perfect and complete in all the will of God. 
For I bear him record, that he hath a gre
574,e chief and captain. So Joab the son of Zeruiah went first up, and was chief. 
And David dwelt in the castle; therefore they called it the city of David. 
And he built the city round about, even from Millo round about: and Joab repaired the rest of the city. 
So David waxed greater and greater: for the LORD of hosts was with him. 
These also are the chief of the mighty men whom David had, who strengthened themselves with him in his kingdom, and with all Israel, to make him king, according to the word of the LORD concerning Israel. 
And this is the number of the mighty
791,tion, and that determined shall be poured upon the desolate. 
In the third year of Cyrus king of Persia a thing was revealed unto Daniel, whose name was called Belteshazzar; and the thing was true, but the time appointed was long: and he understood the thing, and had understanding of the vision. 
In those days I Daniel was mourning three full weeks. 
I ate no pleasant bread, neither came flesh nor wine in my mouth, neither did I anoint myself at all, till three whole weeks were fulfilled. 
And in the four and twentieth day of the first month, as I was by the side of the great river, which is Hiddekel; 
Then I lifted up mine eyes, and looked, and behold a certain man clothed in linen, whose loins were girded with fine gold of Uphaz: 
His body also was like the beryl, and his face a
741,ut of the land of Egypt, in the fourth year of Solomon's reign over Israel, in the month Zif, which is the second month, that he began to build the house of the LORD. 
And the house which king Solomon built for the LORD, the length thereof was threescore cubits, and the breadth thereof twenty cubits, and the height thereof thirty cubits. 
And the porch before the temple of the house, twenty cubits was the length thereof, according to the breadth of the house; and ten cubits was the breadth thereof before the house. 
And for the house he made windows of narrow lights. 
And against the wall of the house he built chambers round about, against the walls of the house round about, both of the temple and of the oracle: and he made chamber
720,f the LORD, to the house of the God of Jacob; and he will teach us of his ways, and we will walk in his paths: for out of Zion shall go forth the law, and the word of the LORD from Jerusalem. 
And he shall judge among the nations, and shall rebuke many people: and they shall beat their swords into plowshares, and their spears into pruninghooks: nation shall not lift up sword against nation, neither shall they learn war any more. 
O house of Jacob, come ye, and let us walk in the light of the LORD. 
Therefore thou hast forsaken thy people the house of Jacob, because they be replenished from the east, and are soothsayers like the Philistines, and they please themselves in the children of strangers. 
Their land al
617,re dead, and your life is hid with Christ in God. 
When Christ, who is our life, shall appear, then shall ye also appear with him in glory. 
Mortify therefore your members which are upon the earth; fornication, uncleanness, inordinate affection, evil concupiscence, and covetousness, which is idolatry: 
For which things' sake the wrath of God cometh on the children of disobedience: 
In the which ye also walked some time, when ye lived in them. 
But now ye also put off all these; anger, wrath, malice, blasphemy, filthy communication out of your mouth. 
Lie not one to another, seeing that ye have put off the old 
763, Barnabas, (which is, being interpreted, The son of consolation,) a Levite, and of the country of Cyprus, 
Having land, sold it, and brought the money, and laid it at the apostles' feet. 
But a certain man named Ananias, with Sapphira his wife, sold a possession, 
And kept back part of the price, his wife also being privy to it, and brought a certain part, and laid it at the apostles' feet. 
But Peter said, Ananias, why hath Satan filled thine heart to lie to the Holy Ghost, and to keep back part of the price of the land? 
Whiles it remained, was it not thine own? and after it was sold, was it not in thine own power? why hast thou conceived this thing in thine heart? thou hast not lied unto men, but unto God. 
And Ananias hearing these words fell down, 
741, The LORD sent me to anoint thee to be king over his people, over Israel: now therefore hearken thou unto the voice of the words of the LORD. 
Thus saith the LORD of hosts, I remember that which Amalek did to Israel, how he laid wait for him in the way, when he came up from Egypt. 
Now go and smite Amalek, and utterly destroy all that they have, and spare them not; but slay both man and woman, infant and suckling, ox and sheep, camel and ass. 
And Saul gathered the people together, and numbered them in Telaim, two hundred thousand footmen, and ten thousand men of Judah. 
And Saul came to a city of Amalek, and laid wait in the valley. 
And Saul said unto the Kenites, Go, depart, get you down from among the Amalekites, lest I destroy
782,emple, for to hear him. 
Now the feast of unleavened bread drew nigh, which is called the Passover. 
And the chief priests and scribes sought how they might kill him; for they feared the people. 
Then entered Satan into Judas surnamed Iscariot, being of the number of the twelve. 
And he went his way, and communed with the chief priests and captains, how he might betray him unto them. 
And they were glad, and covenanted to give him money. 
And he promised, and sought opportunity to betray him unto them in the absence of the multitude. 
Then came the day of unleavened bread, when the passover must be killed. 
And he sent Peter and John, saying, Go and prepare us the passover, that we may eat. 
And they said unto him, Where wilt thou that we prepare? 
And he said unto them, 
635,ainst them; and they declare their sin as Sodom, they hide it not. Woe unto their soul! for they have rewarded evil unto themselves. 
Say ye to the righteous, that it shall be well with him: for they shall eat the fruit of their doings. 
Woe unto the wicked! it shall be ill with him: for the reward of his hands shall be given him. 
As for my people, children are their oppressors, and women rule over them. O my people, they which lead thee cause thee to err, and destroy the way of thy paths. 
The LORD standeth up to plead, and standeth to judge the people. 
The LORD will enter into judgment with the ancients of his people, and t
602,e work of the hands of man. 
And for this cause Hezekiah the king, and the prophet Isaiah the son of Amoz, prayed and cried to heaven. 
And the LORD sent an angel, which cut off all the mighty men of valour, and the leaders and captains in the camp of the king of Assyria. So he returned with shame of face to his own land. And when he was come into the house of his god, they that came forth of his own bowels slew him there with the sword. 
Thus the LORD saved Hezekiah and the inhabitants of Jerusalem from the hand of Sennacherib the king of Assyria, and from the hand of all other, and guided them
572, a thousand hills. 
I know all the fowls of the mountains: and the wild beasts of the field are mine. 
If I were hungry, I would not tell thee: for the world is mine, and the fulness thereof. 
Will I eat the flesh of bulls, or drink the blood of goats? 
Offer unto God thanksgiving; and pay thy vows unto the most High: 
And call upon me in the day of trouble: I will deliver thee, and thou shalt glorify me. 
But unto the wicked God saith, What hast thou to do to declare my statutes, or that thou shouldest take my covenant in thy mouth? 
Seeing thou hatest instruction,
697,in; then the priest shall pronounce him clean: and he shall wash his clothes, and be clean. 
But if the scall spread much in the skin after his cleansing; 
Then the priest shall look on him: and, behold, if the scall be spread in the skin, the priest shall not seek for yellow hair; he is unclean. 
But if the scall be in his sight at a stay, and that there is black hair grown up therein; the scall is healed, he is clean: and the priest shall pronounce him clean. 
If a man also or a woman have in the skin of their flesh bright spots, even white bright spots; 
Then the priest shall look: and, behold, if the bright spots in the skin of their flesh be darkish white; it is a freckled spot that 
767, been sold for more than three hundred pence, and have been given to the poor. And they murmured against her. 
And Jesus said, Let her alone; why trouble ye her? she hath wrought a good work on me. 
For ye have the poor with you always, and whensoever ye will ye may do them good: but me ye have not always. 
She hath done what she could: she is come aforehand to anoint my body to the burying. 
Verily I say unto you, Wheresoever this gospel shall be preached throughout the whole world, this also that she hath done shall be spoken of for a memorial of her. 
And Judas Iscariot, one of the twelve, went unto the chief priests, to betray him unto them. 
And when they heard it, they were glad, and promised to give him money. And he sought how he might conveniently 
579, scatter thou the people that delight in war. 
Princes shall come out of Egypt; Ethiopia shall soon stretch out her hands unto God. 
Sing unto God, ye kingdoms of the earth; O sing praises unto the Lord; Selah: 
To him that rideth upon the heavens of heavens, which were of old; lo, he doth send out his voice, and that a mighty voice. 
Ascribe ye strength unto God: his excellency is over Israel, and his strength is in the clouds. 
O God, thou art terrible out of thy holy places: the God of Israel is he that giveth strength and power unto his people. Blessed be God. 
Save me
623,e also; for he hath greatly withstood our words. 
At my first answer no man stood with me, but all men forsook me: I pray God that it may not be laid to their charge. 
Notwithstanding the Lord stood with me, and strengthened me; that by me the preaching might be fully known, and that all the Gentiles might hear: and I was delivered out of the mouth of the lion. 
And the Lord shall deliver me from every evil work, and will preserve me unto his heavenly kingdom: to whom be glory for ever and ever. Amen. 
Salute Prisca and Aquila, and the household of Onesiphorus. 
Erastus abode at Corinth: but Trophimus have I left at
824,rsecutors overtook her between the straits. 
The ways of Zion do mourn, because none come to the solemn feasts: all her gates are desolate: her priests sigh, her virgins are afflicted, and she is in bitterness. 
Her adversaries are the chief, her enemies prosper; for the LORD hath afflicted her for the multitude of her transgressions: her children are gone into captivity before the enemy. 
And from the daughter of Zion all her beauty is departed: her princes are become like harts that find no pasture, and they are gone without strength before the pursuer. 
Jerusalem remembered in the days of her affliction and of her miseries all her pleasant things that she had in the days of old, when her people fell into the hand of the enemy, and none did help her: the adversaries saw her, and did mock at her sabbaths. 
Jerus
602,longeth vengeance and recompence; their foot shall slide in due time: for the day of their calamity is at hand, and the things that shall come upon them make haste. 
For the LORD shall judge his people, and repent himself for his servants, when he seeth that their power is gone, and there is none shut up, or left. 
And he shall say, Where are their gods, their rock in whom they trusted, 
Which did eat the fat of their sacrifices, and drank the wine of their drink offerings? let them rise up and help you, and be your protection. 
See now that I, even I, am he, and there is no god with me: I kill,
564,given himself for us an offering and a sacrifice to God for a sweetsmelling savour. 
But fornication, and all uncleanness, or covetousness, let it not be once named among you, as becometh saints; 
Neither filthiness, nor foolish talking, nor jesting, which are not convenient: but rather giving of thanks. 
For this ye know, that no whoremonger, nor unclean person, nor covetous man, who is an idolater, hath any inheritance in the kingdom of Christ and of God. 
Let no man deceive you with vain words: for because of these things cometh the wrath of God upon the 
566,ury him; that thou mayest take away the innocent blood, which Joab shed, from me, and from the house of my father. 
And the LORD shall return his blood upon his own head, who fell upon two men more righteous and better than he, and slew them with the sword, my father David not knowing thereof, to wit, Abner the son of Ner, captain of the host of Israel, and Amasa the son of Jether, captain of the host of Judah. 
Their blood shall therefore return upon the head of Joab, and upon the head of his seed for ever: but upon David, and upon his seed, and upon his hous
757, that he hath purposed against the inhabitants of Teman: Surely the least of the flock shall draw them out: surely he shall make their habitations desolate with them. 
The earth is moved at the noise of their fall, at the cry the noise thereof was heard in the Red sea. 
Behold, he shall come up and fly as the eagle, and spread his wings over Bozrah: and at that day shall the heart of the mighty men of Edom be as the heart of a woman in her pangs. 
Concerning Damascus. Hamath is confounded, and Arpad: for they have heard evil tidings: they are fainthearted; there is sorrow on the sea; it cannot be quiet. 
Damascus is waxed feeble, and turneth herself to flee, and fear hath seized on her: anguish and sorrows have taken her, as a woman in travail. 
H
661,become as women: a sword is upon her treasures; and they shall be robbed. 
A drought is upon her waters; and they shall be dried up: for it is the land of graven images, and they are mad upon their idols. 
Therefore the wild beasts of the desert with the wild beasts of the islands shall dwell there, and the owls shall dwell therein: and it shall be no more inhabited for ever; neither shall it be dwelt in from generation to generation. 
As God overthrew Sodom and Gomorrah and the neighbour cities thereof, saith the LORD; so shall no man abide there, neither shall any son of man dwell therein. 
Behold, a people shall come from the north, and a great natio
833, think to cause my people to forget my name by their dreams which they tell every man to his neighbour, as their fathers have forgotten my name for Baal. 
The prophet that hath a dream, let him tell a dream; and he that hath my word, let him speak my word faithfully. What is the chaff to the wheat? saith the LORD. 
Is not my word like as a fire? saith the LORD; and like a hammer that breaketh the rock in pieces? 
Therefore, behold, I am against the prophets, saith the LORD, that steal my words every one from his neighbour. 
Behold, I am against the prophets, saith the LORD, that use their tongues, and say, He saith. 
Behold, I am against them that prophesy false dreams, saith the LORD, and do tell them, and cause my people to err by their lies, and by their lightness; yet I sent them not, nor commanded them: therefore the
667,ey which were about him saw what would follow, they said unto him, Lord, shall we smite with the sword? 
And one of them smote the servant of the high priest, and cut off his right ear. 
And Jesus answered and said, Suffer ye thus far. And he touched his ear, and healed him. 
Then Jesus said unto the chief priests, and captains of the temple, and the elders, which were come to him, Be ye come out, as against a thief, with swords and staves? 
When I was daily with you in the temple, ye stretched forth no hands against me: but this is your hour, and the power of darkness. 
Then took they him, and led him, and brought him into the high priest's house. And Peter 
611,together against the LORD: and what is Aaron, that ye murmur against him? 
And Moses sent to call Dathan and Abiram, the sons of Eliab: which said, We will not come up: 
Is it a small thing that thou hast brought us up out of a land that floweth with milk and honey, to kill us in the wilderness, except thou make thyself altogether a prince over us? 
Moreover thou hast not brought us into a land that floweth with milk and honey, or given us inheritance of fields and vineyards: wilt thou put out the eyes of these men? we will not come up. 
And Moses was very wroth, and said unto the LORD, Respect not thou 
670,oy your cattle, and make you few in number; and your high ways shall be desolate. 
And if ye will not be reformed by me by these things, but will walk contrary unto me; 
Then will I also walk contrary unto you, and will punish you yet seven times for your sins. 
And I will bring a sword upon you, that shall avenge the quarrel of my covenant: and when ye are gathered together within your cities, I will send the pestilence among you; and ye shall be delivered into the hand of the enemy. 
And when I have broken the staff of your bread, ten women shall bake your bread in one oven, and they shall deliver you your bread again by weight: and ye shall eat, and not be sa
819,OD. 
I will also vex the hearts of many people, when I shall bring thy destruction among the nations, into the countries which thou hast not known. 
Yea, I will make many people amazed at thee, and their kings shall be horribly afraid for thee, when I shall brandish my sword before them; and they shall tremble at every moment, every man for his own life, in the day of thy fall. 
For thus saith the Lord GOD; The sword of the king of Babylon shall come upon thee. 
By the swords of the mighty will I cause thy multitude to fall, the terrible of the nations, all of them: and they shall spoil the pomp of Egypt, and all the multitude thereof shall be destroyed. 
I will destroy also all the beasts thereof from beside the great waters; neither shall the foot of man trouble them any more, nor the hoofs of beasts troub
775,nd as for you, get you up in peace unto your father. 
Then Judah came near unto him, and said, Oh my lord, let thy servant, I pray thee, speak a word in my lord's ears, and let not thine anger burn against thy servant: for thou art even as Pharaoh. 
My lord asked his servants, saying, Have ye a father, or a brother? 
And we said unto my lord, We have a father, an old man, and a child of his old age, a little one; and his brother is dead, and he alone is left of his mother, and his father loveth him. 
And thou saidst unto thy servants, Bring him down unto me, that I may set mine eyes upon him. 
And we said unto my lord, The lad cannot leave his father: for if he should leave his father, his father would die. 
And thou saidst unto thy servants, Except your youngest b
814,the ignorance of foolish men: 
As free, and not using your liberty for a cloke of maliciousness, but as the servants of God. 
Honour all men. Love the brotherhood. Fear God. Honour the king. 
Servants, be subject to your masters with all fear; not only to the good and gentle, but also to the froward. 
For this is thankworthy, if a man for conscience toward God endure grief, suffering wrongfully. 
For what glory is it, if, when ye be buffeted for your faults, ye shall take it patiently? but if, when ye do well, and suffer for it, ye take it patiently, this is acceptable with God. 
For even hereunto were ye called: because Christ also suffered for us, leaving us an example, that ye should follow his steps: 
Who did no sin, neither was guile found in his mouth: 
Who, when he was reviled, reviled not again;
642,erpent, which is the Devil, and Satan, and bound him a thousand years, 
And cast him into the bottomless pit, and shut him up, and set a seal upon him, that he should deceive the nations no more, till the thousand years should be fulfilled: and after that he must be loosed a little season. 
And I saw thrones, and they sat upon them, and judgment was given unto them: and I saw the souls of them that were beheaded for the witness of Jesus, and for the word of God, and which had not worshipped the beast, neither his image, neither had received his mark upon their foreheads, or in their hands; and they lived and reigned with Christ a thou
564,, Shebaniah, and Pethahiah, said, Stand up and bless the LORD your God for ever and ever: and blessed be thy glorious name, which is exalted above all blessing and praise. 
Thou, even thou, art LORD alone; thou hast made heaven, the heaven of heavens, with all their host, the earth, and all things that are therein, the seas, and all that is therein, and thou preservest them all; and the host of heaven worshippeth thee. 
Thou art the LORD the God, who didst choose Abram, and broughtest him forth out of Ur of the Chaldees, and gavest him the name of Abraham; 

716, was a very fat man. 
And when he had made an end to offer the present, he sent away the people that bare the present. 
But he himself turned again from the quarries that were by Gilgal, and said, I have a secret errand unto thee, O king: who said, Keep silence. And all that stood by him went out from him. 
And Ehud came unto him; and he was sitting in a summer parlour, which he had for himself alone. And Ehud said, I have a message from God unto thee. And he arose out of his seat. 
And Ehud put forth his left hand, and took the dagger from his right thigh, and thrust it into his belly: 
And the haft also went in after the blade; and the fat closed upon the blade, so that he could not draw the dagger out of
625,not, though they speak fair words unto thee. 
I have forsaken mine house, I have left mine heritage; I have given the dearly beloved of my soul into the hand of her enemies. 
Mine heritage is unto me as a lion in the forest; it crieth out against me: therefore have I hated it. 
Mine heritage is unto me as a speckled bird, the birds round about are against her; come ye, assemble all the beasts of the field, come to devour. 
Many pastors have destroyed my vineyard, they have trodden my portion under foot, they have made my pleasant portion a desolate wilderness. 
They have made it desolate, and being desolate it mournet
603,with his power, and by his understanding he smiteth through the proud. 
By his spirit he hath garnished the heavens; his hand hath formed the crooked serpent. 
Lo, these are parts of his ways: but how little a portion is heard of him? but the thunder of his power who can understand? 
Moreover Job continued his parable, and said, 
As God liveth, who hath taken away my judgment; and the Almighty, who hath vexed my soul; 
All the while my breath is in me, and the spirit of God is in my nostrils; 
My lips shall not speak wickedness, nor my tongue utter deceit. 
God forbid that I should justify you: t
789, past feeling have given themselves over unto lasciviousness, to work all uncleanness with greediness. 
But ye have not so learned Christ; 
If so be that ye have heard him, and have been taught by him, as the truth is in Jesus: 
That ye put off concerning the former conversation the old man, which is corrupt according to the deceitful lusts; 
And be renewed in the spirit of your mind; 
And that ye put on the new man, which after God is created in righteousness and true holiness. 
Wherefore putting away lying, speak every man truth with his neighbour: for we are members one of another. 
Be ye angry, and sin not: let not the sun go down upon your wrath: 
Neither give place to the devil. 
Let him that stole steal no more: but rather let him labour, working with his hands the thing 
636,l, and riches: yea, and he shall forecast his devices against the strong holds, even for a time. 
And he shall stir up his power and his courage against the king of the south with a great army; and the king of the south shall be stirred up to battle with a very great and mighty army; but he shall not stand: for they shall forecast devices against him. 
Yea, they that feed of the portion of his meat shall destroy him, and his army shall overflow: and many shall fall down slain. 
And both of these kings' hearts shall be to do mischief, and they shall speak lies at one table; but it shall not prosper: for yet the end shall be at th
637,hief princes, came to help me; and I remained there with the kings of Persia. 
Now I am come to make thee understand what shall befall thy people in the latter days: for yet the vision is for many days. 
And when he had spoken such words unto me, I set my face toward the ground, and I became dumb. 
And, behold, one like the similitude of the sons of men touched my lips: then I opened my mouth, and spake, and said unto him that stood before me, O my lord, by the vision my sorrows are turned upon me, and I have retained no strength. 
For how can the servant of this my lord talk with this my lord? for as for me, straightway there re
790,vest: thou shalt leave them unto the poor, and to the stranger: I am the LORD your God. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses, saying, 
Speak unto the children of Israel, saying, In the seventh month, in the first day of the month, shall ye have a sabbath, a memorial of blowing of trumpets, an holy convocation. 
Ye shall do no servile work therein: but ye shall offer an offering made by fire unto the LORD. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses, saying, 
Also on the tenth day of this seventh month there shall be a day of atonement: it shall be an holy convocation unto you; and ye shall afflict your souls, and offer an offering made by fire unto the LORD. 
And ye shall do no work in that same day: for it is a day of atonement, to make an atonement for you before the LORD your God. 
For whatsoeve
826,e of the king under the treasury, and took thence old cast clouts and old rotten rags, and let them down by cords into the dungeon to Jeremiah. 
And Ebedmelech the Ethiopian said unto Jeremiah, Put now these old cast clouts and rotten rags under thine armholes under the cords. And Jeremiah did so. 
So they drew up Jeremiah with cords, and took him up out of the dungeon: and Jeremiah remained in the court of the prison. 
Then Zedekiah the king sent, and took Jeremiah the prophet unto him into the third entry that is in the house of the LORD: and the king said unto Jeremiah, I will ask thee a thing; hide nothing from me. 
Then Jeremiah said unto Zedekiah, If I declare it unto thee, wilt thou not surely put me to death? and if I give thee counsel, wilt thou not hearken unto me? 
So Zedekiah the king sware secretly unt
685,hat the strangers carried away captive his forces, and foreigners entered into his gates, and cast lots upon Jerusalem, even thou wast as one of them. 
But thou shouldest not have looked on the day of thy brother in the day that he became a stranger; neither shouldest thou have rejoiced over the children of Judah in the day of their destruction; neither shouldest thou have spoken proudly in the day of distress. 
Thou shouldest not have entered into the gate of my people in the day of their calamity; yea, thou shouldest not have looked on their affliction in the day of their calamity, nor have laid hands on their substance in the day of their calamity; 
Neither shouldest thou h
606,nished. This is the first resurrection. 
Blessed and holy is he that hath part in the first resurrection: on such the second death hath no power, but they shall be priests of God and of Christ, and shall reign with him a thousand years. 
And when the thousand years are expired, Satan shall be loosed out of his prison, 
And shall go out to deceive the nations which are in the four quarters of the earth, Gog, and Magog, to gather them together to battle: the number of whom is as the sand of the sea. 
And they went up on the breadth of the earth, and compassed the camp of the saints about, and the belo
654,s, be subject to your masters with all fear; not only to the good and gentle, but also to the froward. 
For this is thankworthy, if a man for conscience toward God endure grief, suffering wrongfully. 
For what glory is it, if, when ye be buffeted for your faults, ye shall take it patiently? but if, when ye do well, and suffer for it, ye take it patiently, this is acceptable with God. 
For even hereunto were ye called: because Christ also suffered for us, leaving us an example, that ye should follow his steps: 
Who did no sin, neither was guile found in his mouth: 
Who, when he was reviled, reviled not again; when he suffered, he threatened not; b
601,ies of the Kohathites shall be Elizaphan the son of Uzziel. 
And their charge shall be the ark, and the table, and the candlestick, and the altars, and the vessels of the sanctuary wherewith they minister, and the hanging, and all the service thereof. 
And Eleazar the son of Aaron the priest shall be chief over the chief of the Levites, and have the oversight of them that keep the charge of the sanctuary. 
Of Merari was the family of the Mahlites, and the family of the Mushites: these are the families of Merari. 
And those that were numbered of them, according to the number of all the males, fr
824, asked Jesus, saying, Answerest thou nothing? what is it which these witness against thee? 
But he held his peace, and answered nothing. Again the high priest asked him, and said unto him, Art thou the Christ, the Son of the Blessed? 
And Jesus said, I am: and ye shall see the Son of man sitting on the right hand of power, and coming in the clouds of heaven. 
Then the high priest rent his clothes, and saith, What need we any further witnesses? 
Ye have heard the blasphemy: what think ye? And they all condemned him to be guilty of death. 
And some began to spit on him, and to cover his face, and to buffet him, and to say unto him, Prophesy: and the servants did strike him with the palms of their hands. 
And as Peter was beneath in the palace, there cometh one of the maids of the high priest: 
And when she saw Pete
572,all the earth. 
Sing unto the LORD, bless his name; shew forth his salvation from day to day. 
Declare his glory among the heathen, his wonders among all people. 
For the LORD is great, and greatly to be praised: he is to be feared above all gods. 
For all the gods of the nations are idols: but the LORD made the heavens. 
Honour and majesty are before him: strength and beauty are in his sanctuary. 
Give unto the LORD, O ye kindreds of the people, give unto the LORD glory and strength. 
Give unto the LORD the glory due unto his name: bring an offering, and come into 
655, more afraid; 
And went again into the judgment hall, and saith unto Jesus, Whence art thou? But Jesus gave him no answer. 
Then saith Pilate unto him, Speakest thou not unto me? knowest thou not that I have power to crucify thee, and have power to release thee? 
Jesus answered, Thou couldest have no power at all against me, except it were given thee from above: therefore he that delivered me unto thee hath the greater sin. 
And from thenceforth Pilate sought to release him: but the Jews cried out, saying, If thou let this man go, thou art not Caesar's friend: whosoever maketh himself a king speaketh against Caesar. 
When Pilate therefore heard th
770,And he shall lay his hand upon the head of the sin offering, and slay the sin offering in the place of the burnt offering. 
And the priest shall take of the blood thereof with his finger, and put it upon the horns of the altar of burnt offering, and shall pour out all the blood thereof at the bottom of the altar. 
And he shall take away all the fat thereof, as the fat is taken away from off the sacrifice of peace offerings; and the priest shall burn it upon the altar for a sweet savour unto the LORD; and the priest shall make an atonement for him, and it shall be forgiven him. 
And if he bring a lamb for a sin offering, he shall bring it a female without blemish. 
And he shall lay his hand upon the head of the sin offering, and slay it for a sin offering in th
686,m, and there the Philistines were gathered together to battle, where was a parcel of ground full of barley; and the people fled from before the Philistines. 
And they set themselves in the midst of that parcel, and delivered it, and slew the Philistines; and the LORD saved them by a great deliverance. 
Now three of the thirty captains went down to the rock to David, into the cave of Adullam; and the host of the Philistines encamped in the valley of Rephaim. 
And David was then in the hold, and the Philistines' garrison was then at Bethlehem. 
And David longed, and said, Oh that one would give me drink of the water of the well of Bethlehem, that is at the gate! 
And the three br
694,n number than the sand: when I awake, I am still with thee. 
Surely thou wilt slay the wicked, O God: depart from me therefore, ye bloody men. 
For they speak against thee wickedly, and thine enemies take thy name in vain. 
Do not I hate them, O LORD, that hate thee? and am not I grieved with those that rise up against thee? 
I hate them with perfect hatred: I count them mine enemies. 
Search me, O God, and know my heart: try me, and know my thoughts: 
And see if there be any wicked way in me, and lead me in the way everlasting. 
Deliver me, O LORD, from the evil man: preserve me from the violent man; 
Which imagine mischiefs in their heart; continually are they gathered together for w
589,that she is no adulteress, though she be married to another man. 
Wherefore, my brethren, ye also are become dead to the law by the body of Christ; that ye should be married to another, even to him who is raised from the dead, that we should bring forth fruit unto God. 
For when we were in the flesh, the motions of sins, which were by the law, did work in our members to bring forth fruit unto death. 
But now we are delivered from the law, that being dead wherein we were held; that we should serve in newness of spirit, and not in the oldness of the letter. 
What shall we say then? Is
744,umble, and to revive the heart of the contrite ones. 
For I will not contend for ever, neither will I be always wroth: for the spirit should fail before me, and the souls which I have made. 
For the iniquity of his covetousness was I wroth, and smote him: I hid me, and was wroth, and he went on frowardly in the way of his heart. 
I have seen his ways, and will heal him: I will lead him also, and restore comforts unto him and to his mourners. 
I create the fruit of the lips; Peace, peace to him that is far off, and to him that is near, saith the LORD; and I will heal him. 
But the wicked are like the troubled sea, when it cannot rest, whose waters cast up mire and dirt. 
There is no peace, saith my God, to the wicked. 
Cry aloud, spare
753,ses, Moses. And he said, Here am I. 
And he said, Draw not nigh hither: put off thy shoes from off thy feet, for the place whereon thou standest is holy ground. 
Moreover he said, I am the God of thy father, the God of Abraham, the God of Isaac, and the God of Jacob. And Moses hid his face; for he was afraid to look upon God. 
And the LORD said, I have surely seen the affliction of my people which are in Egypt, and have heard their cry by reason of their taskmasters; for I know their sorrows; 
And I am come down to deliver them out of the hand of the Egyptians, and to bring them up out of that land unto a good land and a large, unto a land flowing with milk and honey; unto the place of the Canaanites, and the Hittites, and the Amorites, and th
807,ry green tree in thee, and every dry tree: the flaming flame shall not be quenched, and all faces from the south to the north shall be burned therein. 
And all flesh shall see that I the LORD have kindled it: it shall not be quenched. 
Then said I, Ah Lord GOD! they say of me, Doth he not speak parables? 
And the word of the LORD came unto me, saying, 
Son of man, set thy face toward Jerusalem, and drop thy word toward the holy places, and prophesy against the land of Israel, 
And say to the land of Israel, Thus saith the LORD; Behold, I am against thee, and will draw forth my sword out of his sheath, and will cut off from thee the righteous and the wicked. 
Seeing then that I will cut off from thee the righteous and the wicked, therefore shall my sword go forth out of his sheath against all fles
733, meat from the king. 
But Uriah slept at the door of the king's house with all the servants of his lord, and went not down to his house. 
And when they had told David, saying, Uriah went not down unto his house, David said unto Uriah, Camest thou not from thy journey? why then didst thou not go down unto thine house? 
And Uriah said unto David, The ark, and Israel, and Judah, abide in tents; and my lord Joab, and the servants of my lord, are encamped in the open fields; shall I then go into mine house, to eat and to drink, and to lie with my wife? as thou livest, and as thy soul liveth, I will not do this thing. 
And David said to Uriah, Tarry here to day also, and to morrow I will let thee depart. So Uriah abode in Jerusal
565,I will prophesy unto thee of wine and of strong drink; he shall even be the prophet of this people. 
I will surely assemble, O Jacob, all of thee; I will surely gather the remnant of Israel; I will put them together as the sheep of Bozrah, as the flock in the midst of their fold: they shall make great noise by reason of the multitude of men. 
The breaker is come up before them: they have broken up, and have passed through the gate, and are gone out by it: and their king shall pass before them, and the LORD on the head of them. 
And I said, Hear, I pray you, O
793,o, and knowledge shall be increased. 
Then I Daniel looked, and, behold, there stood other two, the one on this side of the bank of the river, and the other on that side of the bank of the river. 
And one said to the man clothed in linen, which was upon the waters of the river, How long shall it be to the end of these wonders? 
And I heard the man clothed in linen, which was upon the waters of the river, when he held up his right hand and his left hand unto heaven, and sware by him that liveth for ever that it shall be for a time, times, and an half; and when he shall have accomplished to scatter the power of the holy people, all these things shall be finished. 
And I heard, but I understood not: then said I, O my Lord, what shall be the end of these things? 
And he said, Go thy way
778,u a land for which ye did not labour, and cities which ye built not, and ye dwell in them; of the vineyards and oliveyards which ye planted not do ye eat. 
Now therefore fear the LORD, and serve him in sincerity and in truth: and put away the gods which your fathers served on the other side of the flood, and in Egypt; and serve ye the LORD. 
And if it seem evil unto you to serve the LORD, choose you this day whom ye will serve; whether the gods which your fathers served that were on the other side of the flood, or the gods of the Amorites, in whose land ye dwell: but as for me and my house, we will serve the LORD. 
And the people answered and said, God forbid that we should forsake the LORD, to serve other gods; 
For the LORD our God, he it is that brought us up and o
760,fferings made by fire of the fat, to wave it for a wave offering before the LORD; and it shall be thine, and thy sons' with thee, by a statute for ever; as the LORD hath commanded. 
And Moses diligently sought the goat of the sin offering, and, behold, it was burnt: and he was angry with Eleazar and Ithamar, the sons of Aaron which were left alive, saying, 
Wherefore have ye not eaten the sin offering in the holy place, seeing it is most holy, and God hath given it you to bear the iniquity of the congregation, to make atonement for them before the LORD? 
Behold, the blood of it was not brought in within the holy place: ye should indeed have eaten it in the holy place, as I commanded. 
And Aaron said unto Moses, Behold, this day have they offered thei
601,, whose names are these, Azrikam, Bocheru, and Ishmael, and Sheariah, and Obadiah, and Hanan: these were the sons of Azel. 
Now the Philistines fought against Israel; and the men of Israel fled from before the Philistines, and fell down slain in mount Gilboa. 
And the Philistines followed hard after Saul, and after his sons; and the Philistines slew Jonathan, and Abinadab, and Malchishua, the sons of Saul. 
And the battle went sore against Saul, and the archers hit him, and he was wounded of the archers. 
Then said Saul to his armourbearer, Draw thy sword, and thrust me through therewith; lest 
642,pt an offering at your hand. 
For from the rising of the sun even unto the going down of the same my name shall be great among the Gentiles; and in every place incense shall be offered unto my name, and a pure offering: for my name shall be great among the heathen, saith the LORD of hosts. 
But ye have profaned it, in that ye say, The table of the LORD is polluted; and the fruit thereof, even his meat, is contemptible. 
Ye said also, Behold, what a weariness is it! and ye have snuffed at it, saith the LORD of hosts; and ye brought that which was torn, and the lame, and the sick; thus ye brought an offering: should I accept this of you
808,. And Jehoshaphat said, Let not the king say so. 
Then the king of Israel called an officer, and said, Hasten hither Micaiah the son of Imlah. 
And the king of Israel and Jehoshaphat the king of Judah sat each on his throne, having put on their robes, in a void place in the entrance of the gate of Samaria; and all the prophets prophesied before them. 
And Zedekiah the son of Chenaanah made him horns of iron: and he said, Thus saith the LORD, With these shalt thou push the Syrians, until thou have consumed them. 
And all the prophets prophesied so, saying, Go up to Ramothgilead, and prosper: for the LORD shall deliver it into the king's hand. 
And the messenger that was gone to call Micaiah spake unto him, saying, Behold now, the words of the prophets declare good unto the king with one mouth: let 
595,jubile, and it shall be abated from thy estimation. 
And if he that sanctified the field will in any wise redeem it, then he shall add the fifth part of the money of thy estimation unto it, and it shall be assured to him. 
And if he will not redeem the field, or if he have sold the field to another man, it shall not be redeemed any more. 
But the field, when it goeth out in the jubile, shall be holy unto the LORD, as a field devoted; the possession thereof shall be the priest's. 
And if a man sanctify unto the LORD a field which he hath bought, which is not of the fields of his possession
831,ll these he brought to Babylon. 
And they burnt the house of God, and brake down the wall of Jerusalem, and burnt all the palaces thereof with fire, and destroyed all the goodly vessels thereof. 
And them that had escaped from the sword carried he away to Babylon; where they were servants to him and his sons until the reign of the kingdom of Persia: 
To fulfil the word of the LORD by the mouth of Jeremiah, until the land had enjoyed her sabbaths: for as long as she lay desolate she kept sabbath, to fulfil threescore and ten years. 
Now in the first year of Cyrus king of Persia, that the word of the LORD spoken by the mouth of Jeremiah might be accomplished, the LORD stirred up the spirit of Cyrus king of Persia, that he made a proclamation throughout all his kingdom, and put it also in writing, saying, 
Thus saith Cyrus
820,, there will the eagles be gathered together. 
Immediately after the tribulation of those days shall the sun be darkened, and the moon shall not give her light, and the stars shall fall from heaven, and the powers of the heavens shall be shaken: 
And then shall appear the sign of the Son of man in heaven: and then shall all the tribes of the earth mourn, and they shall see the Son of man coming in the clouds of heaven with power and great glory. 
And he shall send his angels with a great sound of a trumpet, and they shall gather together his elect from the four winds, from one end of heaven to the other. 
Now learn a parable of the fig tree; When his branch is yet tender, and putteth forth leaves, ye know that summer is nigh: 
So likewise ye, when ye shall see all these things, know that it is near, even at t
575,hope, and without God in the world: 
But now in Christ Jesus ye who sometimes were far off are made nigh by the blood of Christ. 
For he is our peace, who hath made both one, and hath broken down the middle wall of partition between us; 
Having abolished in his flesh the enmity, even the law of commandments contained in ordinances; for to make in himself of twain one new man, so making peace; 
And that he might reconcile both unto God in one body by the cross, having slain the enmity thereby: 
And came and preached peace to you which were afar off, and to them that wer
608,eth his waves to come up. 
And they shall destroy the walls of Tyrus, and break down her towers: I will also scrape her dust from her, and make her like the top of a rock. 
It shall be a place for the spreading of nets in the midst of the sea: for I have spoken it, saith the Lord GOD: and it shall become a spoil to the nations. 
And her daughters which are in the field shall be slain by the sword; and they shall know that I am the LORD. 
For thus saith the Lord GOD; Behold, I will bring upon Tyrus Nebuchadrezzar king of Babylon, a king of kings, from the north, with horses, and with chariots, and with
639, quickly. 
And the seventh angel sounded; and there were great voices in heaven, saying, The kingdoms of this world are become the kingdoms of our Lord, and of his Christ; and he shall reign for ever and ever. 
And the four and twenty elders, which sat before God on their seats, fell upon their faces, and worshipped God, 
Saying, We give thee thanks, O LORD God Almighty, which art, and wast, and art to come; because thou hast taken to thee thy great power, and hast reigned. 
And the nations were angry, and thy wrath is come, and the time of the dead, that they should be judged, and that thou shouldest give reward unto thy servants 
583,o the going down of the same the LORD's name is to be praised. 
The LORD is high above all nations, and his glory above the heavens. 
Who is like unto the LORD our God, who dwelleth on high, 
Who humbleth himself to behold the things that are in heaven, and in the earth! 
He raiseth up the poor out of the dust, and lifteth the needy out of the dunghill; 
That he may set him with princes, even with the princes of his people. 
He maketh the barren woman to keep house, and to be a joyful mother of children. Praise ye the LORD. 
When Israel went out of Egypt, the house of Jacob fr
627,refore meddle not with him that flattereth with his lips. 
Whoso curseth his father or his mother, his lamp shall be put out in obscure darkness. 
An inheritance may be gotten hastily at the beginning; but the end thereof shall not be blessed. 
Say not thou, I will recompense evil; but wait on the LORD, and he shall save thee. 
Divers weights are an abomination unto the LORD; and a false balance is not good. 
Man's goings are of the LORD; how can a man then understand his own way? 
It is a snare to the man who devoureth that which is holy, and after vows to make enquiry. 
A wise king scattereth the wicked, and bringeth 
803,ants, and the people, and such as are left in this city from the pestilence, from the sword, and from the famine, into the hand of Nebuchadrezzar king of Babylon, and into the hand of their enemies, and into the hand of those that seek their life: and he shall smite them with the edge of the sword; he shall not spare them, neither have pity, nor have mercy. 
And unto this people thou shalt say, Thus saith the LORD; Behold, I set before you the way of life, and the way of death. 
He that abideth in this city shall die by the sword, and by the famine, and by the pestilence: but he that goeth out, and falleth to the Chaldeans that besiege you, he shall live, and his life shall be unto him for a prey. 
For I have set my face against this city for evil, and not for good, saith the LORD: it shall b
616,nd their meat offering shall be of flour mingled with oil: three tenth deals shall ye offer for a bullock, and two tenth deals for a ram; 
A several tenth deal shalt thou offer for every lamb, throughout the seven lambs: 
And one goat for a sin offering, to make an atonement for you. 
Ye shall offer these beside the burnt offering in the morning, which is for a continual burnt offering. 
After this manner ye shall offer daily, throughout the seven days, the meat of the sacrifice made by fire, of a sweet savour unto the LORD: it shall be offered beside the continual burnt offering, and his drink offering. 
And
685,t hath had no husband, they may defile themselves. 
And after he is cleansed, they shall reckon unto him seven days. 
And in the day that he goeth into the sanctuary, unto the inner court, to minister in the sanctuary, he shall offer his sin offering, saith the Lord GOD. 
And it shall be unto them for an inheritance: I am their inheritance: and ye shall give them no possession in Israel: I am their possession. 
They shall eat the meat offering, and the sin offering, and the trespass offering: and every dedicated thing in Israel shall be theirs. 
And the first of all the firstfruits of all things, and every oblation of all, of every sort of your oblations, shall be the priest's
610,the king. 
And the king said unto him, How many times shall I adjure thee that thou tell me nothing but that which is true in the name of the LORD? 
And he said, I saw all Israel scattered upon the hills, as sheep that have not a shepherd: and the LORD said, These have no master: let them return every man to his house in peace. 
And the king of Israel said unto Jehoshaphat, Did I not tell thee that he would prophesy no good concerning me, but evil? 
And he said, Hear thou therefore the word of the LORD: I saw the LORD sitting on his throne, and all the host of heaven standing by him on his right hand an
779,ts, and upon his horsemen. 
And the Egyptians shall know that I am the LORD, when I have gotten me honour upon Pharaoh, upon his chariots, and upon his horsemen. 
And the angel of God, which went before the camp of Israel, removed and went behind them; and the pillar of the cloud went from before their face, and stood behind them: 
And it came between the camp of the Egyptians and the camp of Israel; and it was a cloud and darkness to them, but it gave light by night to these: so that the one came not near the other all the night. 
And Moses stretched out his hand over the sea; and the LORD caused the sea to go back by a strong east wind all that night, and made the sea dry land, and the waters were divided. 
And the children of Israel went into the midst of the sea up
787, given by lot, throughout their families, out of the tribe of Reuben, and out of the tribe of Gad, and out of the tribe of Zebulun, twelve cities. 
And the children of Israel gave to the Levites these cities with their suburbs. 
And they gave by lot out of the tribe of the children of Judah, and out of the tribe of the children of Simeon, and out of the tribe of the children of Benjamin, these cities, which are called by their names. 
And the residue of the families of the sons of Kohath had cities of their coasts out of the tribe of Ephraim. 
And they gave unto them, of the cities of refuge, Shechem in mount Ephraim with her suburbs; they gave also Gezer with her suburbs, 
And Jokmeam with her suburbs, and Bethhoron with her suburbs, 
And Aijalon with her suburbs, and Gathrim
669,of the Lord Jesus, how he said, It is more blessed to give than to receive. 
And when he had thus spoken, he kneeled down, and prayed with them all. 
And they all wept sore, and fell on Paul's neck, and kissed him, 
Sorrowing most of all for the words which he spake, that they should see his face no more. And they accompanied him unto the ship. 
And it came to pass, that after we were gotten from them, and had launched, we came with a straight course unto Coos, and the day following unto Rhodes, and from thence unto Patara: 
And finding a ship sailing over unto Phenicia, we went aboard, and set forth. 
Now when we had discovered Cyprus, we left it on the left h
757,they shall not be put to death, because she was not free. 
And he shall bring his trespass offering unto the LORD, unto the door of the tabernacle of the congregation, even a ram for a trespass offering. 
And the priest shall make an atonement for him with the ram of the trespass offering before the LORD for his sin which he hath done: and the sin which he hath done shall be forgiven him. 
And when ye shall come into the land, and shall have planted all manner of trees for food, then ye shall count the fruit thereof as uncircumcised: three years shall it be as uncircumcised unto you: it shall not be eaten of. 
But in the fourth year all the fruit thereof shall be holy to praise the LORD withal. 
And in the fifth year shall ye eat of the fruit ther
615,e evening she went, and on the morrow she returned into the second house of the women, to the custody of Shaashgaz, the king's chamberlain, which kept the concubines: she came in unto the king no more, except the king delighted in her, and that she were called by name. 
Now when the turn of Esther, the daughter of Abihail the uncle of Mordecai, who had taken her for his daughter, was come to go in unto the king, she required nothing but what Hegai the king's chamberlain, the keeper of the women, appointed. And Esther obtained favour in the sight of all them that looked upon her. 
So Esther was taken unto kin
708,the LORD'S heave offering, unto Eleazar the priest, as the LORD commanded Moses. 
And of the children of Israel's half, which Moses divided from the men that warred, 
(Now the half that pertained unto the congregation was three hundred thousand and thirty thousand and seven thousand and five hundred sheep, 
And thirty and six thousand beeves, 
And thirty thousand asses and five hundred, 
And sixteen thousand persons;) 
Even of the children of Israel's half, Moses took one portion of fifty, both of man and of beast, and gave them unto the Levites, which kept the charge of the tabernacle of the LORD; as the LORD commanded Moses. 
And the officers which were over thousands of the host, the captains of 
713,nd the years of the life of Kohath were an hundred thirty and three years. 
And the sons of Merari; Mahali and Mushi: these are the families of Levi according to their generations. 
And Amram took him Jochebed his father's sister to wife; and she bare him Aaron and Moses: and the years of the life of Amram were an hundred and thirty and seven years. 
And the sons of Izhar; Korah, and Nepheg, and Zichri. 
And the sons of Uzziel; Mishael, and Elzaphan, and Zithri. 
And Aaron took him Elisheba, daughter of Amminadab, sister of Naashon, to wife; and she bare him Nadab, and Abihu, Eleazar, and Ithamar. 
And the sons of Korah; Assir, and Elkanah, and Abiasaph: these are the families of the Korhites. 
And Eleaz
569,ts is the land darkened, and the people shall be as the fuel of the fire: no man shall spare his brother. 
And he shall snatch on the right hand, and be hungry; and he shall eat on the left hand, and they shall not be satisfied: they shall eat every man the flesh of his own arm: 
Manasseh, Ephraim; and Ephraim, Manasseh: and they together shall be against Judah. For all this his anger is not turned away, but his hand is stretched out still. 
Woe unto them that decree unrighteous decrees, and that write grievousness which they have prescribed; 
To turn aside the n
765, the weight of whose spear weighed three hundred shekels of brass in weight, he being girded with a new sword, thought to have slain David. 
But Abishai the son of Zeruiah succoured him, and smote the Philistine, and killed him. Then the men of David sware unto him, saying, Thou shalt go no more out with us to battle, that thou quench not the light of Israel. 
And it came to pass after this, that there was again a battle with the Philistines at Gob: then Sibbechai the Hushathite slew Saph, which was of the sons of the giant. 
And there was again a battle in Gob with the Philistines, where Elhanan the son of Jaareoregim, a Bethlehemite, slew the brother of Goliath the Gittite, the staff of whose spear was like a weaver's beam. 
And there was yet a battle i
564, convocation unto you: ye shall do no servile work therein: it shall be a statute for ever in all your dwellings throughout your generations. 
And when ye reap the harvest of your land, thou shalt not make clean riddance of the corners of thy field when thou reapest, neither shalt thou gather any gleaning of thy harvest: thou shalt leave them unto the poor, and to the stranger: I am the LORD your God. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses, saying, 
Speak unto the children of Israel, saying, In the seventh month, in the first day of the month, shall ye have a sabbat
817,hren, and abode with them one day. 
And the next day we that were of Paul's company departed, and came unto Caesarea: and we entered into the house of Philip the evangelist, which was one of the seven; and abode with him. 
And the same man had four daughters, virgins, which did prophesy. 
And as we tarried there many days, there came down from Judaea a certain prophet, named Agabus. 
And when he was come unto us, he took Paul's girdle, and bound his own hands and feet, and said, Thus saith the Holy Ghost, So shall the Jews at Jerusalem bind the man that owneth this girdle, and shall deliver him into the hands of the Gentiles. 
And when we heard these things, both we, and they of that place, besought him not to go up to Jerusalem. 
Then Paul answered, What mean ye to weep and to break mine heart? for I am r
704,gs of the isles which are beyond the sea, 
Dedan, and Tema, and Buz, and all that are in the utmost corners, 
And all the kings of Arabia, and all the kings of the mingled people that dwell in the desert, 
And all the kings of Zimri, and all the kings of Elam, and all the kings of the Medes, 
And all the kings of the north, far and near, one with another, and all the kingdoms of the world, which are upon the face of the earth: and the king of Sheshach shall drink after them. 
Therefore thou shalt say unto them, Thus saith the LORD of hosts, the God of Israel; Drink ye, and be drunken, and spue, and fall, and rise no more, because of the sword which I will send among you. 
And it shall be, if the
705,but they have not grieved; thou hast consumed them, but they have refused to receive correction: they have made their faces harder than a rock; they have refused to return. 
Therefore I said, Surely these are poor; they are foolish: for they know not the way of the LORD, nor the judgment of their God. 
I will get me unto the great men, and will speak unto them; for they have known the way of the LORD, and the judgment of their God: but these have altogether broken the yoke, and burst the bonds. 
Wherefore a lion out of the forest shall slay them, and a wolf of the evenings shall spoil them, a leopard shall watch over their cities: every one that goeth out thence shall be torn in pieces: because t
660,g of atonement, and the continual burnt offering, and the meat offering of it, and their drink offerings. 
And on the fifteenth day of the seventh month ye shall have an holy convocation; ye shall do no servile work, and ye shall keep a feast unto the LORD seven days: 
And ye shall offer a burnt offering, a sacrifice made by fire, of a sweet savour unto the LORD; thirteen young bullocks, two rams, and fourteen lambs of the first year; they shall be without blemish: 
And their meat offering shall be of flour mingled with oil, three tenth deals unto every bullock of the thirteen bullocks, two tenth deals to each ram of the two rams, 
And a several tenth 
719,nto them, Go ye into all the world, and preach the gospel to every creature. 
He that believeth and is baptized shall be saved; but he that believeth not shall be damned. 
And these signs shall follow them that believe; In my name shall they cast out devils; they shall speak with new tongues; 
They shall take up serpents; and if they drink any deadly thing, it shall not hurt them; they shall lay hands on the sick, and they shall recover. 
So then after the Lord had spoken unto them, he was received up into heaven, and sat on the right hand of God. 
And they went forth, and preached every where, the Lord working with them, and confirming the word with signs following. Amen. 
Forasmuch as many have taken in hand
839,hat proceedeth out of the mouth of God. 
Then the devil taketh him up into the holy city, and setteth him on a pinnacle of the temple, 
And saith unto him, If thou be the Son of God, cast thyself down: for it is written, He shall give his angels charge concerning thee: and in their hands they shall bear thee up, lest at any time thou dash thy foot against a stone. 
Jesus said unto him, It is written again, Thou shalt not tempt the Lord thy God. 
Again, the devil taketh him up into an exceeding high mountain, and sheweth him all the kingdoms of the world, and the glory of them; 
And saith unto him, All these things will I give thee, if thou wilt fall down and worship me. 
Then saith Jesus unto him, Get thee hence, Satan: for it is written, Thou shalt worship the Lord thy God, and him only shalt thou serve. 
Then the devil leavet
643, the disciples went away again unto their own home. 
But Mary stood without at the sepulchre weeping: and as she wept, she stooped down, and looked into the sepulchre, 
And seeth two angels in white sitting, the one at the head, and the other at the feet, where the body of Jesus had lain. 
And they say unto her, Woman, why weepest thou? She saith unto them, Because they have taken away my LORD, and I know not where they have laid him. 
And when she had thus said, she turned herself back, and saw Jesus standing, and knew not that it was Jesus. 
Jesus saith unto her, Woman, why weepest thou? whom seekest thou? She, supposing him to be th
677,, even for all the evil that he did in the sight of the LORD, in provoking him to anger with the work of his hands, in being like the house of Jeroboam; and because he killed him. 
In the twenty and sixth year of Asa king of Judah began Elah the son of Baasha to reign over Israel in Tirzah, two years. 
And his servant Zimri, captain of half his chariots, conspired against him, as he was in Tirzah, drinking himself drunk in the house of Arza steward of his house in Tirzah. 
And Zimri went in and smote him, and killed him, in the twenty and seventh year of Asa king of Judah, and reigned in his stead. 
And it came to pass, when he began to reign, as soon as he sat on his 
663,the feasts of the LORD, which ye shall proclaim to be holy convocations, to offer an offering made by fire unto the LORD, a burnt offering, and a meat offering, a sacrifice, and drink offerings, every thing upon his day: 
Beside the sabbaths of the LORD, and beside your gifts, and beside all your vows, and beside all your freewill offerings, which ye give unto the LORD. 
Also in the fifteenth day of the seventh month, when ye have gathered in the fruit of the land, ye shall keep a feast unto the LORD seven days: on the first day shall be a sabbath, and on the eighth day shall be a sabbath. 
And ye shall take you on the first day the boughs of goodly trees
616,all my judgments, and do them: that the land, whither I bring you to dwell therein, spue you not out. 
And ye shall not walk in the manners of the nation, which I cast out before you: for they committed all these things, and therefore I abhorred them. 
But I have said unto you, Ye shall inherit their land, and I will give it unto you to possess it, a land that floweth with milk and honey: I am the LORD your God, which have separated you from other people. 
Ye shall therefore put difference between clean beasts and unclean, and between unclean fowls and clean: and ye shall not make your souls abominable by bea
623,ll be made as grass; 
And forgettest the LORD thy maker, that hath stretched forth the heavens, and laid the foundations of the earth; and hast feared continually every day because of the fury of the oppressor, as if he were ready to destroy? and where is the fury of the oppressor? 
The captive exile hasteneth that he may be loosed, and that he should not die in the pit, nor that his bread should fail. 
But I am the LORD thy God, that divided the sea, whose waves roared: The LORD of hosts is his name. 
And I have put my words in thy mouth, and I have covered thee in the shadow of mine hand, that I may plant the heav
718,ritten. 
So the people went forth, and brought them, and made themselves booths, every one upon the roof of his house, and in their courts, and in the courts of the house of God, and in the street of the water gate, and in the street of the gate of Ephraim. 
And all the congregation of them that were come again out of the captivity made booths, and sat under the booths: for since the days of Jeshua the son of Nun unto that day had not the children of Israel done so. And there was very great gladness. 
Also day by day, from the first day unto the last day, he read in the book of the law of God. And they kept the feast seven days; and on the eighth day was a solemn assembly, according unto the manner. 
Now in t
611,at were of iron and clay, and brake them to pieces. 
Then was the iron, the clay, the brass, the silver, and the gold, broken to pieces together, and became like the chaff of the summer threshingfloors; and the wind carried them away, that no place was found for them: and the stone that smote the image became a great mountain, and filled the whole earth. 
This is the dream; and we will tell the interpretation thereof before the king. 
Thou, O king, art a king of kings: for the God of heaven hath given thee a kingdom, power, and strength, and glory. 
And wheresoever the children of men dwell, the beasts o
821,ive me a pledge, till thou send it? 
And he said, What pledge shall I give thee? And she said, Thy signet, and thy bracelets, and thy staff that is in thine hand. And he gave it her, and came in unto her, and she conceived by him. 
And she arose, and went away, and laid by her vail from her, and put on the garments of her widowhood. 
And Judah sent the kid by the hand of his friend the Adullamite, to receive his pledge from the woman's hand: but he found her not. 
Then he asked the men of that place, saying, Where is the harlot, that was openly by the way side? And they said, There was no harlot in this place. 
And he returned to Judah, and said, I cannot find her; and also the men of the place said, that there was no harlot in this place. 
And Judah said, Let her take it to her, lest we be shamed: behold, I s
816, and from the south, under Ashdothpisgah: 
And the coast of Og king of Bashan, which was of the remnant of the giants, that dwelt at Ashtaroth and at Edrei, 
And reigned in mount Hermon, and in Salcah, and in all Bashan, unto the border of the Geshurites and the Maachathites, and half Gilead, the border of Sihon king of Heshbon. 
Them did Moses the servant of the LORD and the children of Israel smite: and Moses the servant of the LORD gave it for a possession unto the Reubenites, and the Gadites, and the half tribe of Manasseh. 
And these are the kings of the country which Joshua and the children of Israel smote on this side Jordan on the west, from Baalgad in the valley of Lebanon even unto the mount Halak, that goeth up to Seir; which Joshua gave unto the tribes of Israel for a possession according to t
764,alley, and the border even unto the river Jabbok, which is the border of the children of Ammon; 
The plain also, and Jordan, and the coast thereof, from Chinnereth even unto the sea of the plain, even the salt sea, under Ashdothpisgah eastward. 
And I commanded you at that time, saying, The LORD your God hath given you this land to possess it: ye shall pass over armed before your brethren the children of Israel, all that are meet for the war. 
But your wives, and your little ones, and your cattle, (for I know that ye have much cattle,) shall abide in your cities which I have given you; 
Until the LORD have given rest unto your brethren, as well as unto you, and until they also possess the land which the LORD your God hath given them beyond Jordan: and th
739,ich murmur against me? I have heard the murmurings of the children of Israel, which they murmur against me. 
Say unto them, As truly as I live, saith the LORD, as ye have spoken in mine ears, so will I do to you: 
Your carcases shall fall in this wilderness; and all that were numbered of you, according to your whole number, from twenty years old and upward which have murmured against me. 
Doubtless ye shall not come into the land, concerning which I sware to make you dwell therein, save Caleb the son of Jephunneh, and Joshua the son of Nun. 
But your little ones, which ye said should be a prey, them will I bring in, and they shall know the land which ye have despised. 
But as for you, your carcases, they shall fall in this wilder
696,world passeth away. 
But I would have you without carefulness. He that is unmarried careth for the things that belong to the Lord, how he may please the Lord: 
But he that is married careth for the things that are of the world, how he may please his wife. 
There is difference also between a wife and a virgin. The unmarried woman careth for the things of the Lord, that she may be holy both in body and in spirit: but she that is married careth for the things of the world, how she may please her husband. 
And this I speak for your own profit; not that I may cast a snare upon you, but for that which is comely, and that ye may attend upon the Lord without distraction. 
But if any man think th
793,RD? 
Is the iniquity of Peor too little for us, from which we are not cleansed until this day, although there was a plague in the congregation of the LORD, 
But that ye must turn away this day from following the LORD? and it will be, seeing ye rebel to day against the LORD, that to morrow he will be wroth with the whole congregation of Israel. 
Notwithstanding, if the land of your possession be unclean, then pass ye over unto the land of the possession of the LORD, wherein the LORD's tabernacle dwelleth, and take possession among us: but rebel not against the LORD, nor rebel against us, in building you an altar beside the altar of the LORD our God. 
Did not Achan the son of Zerah commit a trespass in the accursed thing, and wrath fell on all the congregation of Israel? and that man 
680,phesy and say unto them, Thus saith the Lord GOD; Behold, O my people, I will open your graves, and cause you to come up out of your graves, and bring you into the land of Israel. 
And ye shall know that I am the LORD, when I have opened your graves, O my people, and brought you up out of your graves, 
And shall put my spirit in you, and ye shall live, and I shall place you in your own land: then shall ye know that I the LORD have spoken it, and performed it, saith the LORD. 
The word of the LORD came again unto me, saying, 
Moreover, thou son of man, take thee one stick, and write upon it, For Judah, and for the children of Israel his companions: then take another stick,
665,ught against Israel. 
And the LORD God of Israel delivered Sihon and all his people into the hand of Israel, and they smote them: so Israel possessed all the land of the Amorites, the inhabitants of that country. 
And they possessed all the coasts of the Amorites, from Arnon even unto Jabbok, and from the wilderness even unto Jordan. 
So now the LORD God of Israel hath dispossessed the Amorites from before his people Israel, and shouldest thou possess it? 
Wilt not thou possess that which Chemosh thy god giveth thee to possess? So whomsoever the LORD our God shall drive out from before us, them will we possess. 
And now art thou any thing better than Balak 
